
This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 
to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 
to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 
are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other marginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 
publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing this resource, we have taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 

We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain from automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attribution The Google "watermark" you see on each file is essential for informing people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liability can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 



at |http : //books . google . com/ 



^/. ^^^, 



Cj^e dtattfoUt Skttit^. 



^r For Proapectns indicating the character and purpose of the Catholic 
Series, and for list of Books already published, see Catalogue at the end 
of this Work. 



THE 



VOCATION OF MAN. 



JOHANN GOTTLIEB FICHTE. 



(rtatt0late1r trom tit CErermati, 



WILLIAM SMITH. 



* Faith is the sabstance of things hoped for, the evidence of things not seen." 

Si. Paul 




LONDON: 
JOHN CHAPMAN, 142, STRAND. 



M.D.OCO.XLVin. 



The following work contains, within a brief 
compass^ a popular but systematic exposition of Fiohtb's 
Philosophy; and as such will not, it is hoped, be unaccept- 
able to the English Student. It was written at Berlin in 
1799, after his retirement from the Uniyersity of Jena, and 
at the commencement of that period of profound study 
'which afterwards resulted in the complete elaboration of 
his theory of the Absolute. In the present work we dis- 
cover the first traces of those deeply religious tendencies 
which his mind acquired during that period, and which are 
more fully developed in his subsequent writings. 

A version of the book was published in England a few 
years ago under the title of " The Destination of Man." 
The anxious wish of the translator that a full and accurate 
edition of these writings should be placed in the hands of 
the English reader, must be his apology for what may ap- 
pear, to those unacquainted with the original, an unnecessary 
or even invidious undertaking. 

W. SMITH. 



EpDrBUBaH, August 1848. 



CONTENTS. 



Book I. Doubt, page 13 

II. Enowledob, 61 

III. Faith, 103 



THE 



VOCATION OF MAN. 



JOHANN GOTTLIEB FICHTE. 



PREFACE. 



Whatbvee in the more recent Philosophy can be useful 
beyond the limits of the schools is intended to form the 
contents of this work, set forth in that order in which it 
would naturally present itself to unscientific thought. The 
more profound arguments by which the subtle objections 
and extravagances of over-refined minds are to be met, — 
whatever is but the foundation of other Positive Science, 
— and lastly, whatever belongs to Pedagogy in its widest 
sense, that is, to the deliberate and arbitrary Education 
of the Human Race, — shall remain beyond the limits of our 
task. These objections are not made by the natural im- 
derstanding; — Positive Science it leaves to Scholars by 
profession; and the Education of the Hiunan Race, in so 
far as that depends upon human efibrt, to its appointed 
Teachers and Statesmen. 

This book is therefore not intended for philosophers by 
profession, who will find nothing in it that has not been 
already set forth in other works of the same author. It 
ought to be intelligible to all readers who are able generally 



Xll PREFACE. 

to understand a book at all. To those who only wish to 
repeat, in somewhat varied order, certain phrases which 
thej have already learned by rote, and who mistake this 
business of the memory for understanding, it will probably 
be found unintelligible. 

It ought to attract and animate the reader, and to elevate 
him above the world of sense, to a transcendental region ; — 
at least the author is conscious that he has not entered 
upon his task without such inspiration. Often, indeed, the 
fire with which we commence an undertaking disappears 
during the toil of execution ; and thus, at the conclusion of 
a work, we are in danger of doing ourselves injustice upon 
this point. In short, whether the author has succeeded in 
attaining his object or not, can only be determined by the 
effect which the work shall produce on the readers to whom 
it is addressed, — and in this the author has no voice. 

I must, however, remind my reader that the " I" who 
speaks in the book is not the author himself, but it is his 
earnest wish that the reader should himself assume this 
character, and that he should not rest contented with a 
mere historical apprehension of what is here said, but really 
and truly, during reading, hold converse with himself, de- 
liberate, draw conclusions, and form resolutions, like his 
representative in the book, and, by his own labour and 
reflection, develope out of his own soul, and build up within 
himself, that mode of thought the mere picture of which is 
laid before him in the work. 



BOOK FIRST. 



DOUBT. 



B3 



BOOK I. 
DOUBT. 

I BELIEVE that I am now tolerably well acquainted 
with no inconsiderable part of the world that surrounds 
me, and I have certainly employed sufficient labour 
and care in the acquisition of this knowledge. I have 
put fidth only in the concurrent testimony of my 
senses, only in repeated and unvarying experience; — 
what 1 have beheld, I have touched — what I have 
touched, I have analyzed; — I have repeated my ob- 
servations again and again ; I have compared the va- 
rious phenomena with each other ; and only when I 
could understand their mutual connexion, when I coul4 
explain and deduce the one from the other, and cal- 
culate the result beforehand, and the examination of 
the result had proved the accuracy of my calculations, 
have 1 been satisfied. Therefore I am now as well 
assured of the accuracy of this part of my knowledge, 
as of my own existence ; I walk with a firm step in 
these understood spheres of my world, and do actually 
every moment venture welfare and life itself on the 
certainty of my convictions. 

But — what am I myself, and what is my vocation? 



16 BOOK I. 

Superfluous question ! It is long since I have re- 
ceived complete instruction upon these points, and it 
would take much time to repeat aU that I have heard, 
learned, and believed concerning them. 

And in what way then have I attained this know- 
ledge, which I have this dim remembrance of pos- 
sessing? Have I, impelled by a burning desire of 
knowledge, toiled on through uncertainty, doubt, and 
contradiction? — have I^ when anything credible pre- 
sented itself before me, withheld my assent until I had 
examined and reexamined, sifted and compared it, — 
imtil an inward voice proclaimed to me, irresistibly 
and without the possibiUty of mistake, — " So is it, 
as surely as thou Uvest and art !" — Xo ! I remember 
no such state of mind. Those instructions were be- 
stowed on me before I sought them, the answers were 
given before I had put the questions. I heard, for I 
could not avoid doing so, and what was taught me 
remained in my memory just as chance had disposed 
it; — without examination, and without interference, 
I allowed everything to take its place in my mind. 

How then could I persuade myself that I really 
possessed any knowledge upon these matters ? If I 
know that only of which I am convinced, which I have 
myself discovered, myself experienced, then I cannot 
truly say that I possess even the sHghtest knowledge 
of my vocation ; — I know only what others assert they 
know about it, and all that I can really be assured 
of is, that I have heard this or that said upon the 
subject. 

Thus, while I have inquired for myself with the 
most anxious care, into comparatively trivial matters, 
I have reUed wholly on the care and fideUty of others 



DOUBT. 17 

in things of the weightiest importance. I have at- 
tributed to others an interest in the highest affidrs of 
humanity, an earnestness and an exactitude which I 
have by no means discovered in myself. I have es- 
teemed them as indescribably higher than myself. 

Whatever truth they really possess, whence can they 
have obtained it but through their own reflection? 
And why may not I, by means of the same reflection, 
discover the same truth, since I too have a being as 
well as they ? How much have I hitherto undervalued 
and slighted myself! 

It shall be no longer thus. From this moment I 
will enter on my rights, and assume the dignity which 
belongs to me. Let all foreign aids be cast aside ! I 
will examine for myself. If any secret wishes con- 
cerning the result of my inquiries, any partial leaning 
towards certain conclusions, should arise within me, 
I forget and renounce them, and I will accord them 
no influence over the direction of my thoughts. I 
will perform my task with firmness and integrity; — 
I will candidly admit all that I really discover. What 
I find to be truth, let it sound as it may, shall be 
welcome to me. I will know. With the same certainty 
with which I can calculate that this ground will sup- 
port me when I tread on it, that this fire will bum 
me if I approach too near it, will I know what 1 am, 
and what I shall be. And should it prove impossible 
for me to know this, then I will know this much at 
least, that I cannot know it. Even to this conclusion 
of my inquiry will I submit, should it approve itself 
to me as the truth. I hasten to the fulfilment of my 
task. 



18 BOOK I. 



I seize on Nature in her rapid and unrest- 
ing flight, detain her for an instant, and holding the 
present moment steadily in view, I reflect upon this 
Nature by means of which my thinking powers have 
hitherto been developed and trained to those researches 
that belong to her domain. 

I am surrounded by objects which I am compelled 
to regard as separate, independent, self- subsisting 
wholes. I behold plants, trees, animals. I ascribe to 
each individual certain properties and attributes by 
which I distinguish it from others ; to this plant, such 
a form ; to another, another ; to this tree, leaves of 
such a shape ; to another, others differing from them. 

Every object has its appointed number of attributes, 
neither more nor less. To every question, whether it 
is this or that, there is, for any one who is thoroughly 
acquainted with it, a decisive Yes possible, or a de- 
cisive No, — so that there is an end of all doubt or 
hesitation on the subject. Everything that exists is 
something, or it is not this something; — is coloured, 
or is not coloured; — has a certain colour, or has, it 
not; — may be tasted, or may not; — is tangible, or is 
not ; and so on, ad infinitum. 



DOUBT. 19 

Every object possesses each of these attributes in a 
definite degree. Let a measure be given for any par- 
ticular attribute which is capable of being appUed to 
the object ; then we may discover the exact extent of 
that attribute, which it neither exceeds nor falls short 
of. I measure the height of this tree ; it is defined, 
and it is not a single Une higher or lower than it is. 
I consider the green of its leaves; it is a definite 
green, not the smallest shade darker or lighter, fresher 
or more faded than it is ; although I may have neither 
measure nor expression for these qualities. I turn my 
eye to this plant ; it is at a definite stage of growth 
between its budding and its maturity, not in the small- 
est degree nearer or more remote from either than it 
is. Everything that eccists is determined thrcv/ghout; 
it is what it is, and nothing else. 

Not that I am unable to conceive of an object as 
floating unattached between opposite determinations. 
I do certainly conceive of indefinite objects ; for more 
than half of my thoughts consist of such conceptions. 
I think of a tree in general. Has this tree fruit or 
not, leaves or not ; and if so, what is their number ? 
— to what order of trees does it belong? — how large 
is it? — and so on. AU these questions remain unan- 
swered, and my thought is undetermined in these re- 
spects ; for L did not propose to myself the thought 
of any particular tree, but of a tree generally. But 
I deny actual existence to such a tree in thus leaving 
it imdefined. Everything that actually exists has its 
determinate number of all the possible attributes of 
actual existence, and each of these in a determinate 
measure, as surely as it actually exists, although I 
may admit my inability thoroughly to exhaust all the 



i 



BOOK I. 



properties of any one object, or to apply to them any 
standard of measurement. 



But Nature pursues her course of ceaseless change, 
and while I yet speak of the moment which I sought 
to detain before me, it is gone, and all is changed; 
and in like manner, before I had fixed my observation 
upon it, all was otherwise. It had not always been 
as it was when I observed it : — it had become so. 

Why then, and from what cause, had it become 
precisely this which I beheld ? Why had Nature, amid 
the infijiite variety of possible forms, assumed in this 
moment precisely these and no others? 

For this reason, that they were preceded by those 
precisely which did precede them, and no others; and 
because the present could arise out of those and out 
of no other possible conditions. Had anything in the 
preceding moment been in the smallest degree different 
from what it was, then in the present moment some- 
thing would have been different from what it is. And 
from what cause were all things in that preceding 
moment precisely such as they were ? For this reason, 
that in the moment preceding that, they were such as 
they were. And this moment again was dependent on 
its predecessor, and that on another, and so on without 
limit. In like manner wiQ Nature, in the succeeding 
moment, be necessarily determined to the particular 
forms which it will then assume — for this reason, that 
in the present moment it is determined exactly as it 
is ; and were anything in the present moment in the 
smallest degree different from what it is, then in the 
succeeding moment something would necessarily be 



DOUBT. 21 

different firom what it will be. And in the moment 
following that, all things will be precisely as they will 
be, because in the immediately previous moment they 
will be as they will be ; and so will its successor pro- 
ceed forth from it, and another from that, and so on 
for ever. 

Nature proceeds throughout the whole infinite series 
of her possible determinations without outward in- 
centive; and the succession of these changes is not 
arbitrary, but follows strict and unalterable laws. 
Whatever exists in I^ature, necessarily exists as it does 
exist, and it is absolutely impossible that it could be 
otherwise. I enter within an unbroken chain of phe- 
nomena, in which every link is determined by that 
which has preceded it, and in its turn determines the 
next ; so that, were I able to trace backward the causes 
through which alone any given moment could have 
come into actual existence, and to follow out the con- 
sequences which must necessarily flow from it, I should 
then be able, at that moment, and by means of thought 
alone, to discover all possible conditions of the universe, 
both past and future; — past, by interpreting the given 
moment; fixture, by foreseeing its results. Every part 
contains the whole, for ordy through the whole is each 
part what it is, but through the whole it is rhecessarUy 
what it is. 



What is it then which I have thus discovered ? If I 
review my acquisitions as a whole, I find their substance 
to be this : — that in every stage of progress an ante- 
cedent is necessarily supposed, from which and through 
which alone the present has arisen ; in every condition 



22 BOOK I, 

a previous condition, in every existence another ex- 
istence ; and that from nothing, nothing whatever can 
proceed. 

Let me pause here a little, and develope whatever 
is contained in this principle, until it become perfectly 
dear to me I For it may be that on my clear insight 
into this point may depend the whole success of my 
future inquiry. 

Why, and &om what cause, I had asked, are the 
determinate forms of objects precisely such as they are 
at this moment. I assumed without &rther proof, and 
without the slightest inquiry, as an absolute, immediate, 
certain and unalterable truth, that they had a cause; — 
that not through themselves, but through something 
which lay beyond them, they had attained existence 
and reaHty. I found their existence insuflScient to ac- 
count for itself, and I was compelled to assume another 
existence beyond them, as a necessary condition of 
theirs. But why did I find the existence of these 
qualities and determinations insuflScient for itself? why 
did I find it to be an incomplete existence? What 
was there in it which betrayed to me its insuflSciency ? 
This, without doubt : — that, in the first place, these 
quaUties do not exist in and for themselves, — they are 
quaUties of something else, attributes of a substance, 
forms of something formed; and the supposition of 
such a substance, of a something which shall support 
these attributes, — of a substratum for them, to use 
the phraseology of the Schools, — is a necessary condi- 
tion pf the conceivableness of such qualities. Further, 
before I can attribute a definite quaUty to such a svb- 
stratum, I must suppose for it a condition of repose, 
and of cessation from change, — a pause in its existence. 



DOUBT. 23 

Were I to admit it to be in a state of transition, then 
there could be no definite determination, but merely 
an endless series of changes from one state to another. 
The state of determination in a thing is thus a state 
and expression of mere passivity ; and a state of mere 
passivity is in itself an incomplete existence. Sudi 
passivity itself demands an activity to which it may be 
referred, by which it can be explained, and through 
which it first becomes conceivable ; — or, as it is usually 
expressed, — which contains within it the ground of 
this passivity. 

What I foimd myself compelled to suppose was thus 
by no means that the various and successive determi- 
nations of Nature themselves produce each other, — 
that the present determination annihilates itself, and, 
in the next moment, when it no longer exists, produces 
another, which is different from itself and not con- 
tained in it, to fill its place : — this is wholly incon- 
ceivable. The determination produces neither itself 
nor anything else. 

What I found myself compelled to assume in order 
to account for the gradual origin and the changes of 
those determinations, was an ax:tive power ^ peculiar to 
the object, and constituting its essential nature. 

And how, then, do I conceive of this power? — what 
is its nature, and the modes of its manifestation ? This 
only, — that under these definite conditions it produces 
by its own energy, certainly and infalUbly, this definite 
effect, and no other. 

The principle of activity, of independent arising 
and becoming, dwells in itself alone, and in nothing 
beyond itself, as surely as it is a power ; — a power is 
not impelled or set in motion ; it sets itself in motion. 



24 BOOK I. 

The cause of its having developed itself precisely in 
this manner and no other, lies partly in itself, because 
it is this particular power and no other, and partly 
in the circumstances under which it developes itself. 
Both these, — the inward determination of. a power 
by itself, and its outward determination by circum- 
stances, — must be united in order to produce a change. 
The latter, — the circumstances, the passive condition 
of things, — can of itself produce no change, for it 
contains within it the opposite of all change, — inert 
existence. The former, — the power, — is wholly de- 
termined, for only on this condition is it conceivable ; 
but its determination is completed only through the 
circumstances under which it is developed. I can con- 
ceive of a power, it can have an existence for me, only 
in so far as I can perceive an effect proceeding from it ; 
an inactive power, — which should yet be a power and 
not an inert thing, — is wholly inconceivable. Every 
effect, however, is determined, — and since the effect 
is but the expression, but another mode of the activity 
itself, — the active power is determined in its activity, 
and the ground of this determination lies partly in 
itself, because it can only be conceived of as a parti- 
cular and definite power ; partly out of itself, because 
its own determination can only be conceived of as con- 
ditioned by something else. 

A flower has sprung out of the earth, and I infer 
from thence a formative power in Nature. Such a 
formative power exists for me only so far as this flower 
and others, plants, and animals exist for me: — I can de- 
scribe this power only through its effects, and it is to 
me no more than the producing cause of such effects, 
— the generative principle of flowers, plants, animals, 



DOUBT. 26 

and organic forms in general. I will go fiirther, and 
maintain that a flower, and this particular flower, could 
arise in this place only in so far as aU other circum- 
stances united to make it possible. But by the union 
of all these circumstances for its possibility, the actual 
existence of the flower is in no measure explained to 
me ; and for this I am still compelled to assume a par- 
ticular, spontaneous, and original power in Nature, and 
indeed a flxywer-producmg power ; for another power 
of Nature might, under the same circiraistances, have 
produced something entirely different. — I have thus 
attained to the following view of the Universe. 

When I contemplate all things as one whole, one 
Nature, there is but one power, — when I regard them 
as separate existences, there are many powers — which 
develope themselves according to their inward laws, and 
pass through all the possible forms of which they are 
capable; and all objects in Nature are but those powers 
under certain determinate forms. The manifestations 
of every individual power of Nature are determined, 
become what they are, partly by its own essential cha- 
racter, and partly through the manifestations of all the 
other powers of Nature with which it is connected; 
but it is connected with them all — for Nature is one 
connected whole. They are, therefore, unalterably de- 
termined, — while its essential character remains what 
. it is, and while it continues to manifest itself under 
these particular circumstances, its manifestations must 
necessarily be what they are, — and it is absolutely 
impossible that they should be in the smallest degree 
different from what they are. 

In every moment of her duration Nature is one 
connected whole; in every moment each individual 

c 2 



26 BOOK I. 

part must be what it is, because all the others are what 
they are ; and you could not remove a single gram of 
sand from its place, without thereby, although perhaps 
imperceptibly to you, altering something throughout all 
parts of the immeasurable whole. But every moment 
of this duration is determined by all past moments, 
and will determine all fiiture moments ; and you can- 
not conceive even the position of a gram of sand other 
than it is in the Present, without being compelled to 
conceive the whole indefinite Past to have been other 
than what it has been, and the whole indefinite Future 
other than what it will be. Make the experiment, for 
instance, with this grain of quick-sand. Suppose it to 
lie some few paces further inland than it does : — then 
must the storm-wind that drove it in from the sea have 
been stronger than it actually was; — then must the 
preceding state of the weather, by which this wind 
was occasioned, and its degree of strength determined, 
have been different from what it actually was ; and the 
previous state by which this particular weather was 
determined, — and so on; and thus you have, without 
stay or limit, a wholly different temperature of the air. 
from that which reaUy existed, and a different consti- 
tution of the bodies which possess an influence over 
this temperature, and over which, on the , other hand, 
it exercises such an influence. On the fruitfuhiess or 
unfruitftilness of coimtries, and through that, or even 
directly, on the duration of human life, — this tempe- 
rature exercises a most decided influence. How can 
you know, — since it is not permitted us to penetrate 
the arcana of Nature, and it is therefore allowable to 
speak of possibihties, — how can you know, that in 
such a state of weather as may have been necessary to 



DOUBT. 27 

carry this grain of sand a few paces fiirther inland, 
some one of your forefathers might not have perished 
from hunger, or cold, or heat, before begetting that 
son from whom you are descended; and that thus 
you might never have been at all, and all that you 
have ever done, and all that you ever hope to do in 
this world, must have been obstructed, in order that 
a grain of sand might he in a different place ? 



I myself, with all that I call mine, am a link in this 
chain of the rigid necessity of Nature. There was a 
time — so others tell me who were then alive, and I am 
compelled by reasoning to admit such a time of which 
I have no immediate consciousness, — there was a time 
in which I was not, and a moment in which I began 
to be. I then only existed for others, — not yet for 
myself. Since then, my self, my seIf-<;onsciousness, has 
gradually unfolded itself, and I have discovered in my- 
self certain capacities and Acuities, wants and natural 
desires. I am a definite creature, which came into 
being at a certain time. 

I have not come into being by my own power. It 
would be the highest absurdity to suppose that I was 
before I came into existence, in order to bring myself 
into existence. I have, then, been called into being by 
another power beyond myself. And by what power 
but the universal power of Nature, since I too am a 
part of Nature ? The time at which my existence com- 
menced, and the attributes with which I came into 
being, were determined by this imiversal power of 
Nature ; and aU the forms under which these inborn 
attributes have since manifested themselves, and will 



28 BOOK I. 

manifest themselves as long as I have a being, are de- 
termined by the same power. It was impossible that, 
instead of me, another should have come into existence ; 
— it is impossible that this being, once here, should 
at any moment of its existence be other than what it 
is and will be. 

That my successive states of being have been accom- 
panied by consciousness, and that some of them, such 
as thoughts, resolutions, and the Hke, appear to be 
nothing but varied modes of consciousness, need not 
perplex my reasonings. It is the natural constitution 
of the plant to develope itself, of the animal to move, 
of man to think, — all after fixed laws. Why should 
I hesitate to acknowledge the last as an original power 
of Nature, as well as the first and second? Nothing 
could hinder me firom doing so, but surprise ; thought 
being assuredly a far higher and more subtle operation 
of Nature, than the formation of a plant or the proper 
motion of an animal. But how can I accord to such 
a feeling any influence whatever upon the cahn con- 
clusions of reason ? I cannot indeed explain how the 
power of Nature can produce thought; but can I better 
explain its operation in the formation of a plant, or 
in the motion of an animal ? To attempt to deduce 
thought firom any mere combination of matter, is an 
extravagance into which I shall not fall; but can I 
then explain firom it even the formation of the simplest 
moss? Those original powers of Nature cannot be 
explained, for it is only by them that we can ex- 
plain everything which is susceptible of explanation. 
Thought exists, — its existence is absolute and inde- 
pendent ; just as the formative power of Nature exists 
absolutely and independently. It is in Nature ; for the 



DOUBT. 29 

ihixikmg being arises and deyelopes himself aocoording 
to the laws of Nature ; therefore thought exists through 
Nature. There is in Nature an original thinking-power, 
as there is an original formative-power. 

This original thinking-power of the Universe pro- 
ceeds and developes itself in all possible modes of 
which it is capable, as the other original forces of 
Nature go forth and assume all possible forms. I, like 
the plant, am a particular mode or manifestation of 
the formative -power ; like the animal, a particular 
mode or manifestation of the power of motion ; and 
besides these I am also a particular mode or manife^ta- 
of the thinking-power ; and the union of these three 
original powers into one, — into one harmonious de- 
velopment, — is the distinguishing characteristic of my 
species, as it is the distinguishing characteristic of the 
plant species to be merely a mode or manifestation of 
the plant-forming power. 

Figure, motion, thought, in me, are not dependent 
on each other, and consequent on each other ; — so that 
I think, and thereby conceive of the forms and mo- 
tions of surrounding objects in such or such a manner, 
because they are so ; or on the other hand, that they 
are so, because I so conceive of them ; — but they are 
all simultaneous and harmonious developments of one 
and the same power, the manifestation of which ne- 
cessarily assumes the form of a complete creature of 
my species, and which may thus be called the man^ 
forming power. A thought arises within me absolutely, 
without dependence on anything else ; the correspond* 
ing form likewise appears absolutely, and also the 
motion which corresponds to both. I am not what 
I am, because I think so, or will so ; nor do I think 



30 BOOK I. 

and will it, because I am so ; but I am, and I think, 
both absolutely; — both harmonize with each other by 
virtue of a higher cause. 

As surely as those original powers of Nature exist 
for themselves, and have their own internal laws and 
purposes, so surely must their outward manifestations, 
if they are left to themselves and not suppressed by 
any foreign force, endure for a certain period of time, 
and describe a certain circle of change. That which 
disappears even at the moment of its production is 
assuredly not the manifestation of one primordial power, 
but only a consequence of the combined operation of 
various powers. The plant, a particular mode or mani- 
festation of the formative-power of Nature, when left 
to itself, proceeds from the first germination to the 
ripening of the seed. Man, a particular mode or mani- 
festation of all the powers of Nature in their union, 
when left to himself, proceeds from birth to death 
in old age. Hence, the duration of the life of plants 
and of men, and the varied modes of this life. 

This form, this proper motion, this thought, in har- 
mony with each other, — this duration of all these 
essential quaUties, amidst many non-essential changes, 
belong to me in so &r as I am a being of my species. 
But the mcm-fiyrmmg power of Nature had already 
displayed itself before I existed under a multitude of 
outward conditions and circumstances. These outward 
circumstances have determined the particular manner 
of its present activity, which has resulted in the pro- 
duction* of precisely such an individual of my species 
as I am. The same circumstances can never return; 
unfess the whole system of Nature should retrograde, 
and two Natures arise instead of one ; hence the same 



DOUBT, 31 

individuals, who have once existed, can never again 
come into actual being. Further, the mcm-fyrming 
power of Nature manifests itself, during the same time 
in which I exist, under all conditions and circumstances 
which are possible in that time. No combination of 
such circumstances can perfectly resemble those through 
which I came into existence, unless the universe could 
divide itself into two perfectlj similar but independent 
worlds. It is impossible that two perfectly similar 
individuals can come into actual existence at the same 
time. I am that which the num-forndng power of 
Nature — having been what it was, being what it is, 
and standing in this particular relation to the other 
opposing powers of Nature — ccvM become; and, — 
there being no ground of limitation within itself, — 
since it coidd become, necessarily must become. It is 
thus determined what I, this definite person, must be ; 
and the general law by which I am what I am is dis- 
covered. I am that which I am, because in this par- 
ticular condition of the great system of Nature, only 
such an one, and absolutely no other, was possible; 
and a spirit who could look through the innermost 
secrets of Nature, would, from knowing one single 
man, be able distinctly to declare what men had for- 
merly existed, and what men would exist at any future 
moment ; — in one individual he would discern all ac- 
tual and possible individuals. This, my inter-coimexion 
with the whole sjrstem of Nature, it is, then, which 
determines what I have been, what I am, and what I 
shall be ; and the same spirit would be able, from any 
possible moment of my existence, to discover infallibly 
what I had previously been, and what I was afterwards 
to become. All that, at any time, I am and shall be, 



33 BOOK L 

I am and shall be of absolute necessity ; and it is im- 
possible that I should be anjrthing else. 



I am, indeed, conscious of myself as an independent, 
and, in many occurrences of my life, a &ee being ; but 
this consciousness may easily be explained on the prin- 
ciples already laid down, and may be thoroughly 
reconciled with the conclusions which have been drawn. 
My immediate consciousness, my proper perception, 
cannot go beyond myself and the modes of my own 
being ; — I hare immediate knowledge of myself alone : 
whatever I may know more than this, I know only by 
inference, in tiie same way in which I have inferred 
the existence of original powers of Nature, which yet 
do not lie within the circle of my perceptions. I my- 
self, however, — that which I call me — my personality, 
— am not the man-farmmg power of Nature, but only 
one of its manifestations ; and it is only of this mani- 
festation that I am conscious, as myself, not of that 
power whose existence I only infer from the necessity 
of explaining my own. This manifestation, however, 
in its true nature, is really the product of an ori- 
ginal and independent power, and must appear as 
such in consciousness. On this account I recognise 
myself generally as an independent being. For this 
reason I appear to myself cw free in certain occurrences 
of my life, when these occurrences are the manifesta- 
tions of the independent power which falls to my share 
as an individual ; as restrained and limited, when, by 
any combination of outward circumstances, which may 
arise in time, but do not lie within the original limi- 
tations of my personality, I cannot do what my in- 



DOUBT. 33 

diTidual power would naturally, if unobstructed, be 
capable of doing ; aa compelled, when this individual 
power, by the superiority of antagonist powers, is 
compelled to manifest itself even in opposition to its 
own laws. 

Bestow consciousness on a tree, and let it grow, 
spread out its branches, and bring forth leaves and 
buds, blossoms and fruits, after its land, without hin- 
drance or obstruction: — it will perceive no limitation 
to its existence in being only a tree, and a tree of this 
particular species, and this particular individual of the 
species ; it will feel itself perfectly free, because, in all 
those manifestations, it will do nothing but what its 
nature requires ; and it will desire to do nothing else, 
because it can only desire what that nature requires. 
But let its growth be hindered by unfavourable weather, 
want of nourishment, or other causes, and it will feel 
itself limited and restrained, because an impulse which 
actually belongs to its nature is not satisfied. Bind 
its free waving boughs to a wall, force foreign branches 
on it by ingrafting, and it will feel itself compelled to 
one course of action ; its branches will grow, but not 
in the direction they would have taken if left to them- 
selves ; it vdU produce fruits, but not those which its 
own nature demands. In immediate consciousness, I 
appear to myself as free ; by reflection on the whole 
of Nature, I discover that freedom is absolutely im- 
possible ; the former must be subordinate to the latter, 
for it can only be explained by means of it. 



What high satis&ction do I enjoy through the sys- 
tem which my understanding has thus completed! 



34 BOOK I. 

What order, what firm connexion, what comprehensive 
supervision does it introduce into the whole &bric of 
my knowledge ! Consciousness is here no longer that 
stranger in Nature, whose connexion with existence is 
so incomprehensible ; it is native to it, and indeed one 
of its necessary manifestations. Nature rises gradually 
in the fiied series of her productions. In rude matter 
she is a simple existence ; in organized matter she re- 
turns within herself to internal activity ; in the plant, 
to produce form; in the animal, motion; — in man, 
as her highest masterpiece, she turns inwards that she 
may perceive and contemplate herself; in him she, as it 
were, doubles herself, and, from being mere existence, 
becomes existence and consciousness in one. 

How I am and must be conscious of my own being 
and of its determinations, is, in this connexion, easily 
perceived. My being and my knowledge have one 
common foundation, — my own nature. The living 
being within me, even because it is mine, is conscious 
of itself. Quite as conceivable is my consciousness of 
corporeal objects existing beyond myself The powers 
in whose manifestation my personality consists, — the 
formative — the self-moving — the thinking powers, — 
are not these same powers as they exist in Nature 
at large, but only a certain definite portion of them ; 
and that they are but such a portion, is because there 
are so many other existences beyond me. From the 
former, I can infer the latter ; from the limitation, the 
power which limits. Because I myself am not this or 
that, which yet belongs to the connected system of 
existence, it must exist beyond me ; — thus reasons the 
thinking principle within me. Of my own limitation, 
I am immediately conscious, because it is a part of my- 
self, and only by reason of it do I possess an actual 



DOUBT. 35 

existence ; my consciousness of the source of this limi- 
tation, — of tiiat which I myself am not, — is produced 
by the former, and arises out of it. 

Away, then, with those pretended influences and 
operations of outward things upon me, by means of 
which they are supposed to pour in upon me a know- 
ledge which is not in themselyes and cannot flow forth 
&om them. The ground upon which I assume the 
existence of something beyond myself, does not lie out 
of myself, but within me, in the limitation of my own 
personaUty. By means of this limitation, the thinking 
principle of Nature within me proceeds out of itself, 
and is able to survey itself as a whole, although, in 
each individual, from a different point of view. 

In the same way there arises within me the idea of 
other thinking beings like myself. I, or the thinking 
power of Ifature within me, possess some thoughts 
which seem to have developed themselves within myself 
as a particular form of Nature ; and others, which seem 
not to have so developed themselves. And so it is in 
reaKty. The former are my own, peculiar, individual 
contribution to the general circle of thought in Nature ; 
the latter are deduced from them, as what must surely 
have a place in that circle ; but, being only inferences 
so far as I am concerned, must find that place, not in 
me, but in other thinking beings: — hence I conclude 
that there are other thinking beings besides mjrself. 
In short. Nature, in me, becomes conscious of herself 
as a whole, but only by beginning with my own indivi- 
dual consciousness, and proceeding from thence to the 
consciousness of universal being by inference founded 
on the principle of causality ; — that is, she is conscious 
of the conditions under which alone such a form, such 



36 BOOK I. 

a motion, such a thought as that in which my person* 
ality consists, is possible. The principle of causality is 
the point of transition, from the particular within my- 
self, to the uniyersal which lies beyond mjrself ; and 
the distinguishing characteristic of these two lands of 
knowledge is this, that the one is immediate percep- 
tion, while the other is inference. 

In each individual, iN'ature beholds herself from a 
particular point of view. I call myself — /, and thee 
— thou; thou callest thyself — /, and me — thou; I lie 
beyond thee, as thou beyond me. Of what is vdthout 
me, I comprehend first those things which touch me 
most nearly; thou, those which touch thee most nearly ; 
— from these points we each proceed onwards to the 
next proximate; but we describe very diflferent paths, 
which may here and there intersect each other, but 
never run paralleL There is an infinite variety of 
possible individuals, and hence also an infinite variety 
of possible starting points of consciousness. This con- 
sciousness of all individuals taken together, constitutes 
the complete consciousness of the universe ; and there 
is no other, for only in the individual is there perfect 
precision and reality. 

The testimony of consciousness in every individual 
is altogether sure and trustworthy, if it be indeed the 
consciousness here described; for this consciousness 
developes itself out of the whole prescribed course of 
Nature. Nature, however, cannot contradict herself; 
wherever there is a conception, there must be a corre- 
sponding existence, for conceptions are only produced 
simultaneously with the production of the correspond- 
ing realities. To each individual his ovm particular con- 
sciousness is wholly detenmned, for it proceeds from 



DOUBT. 37 

his own nature : — no one can have other conceptions, 
or a greater or less degree of vitality in these concep- 
tions, than he actually has. The substance of his con- 
ceptions is determined by the position which he assumes 
in the universe; their clearness and vitaUty, by the 
higher or lower degree of efficiency manifested by the 
power of humanity in his person. Give to Nature the 
determination of one single element of a person, let it 
seem to be ever so trivial, — the course of a muscle, the 
turn of a hair, — ^and she could tell thee, had she a uni- 
versal consciousness, and were able to reply to thee, all 
the thoughts which could belong to this person during 
the whole period of his conscious existence. 

In this system also, the phenomenon of our con- 
sciousness which we call Will, becomes thoroughly in- 
telligible. A volition is the immediate consciousness 
of the activity of any of the powers of Nature within 
us. The immediate consciousness of an effort, — an 
aspiration of these powers which has not yet become a 
reahty because it is hemmed in by opposing powers, — 
is, in consciousness, inclination or desire ; the struggle 
of contending powers is irresolution ; the victory of 
one is the determination of the Will. If the power 
which strives after activity be only that which we have 
in common with the plant or the animal, there arises 
a division and degradation of our inward being ; the 
desire is unworthy of our rank in the order of things, 
and, according to a conmion use of language, may 
be called a low one. If this striving power be the 
whole undivided force of hxunanity, then is the de- 
sire worthy of our nature, and it may be called a 
higher one. The latter effort, considered absolutely, 
may be called a moral law. The activity of this latter 

D2 



38 BOOK I. 

is a virtuous Will, and the course of action resulting 
from it is virtue. The triumph of the former unasso- 
dated with the latter is vice ; such a triumph <A)et the 
latter, and despite its opposition, is crime. 

The pow^er which, on each individual occasion, proves 
triumphant, triumphs of necessity ; its superiority is 
determined by the whole connexion of the universe ; 
and hence by the same connexion is the vice or crime 
of each individual irrevocably determined. Give to 
Nature, once more, the course of a muscle, the turn of 
a hair, in any particular individual, and had she the 
power of universal thought, and could answer thee, she 
would be able to declare all the good and evil deeds of 
his life from the beginning to the end of it. But still 
virtue does not cease to be virtue, nor vice to be vice. 
The virtuous man is a noble product of nature ; the 
vicious, an ignoble and contemptible one: — although 
both are necessary results of the connected system of 
the universe. 

Repentance is the consciousness of the continued 
eflfort of humanity within me, even after it has been 
overcome, associated with the disagreeable sense of 
having been subdued ; a disquieting but still precious 
pledge of our nobler nature. From this consciousness 
of the frmdamental impulse of our nature, arises the 
sense which has been called ^ conscience,' and its greater 
or less strictness and susceptibility, down to the abso- 
lute want of it, in many individuals. The ignoble man 
is incapable of repentance, for in him humanity has at 
no time sufficient strength to contend with lower im- 
pulses. Reward and punishment are the natural con- 
sequences of virtue and vice for the production of new 
virtue and new vice. By frequent and important vie- 



DOUBT. 39 

tories, our peculiar power is extended and strengthened ; 
bj inaction or frequent defeat, it becomes eyer weaker 
and weaker. The ideas of guilt and accountability 
have no meaning but in external legislation* He only 
has incurred guilt, and must render an account of his 
crime, who compels society to employ artificial external 
force in order to restrain in him the activity of those 
impulses which are injurious to the general wel&re. 



My inquiry is closed, and my desire of knowledge 
satii^ed. I know what I am, and wherein the nature 
of my species consists. I am a manifestation, deter* 
mined by the whole sjrstem of the universe, of a power 
of Nature which is determined by itself. To under- 
stand thoroughly my particular personal being in its 
deepest sources is impossible, for I cannot penetrate 
into the innermost recesses of Nature. But I am im- 
mediately conscious of this my personal existence. I 
know right well what I am at the present moment ; 
I can for the most part remember what I have been 
formerly ; and I shall learn what I shall be, when what 
is now fiiture shall become present experience. 

I cannot indeed make use of this discovery in the 
regulation of my actions, for I do not truly act at all, 
but Nature acts in me ; and to make myself something 
else than that for which Nature has intended me, is 
what I cannot even propose to myself, for I am not 
the author of my own being, but Nature has made me 
myself, and all that I am. I may repent, and rejoice, 
and form good resolutions ; — although, strictly speak- 
ing, I cannot even do this, for all these things come 
to me of themselves, when it is appointed for them to 



40 BOOK I. 

do so ; — but- most certainly I cannot, by all my repent- 
ance, and by all my resolutions, produce the smallest 
change in tiiat which I must once for all inevitably 
become. I stand under the inexorable power of rigid 
Necessity : — should she have destined me to become a 
fool and a profligate, a fool and a profligate without 
doubt I shall become ; should she have destined me to 
be wise and good, wise and good I shall doubtless be. 
There is neither blame nor merit to her nor to me. 
She stands under her own laws, I under hers. I see 
this, and feel that my tranquillity would be best en- 
sured by subjecting my wishes idso to that Necessity 
to which my being is wholly subject. 



Oh these opposing wishes I For why should I any 
longer hide from myself the sadness, the horror, the 
amazement with which I was penetrated when I saw 
how my inquiry must end ? I had solemnly promised 
myself that my inclinations should have no influence 
in the direction of my thoughts ; and I have not know- 
ingly allowed them any such influence. But may I 
not al last confess that this result contradicts the pro- 
foundest aspirations, wishes, and wants of my being ? 
And, despite of the accuracy and the decisive strictness 
of the proofe by which it seems to be supported, how 
can I truly believe in a theory of my being which 
strikes at the very root of that being, which so distinctly 
contradicts all the purposes for which alone I live and 
without which I should loathe my existence ? 

Why must my heart mourn at, and be lacerated by, 
that which so perfectly satisfies my understanding? 
While nothing in Nature contradicts itself, is man alone 



DOUBT. 41 

a contradiction? Or perhaps not man in general, but 
only me and those who resemble me ? Had I but been 
contented to remain amid the pleasant delusions that 
surrounded me, satisfied with the immediate conscious- 
ness of my existence, and never raised those questions 
concerning its foundation, the answer to which has 
caused me this misery! But if this answer be true, 
then I must of necessity have raised these questions : 
— I indeed raised them not, but the thinking nature 
within me raised them. I was destined to this misery, 
and I weep in vain the lost innocence of soul which 
can never return to me again. 



But courage I Let all else be lost, so that this at 
least remains I Merely for the sake of my wishes, did 
they lie ever so deep or seem ever so sacred, I can- 
not renounce what rests on incontrovertible evidence. 
But perhaps I may have erred in my investigation; 
— perhaps I may have only partially comprehended 
and imderstood the grounds upon which I had to pro- 
ceed. I ought to repeat the inquiry again from the 
opposite side, in order that I may at least possess a 
correct starting point. What is it, then, that I find so 
repugnant, so painftd, in the decision to which I have 
come ? What is it, which I desired to find in its place ? 
Let me before all things make clear to myself what are 
these inclinations to which I appeaL 

That I should be destined to be wise and good, or 
foolish and profligate, without power to change this 
destiny in aught, — in the former case having no merit, 
and in the latter incurring no guilt, — this it was that 
filled me with amazement and horror. The reference 



42 BOOK I. 

of my being, and of all the determinations of my being, 
to a cause (AJiJb of mysdfy — the manifestations of which 
were again determined by other causes external to 
itself, — this it was from which I so violently recoiled. 
The freedom which was not mine, but that of a foreign 
power without me, and even in that, only a limited, 
half freedom, — this it was which did not satisfy me. I 
myself, — that of which I am conscious as my own being 
and person, but which in this system appears only as 
the manifestation of a higher existence, — this " I" 
would be independent, — would be something, not by 
another or through another, but of myself, — and, as 
such, would be the final root of all my own determina- 
tions. The rank which in this system is assumed by 
an original power of Nature I would myself assume, 
with this difference, that the modes of my manifesta*- 
tions shall not be determined by any foreign power. I 
desire to possess an inward and peculiar power of mani- 
fold, infinite modes of manifestation, like those powers 
of Nature, and this power shall manifest itself in the 
particular way in which it does manifest itself, for no 
other reason than because it does so manifest itself; 
not, like these powers of Nature, because it is placed 
under such or such outward conditions. 

What then, according to my wish, shall be the 
especial seat and centre of this peculiar inward power? 
Evidently not my body, for that I willingly allow to 
pass for a manifestation of the powers of Nature, — -at 
least so far as its constitution is concerned, if not with 
regard to its farther determinations; not my sensual 
inclinations, for these I regard as a relation of those 
powers to my consciousness. Hence it must be my 
thought and will. I would exercise my voluntary power 



DOUBT. 43 

freely, for the accomplishment of aims which I shall 
have freely adopted ; and this will, as its own ultimate 
ground which can be determined by no higher, shall 
move and mould, first my own body, and through it 
the surrounding world. My active powers shall be 
imder the control of my will alone, and shall be set 
in motion by nothing else than by it. Thus it shaU 
be. There shall be a Supreme Good in the spiritual 
world ; I shall have the power to seek this with free- 
dom until I find it, to acknowledge it as such when 
found, and it shall be my fault if I do not find it. This 
Supreme Good I shall will to know, merely because I 
will it ; and if I will anytlung else instead of it, the 
fault shall be mine. My actions shall be the result 
of this will, and without it there shall absolutely no 
action of mine ensue, since there shall be no other 
power over my actions, but this wilL Then shall my 
powers, determined by, and subject to the dominion 
of, my will, invade the external world. I will be the 
lord of Nature, and she shall be my servant. I will 
influence her according to the measure of my capacity, 
but she shall have no influence on me. 



This, then, is the substance of my wishes and as- 
pirations. But the system, which has satisfied my 
understanding, has wholly repudiated these. Accord- 
ing to the one, I am wholly independent of Nature 
and of any law which I do not impose upon myself; 
according to the other, I am but a strictly determined 
link in the chain of Nature. Whether such a freedom 
as I have desired be at all conceivable, and, if so, 
whether there be not grounds which, on complete and 



44 BOOK I. 

thorough inyestigation, may compel me to accept it 
as a reality, and to ascribe it to myself, and whereby 
the result of my former conclusions might thus be 
refuted ; — this is now the question. 

To be &ee, in the sense stated, means that I myself 
will make mjrself whatever I am to be. I must then, — 
and this is what is most surprising, and, at first sight, 
absurd in the idea, — I must already be, in a certain 
sense, that which I shall become, in order to be able 
to become so ; I must possess a two-fold being, of which 
the first shaQ contain the fundamental determining 
principle of the second. If I interrogate my immediate 
self-consciousness on this matter, I find the following. 
I have the knowledge of various possible courses of 
action, &om amongst which, as it appears to me, I 
can choose which I please. I run tlu:ough the whole 
circle, enlarge it, examine the various courses, compare 
one with another, and consider. I at length decide 
upon one, determine my will in accordance with it, 
and this resolution of my will is followed by a corre- 
sponding action. Here then, certainly, I am beforehand, 
in the mere conception of my purpose, what subse- 
quently, by means of this conception, I am in wiU and 
in action. I am as a thinking, what I afterwards am 
as an active, being. I create myself: — my being by 
my thought, my thought by previous thought. One 
can conceive the determinate state of a manifestation 
of the mere powers of Nature, of a plant for instance, 
as preceded by an indeterminate state, in which, if left 
to itself, it might have assumed any one of an infinite 
variety of possible determinations. These manifold 
possibilities are certainly possibilities within it, founded 
in its own peculiar character, but they are not possi- 



DOUBT. 45 

bilities for it, because it is incapable of such an idea, 
and cannot choose or of itself put an end to this state 
of indecision : there must be external grounds by 
which it may be detennined to some one of those 
various possibihties to which it is unable to determine 
itself. This determination can have no previous ex- 
istence within it, for it is capable of but one mode of 
determination, that of real existence. Hence it was, 
that I formerly felt myself compelled to maintain that 
the manifestation of every power must receive its 
final determination from without. I, doubtless, only 
took cognizance of such powers as are incapable of 
consciousness, and manifest themselves merely in the 
outward world. To them the above assertion may be 
applied without the sUghtest limitation ; with respect 
to intelligences, the grounds of this assertion are not 
admissible, and it appears, therefore, rash to extend 
it to them. 

Freedom, such as I have laid claim to, is. conceivable 
only of intelligences; but to them, undoubtedly, it 
belongs. Under this supposition, man, as well as 
nature, is perfectly comprehensible. My body, and my 
capacity of operating in the world of sense, are, as in 
the former system, manifestations of certain limited 
powers of Nature ; and my natural inclinations are the 
relations of these manifestations to my consciousness. 
The mere knowledge of what exists independently of me 
arises under this supposition of freedom, precisely as 
in the former system ; and up to this point, both agree. 
But according to the former, — and here begins the 
opposition between these systems, — according to the 
former, my capacity of physical activity remains under 
the dominion of Nature, and is constantly set in motion 

E 



46 BC>0«I. 

bj the same pow^r widdi prddueed it, and thoogilit 
has here nothixig whateTer to do but to loc^ on; ae* 
cording to the latto", thia csfe^ty, once brought into 
ezistenoe, taik ujoder the dominion of a power superior 
to Nature, and wholly indeineBdeiit of her kws, — tho 
power of design and o£ wilL Thoogbt ib no loiter 
the mere &cvlt;y of obserratioai ; — it is the source of 
action itself. Lx the one case, it is forces, external 
and in'vifljihle to me, thait put asx end to my state of 
indecision, and limit my activity aa well as my iow 
mediate consdouBness of it-^that is, my will — 'to one 
point, just as the indeterminate activity of tiie plant 
is limited; — in the other, it is I myself, independent, 
and free from the infifience of all outward &rcest» who 
put an end to my state of indecision, and detfirm]be 
my own course, according to the biowledge I have 
freely attained of what is best 



Which, of these two opinions shall I adopt? Am I 
free and independent ?-^-^<xr am I nothii^ in myself, and 
merely the manifisstation of a foreign power? It is 
clear to me that neither of the two doctrines is suffi- 
ciently supported. For the first, there is no other 
recommendation than its mere conceivableness ; for 
the latter^ I extend a proposition which is perfectly 
true in its own place, beyond its proper and natural 
boundary. If intdligence be merely the manifestation 
of a power of Nature^ then I do quite right to extend 
this principle to it : but, whether it be so or not, is 
the rery question at issue ; and this question I must 
solve by deduction from other premises, not by a one- 
sided answer assumed at the very commencement of 



BOUBT« 47 

the inqnirj, from which I agam deduoe Ibat only 
which I mjself hare preTioudj plaeed ia it. in. Aart, 
ndlher of the two opinions fleems to be proved. 

As little caoi tiiis matter be detennined by immediate 
eonscioQsness. I can never beoome oonaeioafl eidier of 
the external powers, by ^riiidi, in the ffystem of nni- 
Tersal necessity^ I am detennined; nor of my own 
power, by which, in the eystem of freedom, I deter- 
mine myseE Thus, whidiever of the two opinioais I 
may accept, I stiU accept it without snffiei^it evidence, 
and simply on its own accomdt. 

The 'System of freedom satisfies my heart ; the op- 
posite system destroys and annihilates it. To stand, 
ooM and unmoved, amid the cnrreBit of events, apaanve 
mirror of fugitive and passing forma, -^ this existence 
is insupportable to me ; I scorn and detest it. I will 
lov^; — I will lose myself in sympathy ;— I will know 
the joy and the grief of life. I myself am the highest 
i^kjed of thitf sympathy; and the only mode in which 
I can aatifld^ its requirements is by my actions. I will 
do all for the best; — I will rejoice when I have done 
right, I will grieve when I have done wnmg ; and even 
this sorrow shall be sweet to me, for it is a mark of 
sympathy, — a |dLedge of friture amendment. In love 
only is life ; — without it is death and annihilation. 

But coldly and insolently does Ihe opposite system 
advance, and turn this love into a snockery. If I 
liaten to it, I am not, and I cannot act. The object 
of my deepest attachment is a phantom of the brain, — 
a palpable and gross dehision. JSTot I, but a fbreiga 
and to me wholly unknown power, acts in me; and 
it is a matter of indifference to me how this power 
unfolds itaelf. I stand abashed widi my warm affec^ 



48 BOOK I. 

tions, and my virtuous will, and blush for what I know 
to be best and purest in my nature, for the sake of 
which alone I would exist, as for a ridiculous folly. 
What is holiest in me is given as a prey to scorn. 

Doubtless it was the love of this love, an interest 
in this interest, that impelled me, unconsciously, before 
I entered upon this inquiry which has now perplexed 
and distracted me, to regard myself, without fiu-ther 
question, as &ee and independent ; doubtless it was this 
interest which has led me to carry out, even to convic- 
tion, an opinion which has nothing in its favour but 
its intelUgibihty, and the impossibility of proving its 
opposite; it was this interest which has hitherto re- 
strained me &om imdertaking to explain any fiirther, 
myself and my capacities. 

The opposite system, barren and heartless indeed, 
but exhaustless in its explanations, will explain even 
this desire for freedom, and this aversion to the con- 
trary doctrine. It explains everything which I can cite 
from my own consciousness against it, and as often as I 
say ' thus and thus is the case,' it repUes with the same 
cool indifference, " I say so too ; and I tell you besides 
why it must necessarily be so." " Thou standest," thus 
will it answer my complaints, " when thou speakest 
of thy heart, thy love, thy interest in this and that, 
at the point of immediate consciousness of thine own 
being, and thou hast confessed this already in asserting 
that thou thyself art the object of thy highest interest. 
Now it is abeady well known, and we have proved it 
above, that this thou for whom thou art so deeply 
interested, in so far as it is not an active power, is at 
least an impulse of thy individual inward nature ; it 
is well known that every impulse, as surely as it exists. 



DOUBT. 49 

Deturns on itself, and impefa itsdf to aethatf, flEnd it 
is iherefiDire oonoeiFftUle h&w tius iiBpube rniat aaai- 
€est itself in oonscioiEBiifiBB, as loire, hB intei?est ni firee 
indiTidital aaiinty. Oonldst thou •excbange tliis naflnrow 
poiflt of ^ew in cd&oonscioiiisiiest for the higher poei* 
tion in which tiioa jsacyeat graqp th/e 'omrevse, -widdi 
indeed thou haat pramieed dh^self to take, then it 
would beoome dlear to thee tioiat iP^at thou hast xanned 
thy lo¥e is not diy iov«, but a i&reign love,-*-^tiie m- 
terest ivhidi the origiiud power of KatiBine Tnantfesting 
itself za thoe taikes in ■maintsimag its own peculiaer •ex- 
istence. Do not then appeal again to thy lore; for even 
if that could prove anything besides, tte supposition 
here is wholly irregular and unjustifiable. Thau louest 
no€ liiyself, for, strictly spealdng, ihcu art n^; it m 
Nature in ti&ee wliich concemB hers^ for her own pre- 
Berva^aon. Thou hast admitted without dispute, diat 
although in the plant there exists a peculiar impttlBe 
to grow and derelope itself, the i^eeific activity of this 
nnpiilse jet depends upon forces lying beyond itself. 
Bestow for a moment conscioosneBs upon ihe phnt^ — 
and it will regard tins mstinet of growth with interest 
and love. Convince it by reasoning that lihis instinct 
is unable of itself to accomplish anything whatever, 
but that the measure of its manifestation is always 
determined by something out of itself, — and it will 
speak precisely as thou hast spoken; it will behave 
in a manner that may be pardoned in a plant, but 
which by no means beseems thee, who art a higher 
product of Nature, and capable of comprehending the 
universe." 

What can I answer to this representation ? Should 
I venture' to place myself at its point of view, upon 

E 2 



50 BOOK I. 

this boasted position from whence I may embrace the 
universe in my comprehension, doubtless I must blush 
and be silent. This, therefore, is the question, — 
whether I shall at once assume this position, or confine 
myself to the range of immediate self-consciousness ; 
whether love shall be made subject to knowledge, or 
knowledge to love. The latter stands in bad esteem 
among inteUigent people; — the former renders me 
indescribably miserable, by extinguishing my own per- 
sonal being within me. I cannot do the latter without 
appearing inconsiderate and foolish in my own esti- 
mation; — I cannot do the former without deliberately 
annihilating my own existence. 

I cannot remain in this state of indecision ; on the 
solution of this question depends my whole peace and 
dignity. As impossible is it for me to decide ; I have 
absolutely no ground of decision in favour of the one 
opinion or the other. 

Intolerable state of uncertainty and irresolution! 
Through the best and most courageous resolution of 
my life, I have been reduced to this I What power 
can deliver me from it ? — what power can deliver me 
from myself? 



BOOK SECOND. 



KNOWLEDGE. 



(53) 



BOOK II. 
KNOWLEDGE. 

Chagrin and anguish stung me to the heart. I cursed 
the returning day which called me back to an exist- 
ence whose truth and significance were now involved 
in doubt. I awoke in the night from unquiet dreams. 
I sought anxiously for a ray of Ught that might lead 
me out of these mazes of uncertainty. I sought, but 
only became more deeply entangled in the labyrinth. 

Once, at the hour of midnight, a wondrous shape 
appeared before me, and addressed me, — 

" Poor mortal," I heard it say, " thou heapest 
error upon error, and fanciest thyself wise. Thou 
tremblest before the phantoms which thou hast thyself 
toiled to create. Dare to become truly wise. I bring 
thee no new revelation. What I can teach thee thou 
already knowest, and thou hast but to recall it to thy 
remembrance. I cannot deceive thee ; for thou, thyself, 
wilt acknowledge me to be in the right ; and shouldst 
thou still be deceived, thou wilt be deceived by thy- 
self Take courage; — listen to me, and answer my 
questions." 

I took courage. " He appeals to my own under- 
standing. I wiU make the venture. He cannot force 
his own thoughts into my mind; the conclusion to 



5i BOOK II. 

which I shall come must be thought out by myself; 
the conviction which I shall accept must be my own 
creation. Speak, wonderfiil Spirit!" I exclaimed, 
" whatever thou art I Speak, and I will listen. Ques- 
tion me, and I will answer." 

The Spirit. Thou believest that these objects here, 
and those there, are actually present before thee, and 
out of thyself? 

/. Certainly I do. 

Spirit, And how dost thou know that they are ac- 
tually prea^it ? 

/. I see them ; I would £eel th^n were I to stretch 
ferth my hand ; I can hear the sounds th^ ^^uce ; 
they reveal themselves to me through all my sesises. 

Spirit. Indeed I Thou wilt perha|)8 by and by re- 
tract the assertion that ikoM seest^ feelest, and hearest 
these objects. For the presemt I will speak as tiiou 
dost, as if thou didst really, by means of thy sight, 
touch, and hearing, perceive the real escu^noe of ob- 
j«etai. But observe, it is only by iruMims of thy sight, 
toudi, and oth» external senses. Or is it not so? 
Dost thou perceive o&erwiae iban through thy senses ? 
and has an object any existence for &ee, otherwise 
than as thou seest, hearest it, &a ? 

/. By no means. 

Spirit. PeroeptiUe objects hmre, iJiere&re, an «xist- 
eoce for ihee, only in consequenoe of a particular de- 
temiinatioii of thy external senses : thy knowledge of 
ifaem is but a result of thy knowledlge of this detenni- 
nation of thy sight, touch, &c. Thy dedaxaiaon — 
' there aire otjiecta out of myself,' depends u|>oiii this 
oti&er — 'I«ee, hear, foel^ .«sul«oibrth'? 

L This jfl 2ny meaning. 



KNOWXADOE. S5 

Spaii. And how desk thoa know tken that ihovt 
aeeBt, hearesk, feelest? 

/. I do not uiderstaiid thee. Thy questions appear 
strange to nie« 

SpirU. I will make them more intelligible. Dost 
thou see thy sight, and feel thy touch, or hast thou 
yet a higher sense, through which thou perceivest thy 
external senses, and their deterzoinations I 

L By no means. I know immediately that I see 
and fed, and what I see and feel ; I know this while 
it is, and simply because it is, without the intery^ti0n 
of any other sense. It was on this account that thy 
question seemed strange to me, because it appeared to 
throw doubt on this immediate consdousaess. 

Spirit. That was not my intention : I desired only 
to induce thee to make this immediate consciouiaieBS 
dear to thyself. So thou hast an immediate consdous- 
ness of thy sight and touch? 

/. Yes. 

Spirit. Of iky sight and toudi, I said. Thou art, 
therefore, the subject seeing, feeling, &c.; and when 
thou art consdous of the sedng, feeling, &c., thou 
art conscious of a particular determination or modifiea« 
tion of ihyadf. 

L Unquestionably. 

Spirit. Thou hast a consdousness of thy seeii^, 
feeJing, &c., and thereby thou perceivest the object. 
Gouldst thou not percdve it without this consdous*' 
ness? Canst thou not recognise an object by si^t or 
hearing, without knowing that thou seest or hearest ? 

/. By no means. 

Spirit. The immediate consdousness of thyself, and 
of thy own determinations, is, therefinre, the imperatiye 



56 BOOK n. 

condition of all other consciousness ; and thou know- 
est a thing, only in so far as thou knowest that thou 
knowest it : no element can enter into the latter cog- 
nition which is not contained in the fonner. Thou 
canst not know anything, without knowing that thou 
knowest it ? 

/. I think so. 

Spirit. Therefore thou knowest of the existence- of 
objects only by means of seeing, feeling them, &c. ; 
and thou knowest that thou seest and feelest, only by 
means of an immediate consciousness of this knowledge. 
What thou dost not perceive immediately, thou dost 
not perceive at all. 

/. I see that it is so. 

Spirit. In all perception, thou perceivest in the first 
place only thyself and thine own condition ; whatever 
is not contained in this perception, is not perceived at 

an? 

/. Thou repeatest what I have already admitted. 

Spirit. I would not weary of repeating it in all its 
applications, if I thought that thou hadst not tho- 
roughly comprehended it, and indehbly impressed it on 
thy mind. Canst thou say, I am conscious of external 
objects ? 

/. By no means, if I speak accurately ; for the sight 
and touch by which I grasp these objects are not con- 
sciousness itself, but only that of which I am first and 
most immediately conscious. Strictly speaking, I can 
only say, that I am conscious of seeing and touching 
these objects. 

Spirit. Do not forget, then, what thou hast now 
clearly understood. In all perception thou perceivest 
only thine own condition. 



KNOWLEDGE. $7 

I will, howerer, continue to speak thy language, 
fldnce it is most &miliar to thee. Thou hast said that 
thou canst see, hear, and feel objects. How then, — 
that is, with what properties or attributes, — dost thou 
see or fed them ? 

J. I see that object red, this blue ; when I touch 
than, I £nd this smooth, that rough — this cold, that 
warm. 

Spirit. Thou knowest then what red, blue, smooth, 
rough, cold, and warm, really signify? 

/. Undoubtedly I do. 

Spirit. Wnt thou not describe it to me then i 

L It cannot be described. Look ! Direct thine eye 
towards that object: — what thou becomest conscious 
of through thy sight, I call red. Touch the sur&ce of 
this other object: — what thou feelest, I call smooth. 
In this way I have arrived at this knowledge, and 
there is no other way by which it can be acquired. 

Spirit. But can we not, at least firom some of these 
qualities known hj immediate sensation, deduce a 
knowledge of others differing from them? If, for in- 
stance, any one had seai red, green, yellow, but never 
a blue colour ; had tasted sour, sweet, salt, but never 
bitter, — would he not, by mere reflection and com- 
parison, be able to discover what is meant by blue or 
bitter, without having ever seen or tasted anything of 
the kind? 

/. Certainly not. What is matter of sensation can 
only be felt, it is not discoverable by thought ; it is no 
deduction, but a direct and immediate perception. 

Spirit, Strange I Thou boastest of a knowledge 
respecting which thou art unable to -tdl how thou hast 
attained it. For see, thou maintainest that thou canst 



58 BOOK 11. 

see one quality in an object, feel another, hear a third ; 
thou must, therefore, be able to distinguish sight firom 
touch, and both from hearing ? 

/. Without doubt. 

Spirit. Thou maintainest further, that thou secst 
this object red, that blue ; and feelest this smooth, that 
rough. Thou must therefore be able to distinguish 
red from blue, smooth from rough ? 

/. Without doubt. 

Spirit. And thou maintainest that thou hast not 
discovered this diflference by means of reflection and 
comparison of these sensations in thyself. But perhaps 
thou hast learnt, by comparing the red or blue colours, 
the smooth or rough surfaces of objects out of thyself, 
what thou shouldst feel in thyself as red or blue, smooth 
or rough ? 

/. This is impossible ; for my perception of objects 
proceeds from my perception of my own internal con- 
dition, and is determined by it, but not the contrary. 
I first distinguish objects by distinguishing my own 
states of being. I can learn that this particular sensa- 
tion is indicated by the wholly arbitrary sign, red; — 
and those by the signs, blue, smooth, rough ; but I 
cannot learn that the sensations themselves are distin- 
guished, nor how they are distinguished. That they 
are different, I know only by being conscious of myself, 
and being conscious of internal change. How they 
differ, I cannot describe ; but I know that they must 
differ as much as my self-consciousness differs ; and 
this difference of sensations is an immediate, and by 
no means an acquired, distinction. 

Spirit. Which thou canst make independently of all 
knowledge of the objects themselves? 



RNOWLEDQB. 59 

L Which I must make independently of such know- 
ledge, for this knowledge itself is dependent on that 
distinction. 

Spirit, Which is then given to thee immediately 
through mere self-consciousness ? 

/. In no other way. 

Spirit. But thou shouldst then content thyself with 
saying, — " I feel myself affected in the manner that I 
call red, blue, smooth, rough." Thou shouldst place 
these sensations in thyself alone, and not transfer 
them to an object lying entirely out of thyself, and 
declare the modifications of thyself to be properties of 
this object. 

Or, tell me, when thou belierest that thou seest an 
object red, orfeelest it smooth, dost thou really per- 
ceive anything more than that thou art affected in a 
certain manner ? 

/. From what has gone before, I have clearly seen, 
that I do not, in fiwt, perceive more than what thou 
sayest, and this transference of what is in me to some- 
thing out of myself, from which nevertheless I cannot 
refrain, now appears very strange to me. 

My sensations are in myself, not in the object, for I 
am myself and not the object ; I am conscious only of 
myself and of my own state, not of the state of the 
object. If there be a consciousness of the object, that 
consciousness is, certainly, neither sensation nor per- 
ception : — thus much \b clear. 



Spirit. Thou formest thy conclusions somewhat pre- 
cipitately. Let us consider this matter on all sides, so 
that I may be assured that thou wilt not again retract 
what thou hast now freely admitted. 



60 BOOK n. 

Is there then in the object, as ihou nsuallj oonceiyest 
of it, anything more thsui its red, colour, its smooth 
sur&ce, and so on; in short, anything besides those 
characteristic marks which thou obtainest through im- 
mediate sensation ? 

/. I beUeve that there is : besides these attributes 
there is yet the thing itself to which they belong ; the 
substratum which supports these attributes. 

Spirit. But through what sense dost thou perceire 
this substratum of these attributes i Dost thou see it, 
feel it, hear it ; or is there perhaps a special sense for 
its perception ? 

/, No. I think that I see and fed it. 

iS^nrit. Indeed! Let us examine this more closely. 
Art thou then ever conscious of thy sight in itself, or 
at all times only of determinate acts of sight ? 

/. I hare always a determinate sensation of sight. 

Spirit. And what is this determinate sensation of 
sight, with respect to that object there? 

/. That of red colour. 

Sptrii. And this red is something positive, a simple 
sensation, a specific state of thyself? 

/. This I have imderstood. 

S^jnrit. Thou shouldst therefore see the red in itself 
as simple, as a mathematical point, and thou dost see it 
only as such. In thee at least, as an affection of thy- 
self, it is obviously a simple, determinate state, without 
connexion with anything else, — which we can only de- 
scribe as a mathematical point. Or dost thou find it 
otherwise ? 

/. I must admit that such is the case. 

Spirit. But now thou spreadest this simple red over 
a broad sur&ce, which thou assuredly dost not see, since 



KNOWLBDQB. 61 

thou seest only a simple red. How dost thou obtain 
this surface ? 

/. It is certainly strange, — Yet, I believe that I 
have found the explanation. I do not indeed see the 
sui&cey but I fed it when I pass my hand over it. My 
sensation of sight remains the same during this process 
of feeling, and hence I extend the red colour over the 
whole surface which I fed while I continue to see the 
same red. 

Spirit. This might be so, didst thou really feel such 
a surface. But let us see whether that be possible. 
Thou dost not feel absolutely; thou feelest only thy 
feelings, and art only conscious of these ? 

/. Certainly. Each sensation is a determinate some- 
thing. I never merely see, or hear, or feel, in general, 
but my sensations are always definite; — ^red, green, blue 
colours, cold, warmth, smoothness, roughness, the sound 
of the violin, the voice of man, and the ]Ske, — are seen, 
felt, or heard. Let that be settled between us. 

Spirit. Willingly. — Thus, when thou saidst that thou 
didst feel a surface, thou hadst only an immediate con- 
sciousness of feeling smooth, rough, or the like ? 

/. Certainly. 

Spirit. This smooth or rough is, Uke the red colour, 
a simple sensation, — a point in thee, the subject in 
which it abides ? And with the same right with which 
I formerly asked why thou didst spread a simple sensa- 
tion of sight over an imaginary surface, do I now ask 
why thou shouldst do the same with a simple sensation 
of touch ? 

/. This smooth surface is perhaps not equally smooth 
in all points, but possesses in each a different degree 
of smoothness, only that I want the capacity of strictly 

F 2 



62 BOOK n. 

distmguishing these degrees irom each other, and lan- 
guage whereby to retain and express their differences. 
Yet I do distinguish them, unconsciously, and place 
them side by side ; and thus I form the conception of 
a surface. 

S^rit. But canst thou, in the same undivided mo- 
ment of time, hare sensations of opposite kinds^ or be 
affected at the same time in different ways ? 

/. By no means. 

Spirit. Those different degrees of smoothness, which 
thou wouldst assume in order to explain what thou 
canst not explain, are nevertheless, in so far as they 
are different from each other, mere opposite sensations 
which succeed each other in thee ? 

/. I cannot deny this. 

Spirit. Thou shouldst therefore describe them as 
thou really findest them, — as successive changes of the 
same maUiematical point, such as thou perceivest in 
other cases; and not as adjacent and simultaneous 
qualities of several points in one surface. 

/. I see this, and I find that nothing is explained 
by my assumption. But my hand, with which I touch 
the object, and cover it, is itself a surface; and by it I 
perceive the object to be a surface, and a greater one 
than my hand, since I can extend my hand several 
times upon it. 

Spirit. Thy hand is a surface ? How dost thou know 
that? How dost thou attain a consciousness of thy 
hand at all ? Is there any other way than either that 
thou by means of it feelest something else, in which 
case it is an instrument ; or that thou feelest itself by 
means of some other part of thy body, in which case 
it is an object ? 



KNOWLEDGE. 63 

/. No, there is no other. With my hand I fed some 
other definite object, or I feel my hand itself by means 
of some other pwrt of my body, I have no immediate, 
absolute consciousness of my hand, any more than of 
my sight or touch. 

Spirit. Let us, at present, consider only the case in 
which thy hand is an instrument, for this will de- 
termine the second case also. In this case there can 
be nothing more in the immediate perception than 
what belongs to sensation, — that whereby thou thyself, 
and here in particular thy hand, is conceived of as 
the subject tasting in the act of taste, feeling in the 
act of touch. Now, either thy sensation is single ; in 
which case I cannot see why thou shouldst extend this 
single sensation over a sentient surface, and not content 
thyself with a siQgle sentient point ; — or thy sensation 
is varied; and in this case, since the difierences must 
succeed each other, I again do not see why thou 
shouldst not conceive of these feelings as succeeding 
each other in the same point. That thy hand should 
appear to thee as a surface, is just as inexplicable as 
thy notion of a surface in general. Do not make use 
of the first in order to explain the second, until thou 
hast explained the first itself. The second case, in 
which thy hand, or whatever other member of thy body 
thou wilt, is itself the object of a sensation, may easily 
be explained by means of the first. Thou perceivest 
this member by means of another, which is then the 
sentient one. I ask the same question concerning this 
latter member that I asked concerning thy hand, and 
thou art as Uttle able to answer it as before. 

So it is with the surface of thy eyes, and with every 
other surface of thy body. It may very well be that 



64 BOOK n. 

the consciousness of an extension out of thyself, pro- 
ceeds from the consciousness of thine own extension 
as a material body, and is conditioned by it. But 
then thou must, in the first place, explain this ex- 
tension of thy material body. 

/. It is enough. I now perceive clearly that I 
neither see nor feel the superficial extension of the 
properties of bodies, nor apprehend it by any other 
sense. I see that it is my constant practice to extend 
oyer a surface, what neyertheless in sensation is but 
one point ; to represent as adjacent and simultaneous, 
what I ought to represent only as successive, since in 
mere sensation there is nothing simultaneous, but all 
is successive. I discover that I proceed in fisict ex- 
actly as the geometer does in the construction of his 
figures, extending points to lines, and lines to surfaces. 
I am astonished how I should have done this. 

Spirit. Thou dost more than this, and what is yet 
more strange. This surface which thou attributest to 
bodies, thou canst indeed neither see nor feel, nor per- 
ceive by any organ ; but it may be said, in a certain 
sense, that thou canst see the red colour upon it, or 
feel the smoothness. But thou addest something more 
even to this surface : thou extendest it to a soHd ma- 
thematical figure ; as by thy previous admission thou 
hast extended the line to a surface. Thou assumest a 
substantial interior existence of the body behind its 
surface. Tell me, canst thou then see, feel, or recog- 
nise by any sense, the actual presence of anything 
behind this surface 1 

L By no means: — the space behind the surface is 
impenetrable to my sight, touch, or any of my senses. 

Spirit. And yet thou dost assume the existence of 



KNOWLEDGE. 65 

such an interior subBtance^ which, nevertheleBS, thou 
canst not perceive ? 

/. I confess it, and my astonishment increases. 

Spirit, What then is this something which thou 
imaginest to be behind the surface ? 

/. Well — I suppose something similar to the sur- 
fece, — something tangible. 

S^rit* We must ascertain this more distinctly* Canst 
thou divide the mass of which thou imaginest the 
body to consist ? 

/. I can divide it to infinity; — I do not mean with 
instruments, but in thought. No possible part is the 
smallest, so that it cannot be again divided. 

Spirit. And in this division dost thou ever arrive 
at a portion of which thou canst suppose that it is no 
longer perceptible in itself to sight, touch, &c. ; — in 
itself I say, besides being imperceptible to thy own 
particular organs of sense? 

/. By no means. 

Spirit. Visible, perceptible absolutely? — or with cer- 
tain properties of colour, smoothness, roughness, and 
the like ? 

/. In the latter way. SToihing is visible or percep- 
tible absolutely, because there is no absolute sense of 
sight or touch. 

Spirit. Then thou dost but spread through the whole 
mass thy own sensibility, that which is already familiar 
to thee, — visibility as coloured, tangibility as rough, 
smooth, or the Vke ; and afler all it is this sensibility 
itself of which alone thou art sensible ? Or dost thou 
find it otherwise i 

L By no means : what thou sayest follows from 
what I have already understood and admitted. 



66 BOOK II. 

Spirit. And jet thou dost perceive nothing behind 
the surface, and hast perceived nothing there ? 

/. Were I to break through it, I should perceive 
something. 

Spirit. So much therefore thou knowest beforehand. 
And this infinite divisibihty, in which, as thou main- 
tainest, thou canst never arrive at anything absolutely 
imperceptible, thou hast never carried it out, nor canst 
thou do so ? 

/. I cannot carry it out. 

S^rit. To a sensation, therefore, which thou hast 
really had, thou addest in imagination another which 
thou hast not had ? 

Z I am sensible only of that which I attribute to 
the surfiu^e ; I am not sensible of what Ues behind it, 
and yet I assume the existence of something there 
which might be perceived. Yes, I must admit what 
thou sayest. 

Spirit. And the actual sensation is in part foimd to 
correspond with what thou hast thus prensupposed ? 

/. When I break through the surface of a body, I 
do indeed find beneath it something perceptible, as I 
pre-supposed. Yes, I must admit this also. 

Spirit. Partly, however, thou hast maintained that 
there is something beyond sensation, which cannot 
become apparent to any dctual perception. 

/. I maintain, that were I to divide a corporeal 
mass to infinity, I could never come to any part which 
is in itsdf imperceptible ; although I admit that I can 
never make tiie experiment, — can never practically 
carry out the division of a corporeal mass to infinity. 
Yes, I must agree with thee in this also. 

Spirit. Thus there is nothing remaining of the ob- 



KNOWLED&E. 67 

ject but what is perceptible, — what is a property or 
attribute; — this perceptibility thou eztendest through 
a continuous space which is divisible to infinity ; and 
the true substratum or supporter of the attributes of 
things which thou hast sought, is, therefore, only the 
space which is thus filled ? 

/. Although I cannot be satisfied with this, but feel 
that I must still suppose in the object something more 
than this perceptibility and the space which it fills, 
yet I cannot point out this something, and I must 
therefore confess that I have hitherto been unable to 
discover any substratum but space itself. 

Spirit. Always confess whatever thou perceivest to 
be true. The present obscurities will gradually be- 
come clear, and the unknown will be made known. 
Space itself, however, is not perceived ; and thou canst 
not understand how thou hast obtained this conception, 
or why thou extendest throughout it this property of 
perceptibility ? 

/. It is so. 

Spirit, As little dost thou understand how thou hast 
obtained even this conception of a perceptibility out 
of thyself, since thou really perceivest only thine own 
sensation in thyself, not as the property of an external 
thing, but as an affection of thine own being. 

/. So it is. I see clearly that I really perceive only 
my own state, and not the object ; that I neither see, 
feel, nor hear this object ; but that, on the contrary, 
precisely there where the object should be, all seeing, 
feeling, and so forth, comes to an end. 

But I have a presentiment. Sensations, as affections 
of myself^ have no extension whatever, but are simple 
states ; in their differences they are not contiguous to 



68 BOOK IL 

each other in space, but successire to eaeh other in 
time. Neyerthdess, I do extend them in space. May 
it not be.hj means of this extension, and simultaneously 
with it, that what is properly only my own feeUng or 
sensation becomes changed for me into a perceptible 
something out of myself; and may not this be the 
precise point at which there arises within me a con- 
sciousness of the external object? 

Spirit. This conjecture may be confirmed. But 
could we raise it immediately to a conviction, we should 
thereby attain to no complete insight, for this higher 
question would still remain to be answered, — How dost 
diou first come to extend sensation through space? 
Let OS then proceed at once to this question ; and let 
us propound it more generally — I have my reasons for 
doing so — in the following manner: — How is it, 
that, with thy consciousness, which is but an immediate 
consciousness of thyself, thou proceedest out of thyself; 
and to the sensation which thou dost perceive, super- 
addest an object perceived and perceptible, which yet 
thou dost not perceive? 



/. Sweet or bitter, firagrant or ill-scented, rough 
or smooth, cold or warm, — these quaHties, when ap- 
plied to things, signify whatever excites in me this or 
that taste, smell, or other sensation. It is the same 
with refi^)ect to sounds. A relation to myself ia al- 
ways indicated, and it never occurs to me that the 
sweet or bitter taste, the pleasant or unpleasant smell, 
lies in the thing itself; — it lies in me, and it only 
appears to be excited by the object It seems itideed 
to be otherwise with the sensations of sight, — with 



KNOWLEDGE. 69 

colours, for example, which may not be pm*e Bensa- 
tions, but a sort of intermediate affections ; yet when 
we consider it strictly, red, and the others, means 
nothing more than what produces in me a certain 
sensation of sight. This leads me to understand how 
it is that I attain to a knowledge of things out of 
myself. I am affected in a particular manner — this I 
know absolutely ; — this affection must have a founda- 
tion; this foundation is not in myself, and therefore 
must be out of myself; — thus I reason rapidly and 
unconsdously, and forthwith assume the existence of 
such a foundation,— namely, the object. This founda- 
tion must be one by which the particular affection in 
question may be explained; — I am affected in the 
manner which I call a sweet taste, the object must 
therefore be of a kind to excite a sweet taste, or more 
briefly, must itself be sweet. In this way I determine 
the character of the object. 

Spirit. There may be some truth in what thou say- 
est, although it is not the whole truth which might 
be said upon the subject. How this stands we shall 
undoubtedly discover in due time. Since, however, it 
cannot be denied that in other cases thou dost discover 
some truth by means of this principle of causality, — so 
I term the doctrine which thou hast just asserted, that 
everything (in this case thy affection) must have a 
foimdation or cause, — since this, I say, cannot be 
denied, it may not be superfluous to learn strictly to 
understand this procedure, and to make it perfectly 
dear to ourselves what it is thou really dost when thou 
adoptest it. Let us suppose, in the meantime, that 
thy statement is perfectly correct, that it is by an un- 
conscious act of reasoning, firom the effect to the cause, 

o 



70 BOOK II. 

that thou first comest to assume the existence of an 
outward object; — what then was it which thou wert 
here conscious of perceiving ? 

/. That I was aflfected in a certain manner. 

Spirit. But of an object, affecting thee in a certain 
manner, thou wert not conscious, at least not as a 
perception ? 

/. By no means. I have akeady admitted this. 

Spirit. Then, by the principle of causality, thou 
addest to a knowledge which thou hast, another which 
thou hast not ? 

/. Thy words are strange. 

Spirit. Perhaps I may succeed in removing this 
strangeness. But let my words appear to thee as they 
may. They ought only to lead thee to produce in 
thine own mind the same thought that I have produced 
in mine; not serve thee as a text-book which thou 
hast only to repeat. Once thou hast the thought itself 
firmly and clearly in thy grasp, then express it as thou 
wilt, and with as much variety as thou wilt, and be 
sure that thou wilt always express it well. 

How, and by what means, knowest thou of this 
affection of thyself? 

/. It would be difficult to answer thee in words : — 
Because my consciousness, as a subjective attribute, as 
the determination of my being in so &r as I am an 
intelligence, proceeds directly upon the existence of 
this affection as its object, as that of which I am con- 
scious, and is inseparably united with it; — because 
I am only possessed of consciousness at all in so far as 
I am cognisant of suxjh an affection ; — cognisant of it 
absolutely as I am cognisant of my own existence. 

Spirit. Thou hast therefore an organ, namely, con- 



KNOWLEDGE. 71 

sdousness itself, whereby thou perceivest such an affec- 
tion of thyself? 

/. Yes. 

Spirit, But an organ whereby thou perceivest the 
object itself thou hast not ? 

/. Since thou hast convinced me that I neither see 
nor feel the object itself, nor apprehend it by any ex- 
ternal sense, I find myself compelled to confess that 
I have no such organ. 

Spirit. Bethink thee well of this. It may be turned 
against thee that thou hast made me this admission. 
What then is an external sense at all, and how canst 
thou call it external, if it have no reference to any 
external object, and be not the organ whereby thou 
hast any knowledge of such ? 

/. I desire truth, and trouble myself little about 
what may be turned against me. I distinguish abso- 
lutely because I do distinguish them, green, sweet, 
red, smooth, bitter, fragrant, rough, ill-scented, the 
sound of a violin and of a trumpet. Among these 
sensations I place some in a certain relation of likeness 
to each other, although in other respects I distinguish 
them from each other; thus I find green and red, sweet 
and bitter, rough and smooth, &c., to have a certain 
relation of similarity to each other, and this similarity 
I feel to be respectively one of sight, taste, touch, &c. 
Sight, taste, and so forth, are not indeed in themselves 
actual sensations, for I never see or feel absolutely, as 
thou hast previously remarked, but always see red or 
green, taste sweet or bitter, &c. Sight, taste, and the 
like, are only higher definitions of actual sensations ; 
they are classes to which I refer these latter, not by 
arbitrary arrangement, but guided by the immediate 



72 BOOK H. 

sensation itself. I see in them therefore not external 
senses, but only particular definitions of £he objects 
of the inward sense, of my own states or affections. 
How they become external senses, or, more strictly 
speaking, how I come to regard £hem as such and 
so to name them, is now the question. I do not take 
back my admission that I have no organ for the object 
itself. 

S^rit, Tet thou speakest of objects as if thou didst 
really know of their existence, and hadst an organ for 
such knowledge ? 

/. Yes. 

Spirit. And this thou dost, according to thy pre- 
vious assumption, in consequence of the knowledge 
which thou really dost possess, and for which thou 
hast an organ, and on account of this knowledge ? 

/. It is so. 

Spirit Thy real knowledge, that of thy sensations 
or affections, is to thee like an imperfect knowledge, 
which, as thou sayest, requires to be completed by an- 
other. This other new knowledge thou conceivest and 
describest to thyself, — not as something which thou 
hast, for thou hast it not, — but as something which 
thou shouldst have, over and above thy actual know- 
ledge, if thou hadst an organ wherewith to apprehend 
it. " I know nothing indeed," thou seemest to say, " of 
things in themselves, but such things there must be; 
if I could but find them, they are to be found." Thou 
supposest another organ, which indeed is not thine, 
and this thou employest upon them, and thereby ap- 
prehendest them, — of course in thought only. Strictly 
speaking, thou hast no consdonsness of things, but 
only a consciousness (produced by a procession out of 



KNOWLEDGE. 73 

thy actual consciousness by means of the principle of 
causaUty) of a conscuyusness of things (such as ought to 
be, such as of necessity must be, although not accessible 
to thee); and now thou wilt perceive that, in the sup- 
position thou hast made, thou hast added to a know- 
ledge which thou hast, another which thou hast not. 

/. I must admit this. 

Spirit Henceforward let us call this second know- 
ledge, obtained by means of another, mediate, and 
the first immediate knowledge. A certain school has 
called this procedure which we have to some extent 
described above, a synthesis; by which we are to un- 
derstand not a con^neadon established between two ele- 
ments previously existing, but an an-nexion, and an 
addition of a wholly new element arising through this 
an-neanon, to another element previously existing in- 
dependently of such addition. 



Thus thou findest the first consciousness as soon as 
thou findest thy own existence, and thou dost not find 
the latter without the former ; the second consciousness 
is produced in thee by means of the first. 

/. But not successive to it in time ; for I am con- 
scious of external things at the very same undivided 
moment in which I become conscious of myself. 

Spirit. I did not speak of such a succession in time 
at all ; but I think that when thou reflectest upon that 
undivided consciousness of thyself and of the external 
object, distinguishest between them, and inquirest into 
their connexion, thou dost find that the latter can 
only be conceived of as conditioned by the former, and 

6 2 



74 BOOK II. 

as only possible on the supposition of its existence ; but 
not vice versa. 

I. So I find it to be ; and if that be aU thou wouldst 
say, I admit thy assertion, and have already admitted 
it. . 

Spirit. Thou engenderest, I say, this second con- 
sciousness; producest it by a real act of thy mind. 
Or dost thou find it otherwise ? 

/. I have surely admitted this already. I add to 
the consciousness which is simultaneous with that of 
my existence, another which I do not find in myself; 
I thus complete and double my actual consciousness, 
and this is certainly an act. But I am tempted to 
take back either my admission, or else the whole sup- 
position. I am perfectly conscious of the act of my 
njind when I form a general conception, or when in 
cases of doubt I choose one of the many possible modes 
of action which lie before me ; but of the act through 
which, according to thy assertion, I must produce the 
representation of an object out of myself, I am not 
conscious at all. 

Spirit. Do not be deceived. Of the act of thy mind 
thou canst become conscious only in so far as thou dost 
pass through a state of indetermination and indecision, 
of which thou wert likewise conscious, and to which 
this act puts an end. There is no such state of inde- 
cision in the case we have supposed ; the mind has no 
need to deliberate what object it shall superadd to its 
particular sensations, — it is done at once. We even 
find this distinction in philosophical phraseology. An 
act of the mind, of which we are conscious as such, 
is called Jreedom. An act, without consciousness of 
action, is called spontaneity. Remember that I by no 



KNOWLEDGE. 75 

means demand of thee an immediate consciousness of 
the act as such, but only that on subsequent reflection 
thou shouldst discover that there must have been an 
act. The higher question, what it is that prevents 
any such state of indecision, or any consciousness of 
our act, will undoubtedly be afterwards solved. 

This act of the mind is called thought; a word 
which I have hitherto employed with thy concurrence ; 
and it is said that thought takes place with spontaneity, 
in opposition to sensation which is mere receptivity. 
How is it then, that, in thy previous statement, thou 
addest in thought to the sensation which thou certainly 
hast, an object of which thou knowest nothing ? 

/. I assume that my sensation must have a cause, 
and then proceed further, — 

Spirit. Wilt thou not, in the first place, explain to 
me what is a cause ? 

/. I find a thing determined this way or that. I 
cannot rest satisfied with knowing that so it is; — it 
has become so, and that not by itself, but by means 
of a foreign power. This foreign power, that made it 
what it is, contains the cause, and the manifestation of 
that power, which did actually make it so, is the cause 
of this particular determination of the thing. That 
my sensation must have a cause, means that it is pro- 
duced within me by a foreign power. 

Spirit. This foreign power thou now addest in 
thought to the sensation of which thou art immediately 
conscious, and thus there arises in thee the presenta- 
tion of an object ? Well, — let it be so. 

Now observe ; if sensation must have a cause, then 
I admit the correctness of thy inference ; and I see 
with what perfect right thou assumest the existence of 



76 BOOK II. 

objects out of thyself, notwithstanding that thou neither 
knowest nor canst know aught of them. But how then 
dost thou know, and how dost thou propose to prove, 
that sensation must have a cause ? Or, in the general 
manner in which thou hast stated the proposition, why 
canst thou not rest satisfied to know that something 
is ? why must thou assume that it has become so, or 
that it has become so by means of a foreign power ? I 
remark that thou hast always only assumed this. 

/. I confess it. But I cannot do otherwise than 
think so. It seems as if I knew it immediately. 

Spirit. What this answer, "thou knowest it im- 
mediately," may signify, we shall see should we be 
brought back to it as the only possible one. We will 
however first try all other possible methods of ascer- 
taining the grounds of the assertion that ever)rthing 
must have a cause. 

Dost thou know this by immediate perception ? 

/. How could I ? since perception only declares that 
in me something is, according as my nature is deter- 
mined ; but never that it has become so ; still less that 
it has become so by means of a foreign power lying 
beyond all perception. 

Spirit, Or dost thou obtain this principle by gene- 
ralisation of thy observation of external things, the 
cause of which thou hast always discovered out of 
themselves; an observation which thou now appliest 
to thyself and to thine own condition ? 

/. Do not treat me like a child, and ascribe to me 
palpable absurdities. By the principle of causaUty I 
first arrive at a knowledge of things out of myself; 
how then can I again, by observation of these things, 
arrive at this principle itself. Shall the earth rest on 



KNOWLEDGE. 77 

the great elephant, and the great elephant again upon 
the earth? 

Spirit. Or is this principle a deduction from some 
other general truth ? 

/. Which again could be founded neither on im- 
mediate perception, nor in the observation of external 
things, and concerning the origin of which thou wouldst 
still raise other questions ! I might only possess this 
previous fundamental truth by inunediate knowledge. 
Better to say this at once of the principle of causaUty, 
and let thy conjectures rest. 

Spirit. Let it be so; — we then obtain, besides the 
first immediate knowledge, through sensible perception, 
of our own states, a second immediate knowledge con- 
cerning a general truth ? 

/. So it appears. 

Spirit. The particular knowledge now in question, 
namely, that thy affections or states must have a cause, 
is entirely independent of the knowledge of things ? 

/. Certainly, for the latter is obtained only by means 
of it. 

Spirit. And thou hast it absolutely in thyself? 

/. Absolutely, for only by means of it do I first 
proceed. out of myself. 

Spirit. Out of thyself therefore, and through thy- 
self, and through thine own immediate knowledge, 
thou prescribest laws to being and its relations ? 

/. Rightly considered, I prescribe laws only to my' 
own presentations of being and its relations, and it wUl 
be more correct to make use of this expression. 

Spirit. Be it so. Art thou then conscious of these 
laws in any other way than as thou dost act in ac- 
cordance with them ? 



78 BOOK II. 

7. My consdoiisness begins with the perception of my 
own state ; I connect directly therewith the presenta- 
tion of an object according to the principle of causality ; 
— ^both of these, the consciousness of my own state, and 
the presentation of an object, are inseparably united, 
there is no intervening consciousness between them, 
and this one undivided consciousness is preceded by no 
other. No, it is impossible that I should be conscious 
of this law before acting in accordance with it, or in 
any other way than by so acting. 

Spirit. Thou actest upon this law therefore without 
being conscious of it ; thou actest upon it immediately 
and absolutely. Yet thou didst but now declare thyself 
conscious of it, and didst express it as a general propo- 
sition. How hast thou arrived at this latter conscious- 
ness? 

7. Doubtless thus. I observe myself subsequently, 
and perceive that I have thus acted, and comprehend 
this ordinary course of procedure in a general law. 

Spirit. Thou canst therefore become conscious of 
this course of procedure ? 

7. Unquestionably. — I guess the object of these ques- 
tions. This is the above-mentioned second kind of 
immediate consciousness, that of my activity ; as the 
first is sensation, or the consciousness of my passivity. 

I^rit. Right. Thou mayest subsequently become 
conscious of thine own acts, by free observation of 
thyself and by reflection ; but it & not necessary that 
thou shouldst become so ; — thou dost not become im- 
mediately conscious of them at the moment of thy 
internal act. 

7. Yet I must be originally conscious of them, for 
I am immediately conscious of my presentation of the 



KNOWLEDGE. 79 

object at £he same moment that I am eonscioiis of the 
sensation. — I have found the solution; I am imme- 
diately conscious of my act, only not as such; but it 
moves before me as an objective reality. This con- 
sciousness is a consciousness of the object. Subse- 
quently by free reflection I may also become conscious 
of it as an act of my own mind. 

My immediate consciousness is composed of two ele- 
ments : — the consciousness of my passivity, %. e, sensa- 
tion, and of my activity in the production of an object 
according to the law of causality ; the latter conscious- 
ness connecting itself immediately with the former. 
My consciousness of the object is only a yet unrecog- 
nised consciouaneaa of my production of a presentation 
of an object. I am only cognisant of this production 
because I myself am the producer. And thus all con- 
sciousness is immediate, is but a consciousness of my- 
self, and therefore perfectly comprehensible. Am I in 
the right ? 

Spirit. Perfectly so ; but whence then the necessity 
and universality thou hast ascribed to thy principles; — 
in this case to the principle of causality? 

I. From the immediate feeling that I cannot act 
otherwise, as surely as I have reason; and that no 
other reasonable being can act otherwise, as surely as 
it is a reasonable being. My proposition, — " All that 
is contingent, such as in this case my sensation, must 
have a cause," — means the following : " / have at all 
times pre-supposed a cause, and every one who thinks 
will likewise he constrained to presuppose a cause." 

Spirit. Thou perceivest then that all knowledge is 
merely a knowledge of thyself; that thy consciousness 
never goes beyond thyself; and that what thou as- 



80 BOOK II. 

suinest to be a consciousness of the object is nothing 
but a consciousness of thine own supposition of an 
object, which, according to an inward kw of thought, 
thou dost necessarily make simultaneously with the 
sensation itself. 



I. Proceed boldly with thy inferences ; — I have not 
interrupted thee, I have even helped thee in the de- 
velopment of these conclusions. But now, seriously, 
I retract my whole previous position, that by means 
of the principle of causaKty I arrive at the knowledge 
of external things ; and I did indeed inwardly retract 
it as soon as it led us into serious error. 

In this way I could become conscious only of a mere 
power out of myself, and of this only as a conception 
of my own mind, just as for the explanation of mag- 
netic phenomena, I suppose a magnetic — or for the 
explanation of electrical phenomena, an electrical — 
power in Nature. 

The world to me does not appear such a mere 
thought, — the thought of a mere power. It is some- 
thing extended, something which is thoroughly tangi- 
ble, not, like a mere power, through its manifestations, 
but in itself; — it does not, like this, merely produce, 
it has quahties; — I am inwardly conscious of my ap- 
prehension of it, in a manner quite different from my 
consciousness of mere thought; — it appears to me as 
perception, although it has been proved that it cannot 
be such ; and it would be difficult for me to describe 
this kind of consciousness, and to .distinguish it from 
the other kinds of which we have spoken. 

Spirit, Thou must nevertheless attempt such a de- 



KNOWLBDOB. 81 

scription, otherwise I shall not understand thee, and 
we shall never arriye at clearness. 

I. I will attempt to open a way towards it. I be- 
seech thee, O Spirit I if thy organ of sight be like 
mine, to fix thine eye on the red object before us, to 
surrender thyself unreserredly to the impression pro- 
duced by it, and to forget meanwhile thy previous con- 
clusions; — and now tell me candidly what takes place 
in thy mind. 

Spirit. I can completely place myself in thy posi- 
tion; and it is no purpose of mine to disown any 
impression which has an actual existence. But tell 
me, what is the effect you anticipate ? 

7. Dost thou not perceive and apprehend at a single 
glance, the surface? — I say fAe mrfa4^y — does it not 
stand there present before tiiee, entire and at once? — 
art thou conscious, even in the most distant and obscure 
way, of this extension of a simple red point to a line, 
and of this line to a surfiuse, of which thou hast spoken? 
It is an after-thought to divide this sur&ce, and con- 
ceive of its points and lines. Wouldst ihou not, and 
would not every one who impartially observes himself, 
maintain and insist, notwithstanding thy former con- 
clusions, that he really 9afU) a surface of such or such 
a colour? 

Spirit. I admit all this; and on examining myself, 
I find that it is exactly so as thou hast described. 

But, in the first place, hast thou forgotten that it 
is not our object to relate to each other what presents 
itself in consciousness, as in a journal of the human 
mind, but to consider its various phenomena in their 
connexion, and to explain them by, and deduce them 

H 



82 BOOK II. 

from, each other ; and that consequently none of thine 
observations, which certainly cannot be denied, but 
which must be explained, can overturn any one of my 
just conclusions. 

/. I shall never lose sight of this. 

Spirit. Then do not, in the remarkable resemblance 
of this consciousness of bodies out of thyself, which yet 
thou canst not describe, to real perception, overlook the 
great difference nevertheless existing between them. 

7. I was about to mention this difference. Each 
indeed appears as an immediate, not as an acquired or 
produced consciousness. But sensation is conscious- 
ness of my own state. Not so the consciousness of 
the object itself, which has absolutely no reference to 
me. I know that it is, and this is all; it does not 
concern me. If, in the first case, I seem like a soft 
strain of music which is modulated now in this way 
now in that, in the other, I appear like a mirror before 
which objects pass by without causing the sUghtest 
change in it. 

This distinction however is in my fevour. Just so 
much the more do I seem to have a distinct conscious- 
ness of an existence out of myself entirely independent 
of the sense of my own state of being ; — of an existence 
out of myself, I say — ^for this differs altogether in kind 
from the consciousness of my own internal states. 

Spirit. Thou observest well; — but do not rush too 
hastily to a conclusion. If that whereon we have al- 
ready agreed remain true, and thou canst be imme- 
diately conscious of thyself only ; if the consciousness 
now in question be not a consciousness of thine own 
passivity, and still less a consciousness of thine own 
activity; — may it not then be an unrecognised con- 



KNOWLEDGE. , 83 

sciousness of thine own being ? — of thy being in so &r 
as thou art a knomng being, — an Intelligence ? 

J. I do not understand thee; but help me once 
more, for I wished to understand thee. 

Spirit. I must then demand thy whole attention, 
for I am here compelled to go deeper, and expatiate 
more widely, than ever. What art thoii ? 

J. To answer thy question in the most general way, 
— I am I, myself. 

Spirit. I am well satisfied with this answer. What 
dost thou mean when thou sayest " I "; — what lies in 
this conception, — and how dost thou attain it? 

7. On this point I can only make myself understood 
by contrast. External existence — the thing, is some- 
thing out of me, the cognitive being. In my own case, 
I am myself this cognitive being, one with the object 
of my cognition. As to my consciousness of the for- 
mer, there arises the question, — Since the thing cannot 
know itself, how can a knowledge of it arise? — how 
can a consciousness of the thing arise in me, since I 
myself am not the thing, nor any of its modes or 
forms, and all these modes and forms lie within the 
circle of its own being, and by no means in mine? 
How does the thing reach me ? What is the tie be- 
tween me, the subject, and the thing which is the 
object of my knowledge ? But as to my consciousness 
of myself, there can be no such question. In this case, 
I have my knowledge within myself, for I am intelli- 
gence. What I am, I know because I am it ; and that 
whereof I know inmiediately that I am it, that I am 
because I inmiediately know it. There is here no need 
of any tie between subject and object; my own na- 
ture is this tie. I am subject and object: — and this 



84 BOOK II. 

8ubfectH>bfect^ivity, this return of knowledge upon itself, 
is what I mean by the term " I," when I ddiberately 
attach a definite meaning to it. 

Spirit. Thus it is in £he identity of subject and 
object that £hy nature as an intelligence consists ? 

/. Yes. 

Spirit. Canst thou then comprehend the possibility 
of thy becoming conscious of this identity, which is 
neither subject nor object, but which lies at the foun- 
dation of both, and out of which both arise? 

I. By no means. It is the condition of all my con- 
sciousness, that the conscious being, and what he is 
conscious of, appear distinct and separate. I cannot 
ev^i conceive of any other consciousness. In the Yery 
act of recognising myself, I recognise myself as subject 
and object, both however being immediately bound up 
with each other. 

Spirit. Canst ihou become conscious of the moment 
in which this incomprehensible one separated itself into 
these two ? 

/. How can I, once my consciousness first becomes 
possible in and through iheir separation, — since it is 
my consciousness itself that thus separates them ? Be* 
yond consciousness itself there is no consciousness. 

Spirit. It is this separation, then, that thou neces- 
sarily recognisest in becoming conscious of thyself? 
In this thy very original being consists ? 

7. So it is. 

Spirit. And on what then is it founded ? 

/. I am intelligence, and have consciousness in my- 
self. This separation is the condition and result of 
consciousness. It has its foundation, therefore, in my- 
self, like consciousness. 



KNOWLEDGE. 85 

Spirit. Thou art intelligence, thou sayest, at least 
this is all that is now in question, and as such thou 
becomest an object to thyself. Thy knowledge, there- 
fore, in its objective capadty, presents itself before thy- 
self, i. e. before thy knowledge in its subjective capacity; 
and floats before it, although thou canst indeed never 
become conscious of such a presentation 1 

L So it is. 

Spirit. Canst thou not then adduce some more exact 
characteristics of the subjective and objective elements 
as they appear in consciousness ? 

7. The subjective appears to contain within itself 
the foundation of consciousness as regards its form, 
but by no means as regards its substance. That there 
is a consciousness, an inward perception and concep- 
tion, — of this the foundation lies in itself; but that 
precisely this or that is conceived, — in this it is de- 
pendent on the objective, with which it is conjoined, 
and by which it is borne along. The objective, on the 
contrary, contains the foundation of its being within 
itself; it is in and for itself, — it is, as it is, because it 
is. The subjective appears as the still and. passive 
mirror of the objective ; the latter floats before it. That 
the former should reflect images generally, lies in itself. 
That precisely this image and none other should be 
reflected, depends on the latter. 

Spirit The subjective, then, according to its es- 
sential nature, is precisely so constituted as thou hast 
previously described thy consciousness of an existence 
out of thyself to be ? 

7. It is true, and this agreement is remarkable. I 
begin to beheve it half credible, that out of the internal 
laws of my own consciousness may proceed even the 

H 2 



86 BOOK II. 

presentation of an existence out of myself, and inde- 
p^dent of me ; and that this presentation may at bot- 
tom be nothing more than the presentation of these 
laws themselves. 

Spirit. And why only half credible ? 

J. Because I do not yet see why precisely such a pre- 
sentation — a presentation of a mass extended through 
space — should arise. 

Spirit. Thou hast ahready seen that it is only thine 
own sensation which thou extendest through space; 
. and thou hast had some forebodings that it is by this 
extension in space alone that thy sensation becomes 
tranrformed for thee into something sensible. We have 
therefore only to do at present with space itself; and, 
to explain its origin in consciousness. 

/. So it is. 

Spirit. Let us then make the attempt. I know that 
thou canst not become conscious of thy intelligent ac- 
tivity as such, in so far as it remains attached originally 
' and unchangeably to unity ; — i. e. in the condition which 
begins with thy very being, and can never be destroyed 
without at the same time destrojdng that being. But 
thou canst become conscious of it in so far as it passes 
from one state of transition to another within the limits 
of this xmchangeable unity. When thou dost represent 
it to thyself in the performance of this function, how 
does it appear to thee — ^this internal spiritual activity ? 

7. My spiritual faculty appears as if in a state of 
internal motion, swiftly passing from one point to an- 
other; — in short, as an extended line. A definite 
tiiought makes a point in this line. 

Spirit. And why as an extended line ? 

/. Can I give a reason for that, beyond the circle of 



KNOWLEDGE. 87 

which I cannot go without at the same time over- 
stepping the limits of my own existence? It is so, 
absolutely. 

Spirit. Thus, then, does a particular act of thy con- 
sciousness appear to thee. But what shape then is 
assumed, not by thy produced, but by thy inherited, 
knowledge, of which all specific thought is but the 
revival and farther definition? — how does this present 
itself to thee ? Under what image does it appear ? 

/. Evidently as something in which one may draw 
lines and make points in all directions, namely, as 
space. 

Spirit. Now then, it will be entirely dear to thee, 
how that, which really proceeds fi*om thyself, may 
nevertheless appear to thee as an existence external to 
thyself, — nay, must necessarily appear so. 

Thou hast penetrated to the true source of the pre- 
sentation of things out of thyself. This presentation 
is not perception, for thou perceivest only thyself ;— as 
little is it thought, for things do not appear to thee 
as mere results of thought. It is an actual, and indeed 
absolute and immediate consciousness of an existence 
out of thyself, just as perception is an immediate con- 
sciousness of thine own condition. Do not permit thy- 
self to be p^lexed by sophists and half-philosophers ; 
things do not appear to thee through any representa- 
tion ; — of the thing that exists, and that can exist, thou 
art immediately conscious ;^-and there is no oth^ thing 
than that of which thou art conscious. Thou thyself 
art the thing ; thou thyself, by virtue of thy finitude — 
the innermost law of thy being — art thus presented 
before thyself, and projected out of thyself; and all 
that thou perceivest out of thyself is still — thyself only. 



88 BOOK II. 

This consciousness has been well named Intuition. 
In all consciousness I contemplate mjseV, for I am my- 
self: — to the subjective, conscious being, consciousness 
is self-contemplation. And the objective, that which 
is contemplated and of which I am conscious, is also 
myself, — the same self which contemplates, but now 
floating as an objective presentation before the sub- 
jective. In this respect, consciousness is an active re- 
trospect of my own intuitions ; an observation of myself 
from my own position ; a projection of myself out of 
myself by means of the only mode of action which is 
properly mine, — perception. I am a living faculty of 
vision. I see {consciousness) my own vision {the thing 
of which lam conscious.) 

Hence this object is also thoroughly transparent to 
thy mind's eye, because it is thy mind itself. Thou 
dividest, limitest, determinest, the possible forms of 
things, and the relations of these forms, previous to all 
perception. No wonder, — for in so doing thou dividest, 
limitest, and determinest thine own knowledge, which 
undoubtedly is sufficiently known to thee. Thus does 
a knowledge of things become possible. It is not in 
the things, and cannot proceed out of them. It pro- 
ceeds from thee, and is indeed thine own nature. 

There is no outward sense, for there is no outward 
perception. There is, however, an outward intuition ; — 
not of things, but this outward intuition — this know- 
ledge apparently external to the subjective being, and 
hovering before it, — is itself the thing, and there is no 
other. By means of this outward intuition are per- 
ception and sense regarded as external. It remains 
eternally true, for it is proved, — that I see or feel 
a surface, — but my sight or feeling is intuitive, and 



KNOWLEDGE. 89 

takes the shape of the sight or feeling of a sur&ce. 
Space, ^—iUuminated, transparent, palpable, penetrable 
space, — the purest image of my knowledge, is not seen, 
bat is an intuitive possession of my own mind ; in it 
even my feculty of vision itself is contained. The light 
is not out of, but in me, and I myself am the light. 
Thou hast already answered my question, " How .dost 
thou know of thy sensations, of thy seeing, feehng, 
&c. V by saying that thou hast an immediate know- 
ledge or consciousness of them. Now, perhaps, thou 
wilt be able to define more exactly this immediate con- 
sciousness of sensation. 

/. It must be a two-fold consciousness. Sensation 
is itself an immediate consciousness ; for I am sensible 
of my own sensation. But from this there arises no 
knowledge of outward existence, but only the feeling 
of my own state. I am however, originally, not merely 
a sensitive, but also an intuitive being ; not merely a 
practical being, but also an intelligence. I intuitively 
contemplate my sensation itself, and thus there arises 
from myself and my own nature, the cognition of an 
existence. Sensation becomes transformed into its own 
object; my affections, as red, smooth, and the like, 
into a something red, smooth, &c. out of myself; and 
this something, and my relative sensation, I intuitively 
contemplate in space, because the intuition itself is 
space. Thus does it become dear why I believe that 
I see or feel sur&ces, which, in fact, I neither see nor 
fed. I intuitivdy regard my own sensation of sight 
or touch, as the sight or touch of a surface. 

Spirit, Thou hast well understood me, or rather 
thyself. 



90 BOOK II. 

/. But now it is not at all by means of an inference, 
either recognised or unrecognised, from the principle 
of causality, that the thing is originated for me; it 
floats immediately before me, and is presented to my 
consciousness without any process of reasoning. I 
cannot say as I have formerly done, that perception 
becomes transformed into a something perceivable, for 
the perceivable, as such, has precedence in conscious- 
ness. It is not with an affection of myself, as red, 
smooth, or the like, that consciousness begins, but with 
a red, smooth object out of myself. 

Spirit. If, however, thou wert obliged to explain 
what is red, smooth, and the like, couldst thou possibly 
make any other reply than that it was that by which 
thou wert affected in a certain manner, that thou 
namest red, smooth, &c. ? 

/. Certainly not, — ^if you were to ask me, and I were 
to enter upon the question and attempt an explanation. 
But originally no one asks me the question, nor do I 
ask it of myself. I forget myself entirely, and lose 
myself in my intuition of the object ; become conscious, 
not of my own state, but only of an existence out of 
myself. Red, green, and the like, are properties of the 
thing ; it is red or green, and this is all. There can be 
no farther explanation, any more than there can be a 
farther explanation of these affections in me, on which 
we have already agreed. This is most obvious in the 
sensation of sight. Colour appears as something out 
of myself, and the common understanding of man, if 
left to itself, and without farther reflection, would 
scarcely be persuaded to describe red, green, &c. as 
that which excited within him a specific affection. 

Spirit, But, doubtless, it would if asked regarding 



KNOWLEDGE. 91 

sweet or sour. It is not our business at present to 
inquire whether the impression made by means of sight 
be a pure sensation, or whether it may not rather be a 
middle term between sensation and intuition, . and the 
bond by which they are united in our minds. But I 
admit thy assertion, and it is extremely welcome to 
me. Thou canst, indeed, lose thyself in the intuition; 
and imless thou directest particular attention to thy- 
self, or takest an interest in some external action, thou 
dost so, naturally and necessarily. This is the remark 
to which the defenders of a groundless consciousness 
of external things appeal, when it is shown that the 
principle of causaUty, by which the existence of such 
things might be inferred, exists only in ourselves; they 
deny that any such inference is made, and, in so far as 
they refer to actual consciousness in particular cases, 
this cannot be disputed. These same defenders, when 
the nature of intuition is explained to them from the 
laws of intelligence itself, themselyes draw this infer- 
ence anew, and never weary of repeating that there 
must be something external to us which compels us to 
this belief. 

/. Do not trouble thyself about them at present, 
but instruct me. I have no preconceived opinion, and 
seek for truth only. 

S^imit. Nevertheless, intuition necessarily proceeds 
from the perception of thine own state, although thou 
art not always clearly conscious of this perception, as 
thou hast already seen. Even in that consciousness 
in which thou losest thyself in the object, there is al- 
ways something which is only possible by means of an 
unrecognised reference to thyself, and close observation 
of thine own state. 



93 BOOK II. 

/. Conseqaentiijy at all times and places the con- 
scionsness of existence out of myseif most be accom- 
panied by an unobserved consciousness of myself? 

Spirit. Just so. 

/. The former being detennined through the latter, 
— as it actually is ? 

Spirit. This is my meaning. 

/. FroYC this to me, and I shall be satisfied. 

Spirit. Dost thou imagine only things in general as 
placed in space, or each of them individually as occu- 
pying a certain portion of space ? 

I. The latter, — each Idling has its determinate size. 

Spirit. And do different things occupy the same 
part of space? 

/. By no means; they exclude each other. They 
are beside, over or under, behind or before, each 
other ; — nearer to me, or fiirther from me. 

Spirit. And how dost thou come to this measure- 
ment and arrangement of them in space ? Is it by 
sensation ? 

/. How could that be, since space itself is no sen^ 
sation ? 

SIpirit. Or intuition? 

/. This cannot be. Intuition is immediate and in- 
jGdlible. What is contained in it does not appear as 
produced, and cannot deceive. But I concern myself 
to estimate, measure and deliberate upon the size' of 
an object, its distance, its position with respect to 
other objects ; and it is a truth known to every be- 
ginner, that we originally see all objects in the same 
line; that we learn to estimate their greater or lesser 
distances ; that the child attempts to grasp distant ob- 
jects as if they lay immediately before his eyes ; and 



KNOWLEDGB. 93 

that one bom blind who should suddenly receive 
sight would do the same. This conception of distances 
is therefore a judgment ;; — no intuition, but an ar- 
rangement of my different intuitions by means of the 
understanding. I may err in my estimate of the size, 
distance, &c. of an object; and the so-called optical 
deceptions are not deceptions of sight, but erroneous 
judgments formed concerning the size of the object, 
concerning the size of its different parts in relation to 
each other, and consequently concerning its true figure 
and its distance from me and from other objects. But 
it does really exist in space, as I contemplate it, and 
the colours which I see in it are likewise really seen by 
me ; — and here there is no deception. 

Spirit. And what then is the principle of this judg- 
ment, — to take the most distinct and easy case, — thy 
judgment of the proximity or distance of objects, — ► 
how dost thou estimate this distance ? 

/. Doubtless by the greater strength' or feebleness 
of impressions otherwise equal. I see before me two 
objects of the same red colour. The one whose colour 
I see more vividly, I regard as the nearer ; that whose 
colour seems to me fainter, as the more distant, and as 
so much the more distant as the colour seems fainter. 

Spirit. Thus thou dost estimate the distance ac- 
cording to the degree of strength or weakness in the 
sensation ; and this strength or weakness itself, — dost 
thou also estimate it ? 

/. Obviously only in so far as I take note of my own 
affections, and even of very shght differences in these. — 
Thou hast conquered I All consciousness of objects out 
of myself is determined by the clearness and exactitude 



94 BOOK II. 

of my consciousness of my own states, and in this con- 
sciousness there is always a conclusion drawn from the 
effect in myself to a cause out of myself. 

Spirit, Thou art quickly vanquished; and I must now 
myself carry forward, in thy place, the controversy 
against myself. My argument can only apply to those 
cases in which an actual and deliberate estimate of the 
size, distance, and position of objects takes place, and in 
which thou art conscious of making such an estimate. 
Thou wilt however admit that this is by no means the 
common case, and that for the most part thou rather 
becomest conscious of the size, distance, &c. of an ob- 
ject at the very same undivided moment in which thou 
becomest conscious of the object itself. 

/. When once we learn to estimate the distances of 
objects by the strength of the impression, the rapidity 
of this judgment is merely the consequence of its fre- 
quent exercise. I have learnt, by a lifelong experience; 
rapidly to observe the strength of the impression and 
thereby to estimate the distance. My present concep- 
tion is founded upon a combination, formerly made, 
of sensation, intuition, and previous judgments; al- 
though at the moment I am conscious only of the 
present conception. I no longer apprehend generally 
red, green, or the like, out of myself, but a red or a 
green at this, that, or the other distance; but this last 
addition is merely a renewal of a judgment formerly 
arrived at by deliberate reflection. 

Spirit. Has it not then, at length, become clear to 
thee whether thou discoverest the existence of things 
out of thyself by intuition, or by reasoning, or both, — 
and in how far by each of these ? 

/. Perfectly; and I believe that I have now attained 



KNOWLEDGE. 95 

the fiillest insight into the origin of my conceptions 
of objects out of myself. 

1. I am absolutely, because I am conscious of this 

/, — myself; and that partly as a practical 
being, partly as an intelligence. The first 
consciousness is Sensation, the second Intui- 
tion — unlimited space. 

2. I cannot comprehend the unlimited, for I am 

finite. I therefore set apart, in thought, a 
certain portion of universal space, and place the 
former in a certain relation to the latter. 

3. The measure of this limited portion of space is 

the extent of my own sensibility, according to 
a principle which may be thus expressed : — 
Whatever affects me in such or such a manner 
is to be placed, in space, in such or such rela- 
tions to the other things which affect me. 
The properties or attributes of the object proceed 
firom the perception of my own internal state; the 
space which it fills, from intuitive contemplation. By 
a process of thought, both are conjoined ; the former 
being added to the latter. It is, assuredly, as we 
have stated above ; — that which is merely a state or 
affection of myself, by being transferred or projected 
into space becomes an attribute of the object ; but it 
is so projected into space, not by intuition, but by 
thought, by measuring, regulating thought. Not that 
this act is to be regarded as an intellectual discovery 
or creation ; but only as a more exact definition, by 
means of thought, of something which is already given 
in sensation and intuition, independent of all thought. 
Spirit. Whatever affects me in such or such a man- 
ner is to be placed in such or such relations: — thus 



96 BOOK II. 

dost thou reason in definkig and arraiigmg objects in 
space. But does not the declaration that a thing affects 
thee in a certain manner, include the assumption that 
it affects thee generally 1 

L Undoubtedly. 

Spirit. And is any pres^itation of an external object 
possible, which is not in this manner limited and de- 
fined in space? 

/. No ; for no object exists in space generally, but 
each one in a determinate portion of space. 

Spirit. So that in feet, whether thou art conscious 
of it or not, ev^y external object is assumed by thee as 
affecting thyself, as certainly as it is assumed as filling 
a determinate portion of space ? 

I. That follows, certainly. 

Spirit. And what kind of presentation is that of an 
object affecting thyself? 

/. Evidently a thought; and indeed a thought found- 
ed on the principle of causahty already mentioned. I 
see now, still more clearly, that the consciousness of 
the object is engrafted on my self-consciousness in two 
ways, — partly by intuition, and partly by thought 
founded on the principle of causality. The object, 
however strange it may seem, is at once the immediate 
object of my consciousness, and the result of delibe- 
rate thought. 

Spirit. In different respects, however. Thou must 
be capable of being conscious of this thought of the 
object ? 

Z Doubtless ; although usually I am not so. 

Spirit. Therefore to thy passive state, thy affection, 
thou dost assume in thought an activity out of thy- 
self, such as thou hast above described in the case of 
thy thought according to the principle of causahty ? 



KNOWLEDGE. 97 

/. Yes. 

Spirit. And with the same meaning and the same 
validity as thou didst descrihe it above. Thou thinkest 
so once for all, and must think so; thou canst not 
alter it, and canst know nothing more than that thou 
dost think so ? - 

/. Nothing more. We have already investigated all 
this thoroughly. 

Spirit. I said, thou dost assume an object: — in so 
far as it is so assumed, it is a product of thy own 
thought only ? 

/. Certainly, for this foUows from the former. 

Spirit. And what now is this object which is thus 
assumed according to the principle of causality ? 

/. A power out of myself. 

Spirit. Which is neither revealed to thee by sen- 
sation nor by intuition ? 

/. No ; I always remain perfectly conscious that I 
do not perceive it immediately, but only by means of 
its manifestations; although I ascribe to it an exist- 
ence independent of myself I am affected, there must 
therefore be something that affects me, — such is my 
thought. 

Spirit. The object which is revealed to thee in in- 
tuition, and that which thou assumest by reasoning, 
are thus very different things. That which is actually 
and immediately present before thee, spread out in 
space, is the object of intuition; the internal force 
within it, which is not present before thee, but whose 
existence thou art only led to assert by a process of 
reasoning, is the object of the imderstanding. 

/. The internal force within it, saidst thou; — and 
now I bethink me, thou art right. I place this force 

I 2 



98 BOOK II. 

also in space^ and superadd it to the mass by which 
I regard space as filled. 

Spirit. And what then, according to thy Tiew, is the 
nature of the relation subsisting between this force 
and the mass? 

/. The mass, with its properties, is itself the result 
and manifestation of the inward force. This force has 
two modes of operation: — one whereby it maintains 
itself, a&d assumes this particular form in which it 
appears ; another upon me, by which it affects me in 
a particular manner. 

Spirit. Thou hast formerly sought for another sub- 
stratum for sensible attributes or qualities than the 
space which contains them; [something permanent 
amid the vicissitudes of perpetual change besides this 
space. 

/. Yes, and this permanent substratum is found. 
It is force itself. This remains for ever the same amid 
all change, and it is this which assumes and supports 
all sensible attributes or qualities. 

Spirit. Let us cast a glance back on all that we 
have now established. Thou feelest thyself in a certain 
state, affected in a certain maimer, which thou callest 
red, smooth, sweet, and so on. Of this thou know- 
est nothing, but simply that thou feelest, and feelest 
in this particular manner. Or dost thou know more 
than this ? Is there in mere sensation anything more 
than mere sensation ? 

/. No. 

Spirit. Farther, it is by thine own nature as an 
intelligence, that there is a space spread out before 
thee; — or dost thou know anything more than this 
concerning space ? 



KNOWLEDGE. 99 

/. By no means. 

Spirit. Between that state of simple sensation, and 
tliis space which is spread out before thee, there is 
not the smallest connexion except that they are both 
present in thy consciousness. Or dost thou perceive 
any other connexion between them ? 

/. I see none. 

Spirit, But thou art a thinking, as well as a sensi- 
tive and intuitive, being ; and yet neither dost thou 
know anything more of this matter, than that so thou 
art. Thou dost not merely feel thy sensible state, — 
thou canst also conceive of it in thought; but it affords 
thee no complete thought ; thou art compelled to add 
something to it, an external foimdation, a foreign power. 
Or dost thou know more of it than that thou dost so 
think, and that thou art compelled so to think ? 

/. I can know nothing more respecting it. I cannot 
proceed beyond my thought; for simply because I 
think it, does it become my thought, and &11 under 
the inevitable laws of my being. 

Spirit. Through this thought of thine, there first 
arises a ccmnexion between thy own state which thou 
feelest, and the space which thou dost intuitively con- 
template ; thou supposest that the latter contains the 
foundation of the former. Is it not so 1 

I. It is so. Thou hast clearly proved that I pro- 
duce this connexion in my consciousness by my own 
thought only, and that such a connexion is neither 
directly felt, nor intuitively perceived. But of any 
connexion beyond the limits of my consciousness I 
cannot speak ; I cannot even describe such a connexion 
in any manner of way ; for even in speaking of it I 
must be conscious of it ; and, since this consciousness 



100 BOOK II. 

can only be a thought, the connexion itself could be 
nothing more than a thought ; and this is precisely the 
same connexion which occurs in my ordinary natural 
consciousness, and no other. I cannot proceed a hair's- 
breadth beyond this consciousness, any more than I 
can spring out of myself. All attempts to conceive of 
an absolute connexion between things in themselves, 
and the lin itself, are but attempts to ignore our own 
thought, — a strange forgetfiilness of the undeniable 
fact that we can have no thought without having — 
thought it. A thing in itself is a thought; — this, 
namely, that there is a great thought, which yet no 
man has ever comprehended. 

iSpirit. From thee then I need fear no objection to 
the principle now established : — that our consciousness 
of things out of ourselves is absolutely nothing more 
than the product of our own presentative faculty, and 
that, with regard to external things, we can produce in 
this way nothing more than simply what we know, 
i.e. what is established, by means of our consciousness 
itself, as the result of our being possessed of conscious- 
ness generally, and of this particular determinate con- 
sciousness subject to such and such laws. 

/. I cannot refiite this. It is so. 

Spirit. Thou canst not then object to the bolder 
statement of the same proposition ; that in that which 
we call knowledge and observation of outward things, 
we at aU times recognise and observe ourselves only ; 
and that in all our consciousness we know of nothing 
whatever but of ourselves, and of our own determi- 
nate states. 

I say, thou wilt not be able to advance aught against 
this proposition; for if the external world generally 



KNOWLEDGE. 101 

arises for us only through our own consciousness, what 
is particular and multiform in this external world can 
arise in no other way ; and if the connexion between 
what is external to us and ourselyes is merely a con- 
nexion in our own thought, then is the connexion of 
the multi&.rious objects of the external world among 
themselves undoubtedly this and no other. As cleajrly 
as I have now pointed out to thee the origin of this 
system of objects beyond thyself and their relation 
to thee, could I also show thee the law according to 
which there arises an infinite multipKcity of such ob- 
jects, mutually connected, reciprocally determining each 
other with rigid necessity, and thus forming a com- 
plete world-system, as thou thyself hast well described 
it ; and I only spare myself this task because I find 
that thou hast dready admitted the conclusions for the 
sake of which alone I should have undertaken it. 

/. I see it all, and must assent to it. 

Spirit. And with this insight, mortal, be free, and 
fo^ ever released from the fear which has degraded 
and tormented thee ! Thou wilt no longer tremble at 
a necessity which exists only in thine own thought ; 
no longer fear to be crushed by things which are the 
product of thine own mind ; no longer place thyself, 
the thinking being, in the same okss with the thou^ts 
which proceed from thee. As long as thou couldst 
believe that a system of things, such as thou hast 
described, reaUy existed out of, and independently of, 
thee, and that thou thyself mightst be but a link in 
this chain, such a fear was well grounded. Now when 
thou hast seen that all this exists only in and through 
thyself, thou wilt doubtless no longer fear that which 
thou dost now recognise as thine own creation. 



102 BOOK II. 

It was from this fear only that I wished to set thee 
free. Thou art delivered from it, and I now leave thee 
to thyself. 

/. Stay, deceitful Spirit! Is this all the wisdom 
towards which thou hast directed my hopes, and dost 
thou boast that thou hast set me free? Thou hast 
set me free, it is true : — thou hast absolved me from 
all dependence ; for thou hast transformed myself, and 
everything around me on which I could possibly be 
dependent, into nothing. Thou hast abolished neces- 
sity by annihilating all existence. 

Spirit. Is the danger so great ? 

/. And thou canst jest I — According to thy system. 

Spirit. My system ? Whatever we have agreed upon, 
we have produced in common ; we have laboured to- 
gether, and thou hast understood everything as well 
as myself; — but it would be difficult for thee at pre- 
sent even to guess at my true and perfect mode of 
thought. 

/. Call thy thoughts by what name thou wilt ; by 
all that thou hast hitherto said, there is nothing, ab- 
solutely nothing but presentations, — modes of con- 
sciousness, and of consciousness only. But a presenta- 
tion is to me only the picture, the shadow of a reality ; 
in itself it cannot satisfy me, and has not the smallest 
worth. I might be content that this material world 
without me should vanish into a mere picture, or 
be dissolved into a shadow ; — I am not dependent on 
it : but according to thy previous reasoning, I myself 
disappear no less than it; I myself am transformed 
into a mere presentation, without meaning and without 
purpose. Or tell me, is it otherwise ? 



KNOWLEDGE. 103 

Spirit. I say nothing in my own name. Examine, 
— ^help thyself! 

/. I appear to myself as a body existing in space, 
with organs of sense and of action, as a physical force 
governed by a will. Of all this thou wilt say, as thou 
hast before said of objects out of myself, the thinking 
being, that it is a product of sensation, intuition, and 
thought combined. 

Spirit. Undoubtedly. I will even show thee, step 
by step, if thou desirest it, the laws according to which 
thou appearest to thyself in consciousness as an organic 
body, with such and such senses, — as a physical force, 
&c., and thou wilt be compelled to admit the truth 
of what I show thee. 

J. I foresee that result. As I have been compelled 
to admit that what I call sweet, red, hard, and so on, 
is nothing more than my own affection; and that only 
by intuition and thought it is transposed into space out 
of myself, and regarded as the property of something 
existing independently of me ; so shall I also be com- 
pelled to admit that this body, with all its organs, is 
nothing but a sensible manifestation, in a determinate 
portion of space, of myself the inward thinking being; 
— that /, the spiritual entity, the pure intelligence, 
and /, the bodily frame in the physical world, are one 
and the same, merely viewed from two different sides, 
and conceived of by two different faculties; — the first 
by pure thought, the second by external intuition. 

S^rit. This would certainly be the result of any 
inquiry that might be instituted. 

/. And this thinking, spiritual entity, this intelli- 
gence which by intuition is transformed into an earthly 
body, — what can even it be, according to these principles. 



104 BOOK II. 

but a product of my own thought, something which 
is so conceived of by me only because I am compelled 
to imagine its existence by virtue of a law to me wholly 
inconceivable, proceeding from nothing and tending 
to nothing. 

Spirit. It is possible. 

/. Thou becomest timid and wavering. It is not 
possible only : it is necessary, according to these prin- 
ciples. 

This perceiving, thinking, willing, intelligent entity, 
or whatever else thou mayest name that which pos- 
sesses the faculties of perception, thought, and so forth ; 
— that in which these feculties inhere, or in whatever 
other way thou mayest express this thought ; — how do 
I attain a knowledge of it ? Am I immediately con- 
scious of it ? How can I be ? It is only of actual 
and specific acts of perception, thought, will, &c., as 
of particular occurrences, that I am immediately con- 
scious ; not of the capacities through which they are 
performed, and still less of a being in whom these 
capacities inhere. I perceive, directly and intuitively, 
this specific thought which occupies me during the 
present moment, and other specific thoughts in other 
moments ; and here this inward intellectual intuition, this 
immediate consciousness, ends. This inward, intuitive 
thought, now becomes itself an object of thought ; but 
according to the laws under which alone I can think, it 
seems to me imperfect and incomplete, just as formerly 
the thought of my sensible states was but an imper- 
fect thought. As formerly to mere passivity I im- 
consdously superadded in thought an active element, 
so here to my determinate state {my dctucd thought or 
wM) I superadd a determinable element {an infinite, 



KNOWLEDGE. 105 

possible thought or wUl) simply because I must do so, 
and for the same reason, but without being conscious 
of this mental apposition. This manifold possible 
thought I fiirther comprehend as one definite whole ; — 
once more because I must do so, since I am unable to 
comprehend anything indefinite, — and thus I obtain 
the idea of a finite capacity of thougkty and — since this 
idea carries with it the notion of a something indepen- 
dent of the thought itself — of a being or entity which 
possesses this capacity. 

But, on higher principles, it may be made still more 
conceivable how this thinking being is produced by 
its own thought. Thought in general is genetic, as- 
suming the previous creation of an object immediately 
revealed, and occupying itself with the description of 
this object. Intuition gives the naked fact, and nothing 
more. Thought explains this fact, and unites it to 
another, not found in intuition, but produced purely 
by thought itself, from which it, the fact, proceeds. 
So here. I am conscious of a determinate thought; 
thus far, and no farther, does intuitive consciousness 
carry me. I think this determinate thought, that is, I 
bring it forth from an indeterminate, but determinable, 
possibility of thought. In this way I proceed with 
everything determinate which is presented in immediate 
consciousness, and thus arise for me all those series 
of capacities, and of beings possessing these capacities, 
whose existence I assume. 

Spirit. Even with respect to thyself, therefore, thou 
art conscious only that thou feelest, perceivest, or 
thinkest, in this or that determinate manner ? 

/. That /feel, / perceive, / think? — that I, as the 
efficient principle, produce the sensation, the intuition, 

K 



106 BOOK II. 

the thought? By no means! Not even so much as 
this have thy principles left me. 

Spirit. Possibly. 

/. Necessarily; — for see: AH that I know is my 
consciousness itself. All consciousness is either an 
immediate or a mediate consciousness. The first is self- 
consciousness ; the second, consciousness of that which 
is not myself. What I call /, is therefore absolutely 
nothing more than a certain modification of conscious- 
ness, which is called /, just because it is immediate, 
returning into itself and not directed outward. Since 
all other consciousness is possible only under the con- 
dition of this immediate consciousness, it is obvious 
that this consciousness which is called / must ac- 
company all my other conceptions, be necessarily con- 
tained in them, although not always clearly perceived 
by me, and that in each moment of my consciousness 
I must refer everything to this /, and not to the par- 
ticular thing out of myself thought of at the moment. 
In this way the / would at every moment vanish, and 
reappear ; and for every new conception a new I would 
arise, and this I would never signify anything more 
than not the thing. 

This scattered self-consciousness is now combined by 
thought, — by mere thought, I say — and presented in 
the imity of a supposed capacity of thought. Ac- 
cording to this supposition, all conceptions which are 
accompanied by the immediate consciousness already 
spoken of, must proceed from one and the same capa- 
city^ which inheres in one and the same entity ; and 
thus there arises for me the notion of the identity and 
personality of my J, and of an efficient and real power 
in this person, — necessarily a mere fiction, since this 



KNOWLEDGB. 107 

capacity and this entity are themselves only supposi- 
tions. 

Spirit. Thou reasonest correctly. 

L And thou hast pleasure in this! I may then 
indeed say " it is thought," — ^and yet I can scarcely 
say even this; — rather, strictly speaking, I ought to 
say " the thought appears that I feel, perceive, think," 
— but by no means that " I feel, perceive, think." The 
first only is fact ; the second is an imaginary addition 
to the fact. 

Spirit. It is well expressed. 

I. There is nothing enduring, either out of me, or in 
me, but only a ceaseless change. I know of no being, 
not even of my own. There is no being. I myself ab- 
solutely know not, and am not. Pictures are : — ^they are 
the only things which esdst, and they know of them- 
selves after the fashion of pictures: — pictures which 
float past without there being anything past which they 
float ; which, by means of like pictures, are connected 
with each other: — pictures without anything which 
is pictured in them, without significance and without 
aim. I myself am one of these pictures ; — nay, I am 
not even this, but merely a confused picture of the 
pictures. All reality is transformed into a strange 
dream, without a life which is dreamed of, and with- 
out a mind which dreams it; — into a dream which 
is woven together in a dream of itself. Intuition is 
the dream ; thought, — ^the source of all the being and 
all the reality which I imagine, of my own being, my 
own powers, and my own purposes, — is the dream of 
that dream. 

Spirit. Thou hast well understood it all. Employ the 
sharpest expressions to make this result hateful, if thou 



108 BOOK II. 

must submit to it. And this thou must do. Thou 
hast clearly seen that it caimot be otherwise. Or wilt 
thou retract thy admissioiis, and justify thy retracta- 
tion on principle ? 

/. By no means. I have seen, and now see clearly, 
that it is so ; yet I cannot believe it. 

Spirit, Thou seest it clearly, and yet canst not be- 
heve it ? That is a different matter. 

/. Thou art a profligate spirit : thy knowledge itself 
is profligacy, and springs from profligacy ; and I can- 
not thank thee for having led me on this path ! 



Spirit. Short-sighted mortal ! When men venture to 
look into being, and see as far as themselves, and a 
little further, — such as thou art call it profligacy. I 
have allowed thee to deduce the results of our inquiry 
in thine own way, to analyze them, and to clothe them 
in hateful expressions. Didst thou then think that 
these results were less known to me than to thyself, 
that I did not understand, as well as thou, how by 
these principles all reality was thoroughly annihilated, 
and transformed into a dream ? Didst thou then take 
me for a blind admirer and advocate of this system, 
as a complete system of the human mind ? 

Thou didst desire to know, and thou hadst taken a 
wrong road. Thou didst seek knowledge where no 
knowledge can reach, and hadst even persuaded thy- 
self that thou hadst obtained an insight into something 
which is opposed to the very nature of all insight. I 
found thee in this condition. I wished to free thee 



KNOWLEDGE. 109 

from thy false knowledge ; but by no means to bring 
thee the true. 

Thou didst desire to know of thy knowledge. Art 
thou surprised that in this way thou didst discover no- 
thing more than that of which thou desiredst to know, 
— ihy knowledge itself; and wouldst thou have had it 
otherwise ? What has its origin in and through know- 
ledge, is merely knowledge. AH knowledge, however, 
is but pictures, representations; and there is always 
something awanting in it, — that which corresponds 
to the representation. This want cannot be supplied 
by knowledge; a system of mere knowledge is ne- 
cessarily a system of mere pictures, wholly without 
reality, significance, or aim. Didst thou expect any- 
thing else ? Wouldst thou change the very nature of 
thy mind, and desire thy knowledge to be something 
more than knowledge ? 

The reality, in the perception of which thou didst 
formerly believe, — a material world already existing 
independently of thee, of which thou didst fear to be- 
come the slave, — has vanished ; for this whole material 
world arises only through knowledge, and is itself our 
knowledge ; — but knowledge is not reality, just because 
it is knowledge. Thou hast seen through the illusion ; 
and, without belying thy better insight, thou canst 
never again give thyself up to it. This is the sole 
merit which I claim for the system which we have to- 
gether discovered; — it destroys and annihilates error. 
It cannot give us truth, for it is in itself absolutely 
empty. Thou dost now seek, and with good right, as 
I well know, something real lying beyond mere ap- 

K 9 



110 BOOK II. KNOWLEDGE. 

pearance, another reality than that which is thus an- 
nihilated. But in vain wouldst thou labour to create 
this reality by means of thy knowledge, or out of thy 
knowledge; or to embrace it by thy understanding. If 
thou hast no other organ by which to apprehend it, it 
will nevCT be found by thee. 

But thou hast such an organ. Arouse and animate 
it, and thou wilt attain to perfect tranquillity. I leave 
thee alone with thyself. 



BOOK THIRD. 



FAITH. 



(113) 



BOOK III. 
FAITH. 

Terrible Spirit, thy discourse has smitten me to the 
ground. But thou referrest me to myself, and what 
were I, could anything out of myself irrecoverably cast 
me down? I will, — yes, surely I will follow thy 
counsel. 

What seekest thou, then, my complaining heart? 
What is it that excites thee against a system to which 
my understanding cannot raise the slightest objection ? 

This it is: — I demand something beyond a mere 
presentation or conception; something that is, has been, 
and will be, even if the presentation were not ; and 
which the presentation only records, without producing 
it, or in the smallest degree changing it. A mere pre- 
sentation I now see to be a deceptive show ; my pre- 
sentations must have a meaning beneath them, and if 
my entire knowledge revealed to me nothing but know- 
ledge, I would be defrauded of my whole life. That 
there is nothing whatever but my presentations or con- 
ceptions, is, to the natural sense of mankind, a silly and 
ridiculous conceit which no man can seriously enter- 
tain, and which requires no refiitation. To the better- 
informed judgment, which knows the deep, and, by 
mere reasoning, irrefragable grounds for this assertion, 
it is a prostrating, annihilating thought. 



114 BOOK III. 

And what is^ then^ this something lying beyond all 
presentation, towards which I stretch forward with 
such ardent longing? What is the power with which 
it draws me towards it ? What is the central point in 
my soul to which it is attached, and with which only 
it can be effaced ? 

" Not merely to know, but according to thy know- 
ledge TO DO, is thy vocation :" — thus is it loudly pro- 
claimed in tha innermost depths of my soul, as soon 
as I recollect myself for a moment, and turn my ob- 
servation upon myself. " Not for idle contemplation 
of thyself, not for brooding over devout sensations; — 
no, for action art thou here ; thine action, and thine 
action alone, determines thy worth." 

This voice leads me from presentation, from mere 
cognition, to something which lies beyond it, and is 
entirely opposed to it ; to something which is greater 
and higher than all knowledge, and which contains 
within itself the end and object of all knowledge. 
When I act, I doubtless know that I act, and how I 
act ; but this knowledge is not the act itself, but only 
the observation of it. This voice thus announces to 
me precisely that which I sought ; a something lying 
beyond mere knowledge, and, in its nature, wholly 
independent of it. 

Thus it is, I know it inunediately. But having once 
entered within the domain of speculation, the doubt 
which has been awakened within me, will secretly 
endure, and will continue to disturb me. Since I have 
placed myself in this position, I can obtain no complete 
satisfaction until everything which I accept is justified 
before the tribunal of speculation. I have thus to ask 
myself, — how is it thus? Whence arises that voice in 



FAITH, 115 

my soul which directs me to something beyond mere 
presentation and knowledge ? 

There is within me an impulse to absolute, inde- 
pendent self-activity. Nothing is more insupportable 
to me, than to be merely by another, for another, and 
through another ; I must be something for myself and 
by myself alone. This impulse I feel along with the 
perception of my own existence, it is inseparably imited 
to my consciousness of myself. 

I explain this feeling to myself, by reflection; and add 
to this blind impulse the power of sight, by thought. 
According to this impulse I must act as an absolutely 
independent being: — thus I understand and translate 
the impulse. I must be independent. Who am I? 
Subject and object in one, — the conscious being and 
that of which I am conscious, gifted with intuitive 
knowledge and myself revealed in that intuition, the 
thinking mind and myself the object of the thought — 
inseparable, and ever present to each other. As both, 
must I be what I am, absolutely by myself alone; — 
by myself originate conceptions, — by myself produce a 
condition of things lying beyond these conceptions. But 
how is the latter possible ? To nothing I cannot unite 
any being whatever; from nothing there can never 
arise something; my objective thought is necessarily 
mediative only. But any being which is imited to 
another being, does thereby, by means of this other 
being, become dependent ; — it is no longer a primary, 
original, and genetic, but only a secondary and derived 
being. I am constrained to unite myself to something; 
— to another being I cannot imite myself, without 
losing that independence which is the condition of my 
own existence. 



116 BOOK III. 

My conception and origination of a purpose, how- 
ever, is, by its very nature, absolutely free, — producing 
something out of nothing. To such a conception I 
must imite my activity, in order that it may be pos- 
sible to regard it as free, and as proceeding absolutely 
from myself alone. 

In the following manner, therefore, do I conceive of 
my independence as J. I ascribe to myself the power 
of originating a conception simply because I originate 
it, of originating this conception simply because I 
originate this one, — by the absolute sovereignty of my- 
self as an intelligence. I further ascribe to myself the 
power of manifesting this conception beyond itself by 
means of an action; — ascribe to myself a real, active 
power, capable of producing something beyond itself, 
— a power which is entirely different from the mere 
power of conception. These conceptions, which are 
called conceptions of design, or purposes, are not, Uke 
the conceptions of mere knowledge, copies of something 
already given, but rather types of something yet to be 
produced ; the real power lies beyond them, and is in 
itself independerd of them ; — ^it only receives from them 
its immediate determinations, which are apprehended 
by knowledge. Such an independent power it is that, 
in consequence of this impulse, I ascribe to myself. 

Here then, it appears, is the point to which the 
consciousness of all reahty unites itself; — the real 
efficiency of my conception, and the real power of 
action which, in consequence of it, I am compelled to 
ascribe to myself, is this point. Let it be as it may 
with the reaUty of a sensible world beyond me; I 
possess reality and comprehend it, — it Ues within my 
own being, it is native to myself 



FAITH. 117 

I conceive this, my real power of action, in thought, 
but I do not create it by thought. The immediate 
feeling of my impulse to independent activity lies at 
the foundation of this thought ; the thought does no 
more than pourtray this feeling, and accept it in its 
own form, — ^the form of thought. This procedure may, I 
think, be vindicated before the tribunal of speculation. 



What I Shall I, once more, knowingly and inten- 
tionally deceive myself? This procedure can by no 
means be justified before that strict tribunal. 

I feel within me an impulse and an effort towards 
outward activity; this appears to be true, and to be 
the only truth which belongs to the matter. Since it 
is I who feel this impulse, and since I cannot pass be- 
yond myself, either with my whole consciousness, or in 
particular with my capacity of sensation, — since this / 
itself is the last point at which I fed this impulse, there- 
fore it certainly appears to me as an impulse founded 
in myself, to an activity also founded in myself. Might 
it not be however that this impulse, although unper- 
ceived by me, is in reality the impulse of a foreign 
power invisible to me, and that notion of independence 
merely a delusion, arising from my sphere of vision 
being limited to myself alone? I have no reason to as- 
sume this, but just as little reason to deny it. I must 
confess that I absolutely know nothing, and can know 
nothing, about it. 

Do I then indeed fed that real power of free action, 
which, strangely enough, I ascribe to myself without 
knowing anything of it ? By no means; — it is merely 
the determinable element, which, by the well-known 

L 



118 BOOK III. 

laws of thought whereby all capacities and all powers 
arise, we are compelled to add in imagination to the 
determinate element — the real action, which itself is, 
in like manner, only an assumption. 

Is that procession, from the mere conception to an 
imaginary realization of it, anything more than the usual 
and well-known procedure of all objective thought, 
which always strives to be, not mere thought, but 
something more ? By what dishonesty can this pro- 
cedure be made of more value here than in any other 
case? — can it possess any deeper significance, when to 
the conception of a thought it adds a realization of this 
thought, than when to the conception of this table it 
adds an actual and present table ? " The conception 
of a purpose, a particular determination of events in 
me, appears in a double shape, — partly as sfobjective — 
a Thought; partly as objective — an Action." What 
reason, which would not unquestionably itself stand in 
need of a genetic deduction, could I adduce against 
this explanation? 

I say that I feel this impulse : — it is therefore I my- 
self who say so, and think so while I say it ? Do I then 
really feel, or only think that I feel ? Is not all which 
I call feeling only a presentation produced by my objec- 
tive process of thought, and indeed the first transition 
point of all objectivity ? And then again, do I really 
think, or do I merely think that I think? And do 
I think that I really think, or merely that I possess 
the idea of thinking? What can hinder speculation 
from raising such questions, and continuing to raise 
them without end? What can I answer, and where 
is there a point at which I can command such ques- 
tionings to cease ? I know, and must admit, that each 
definite act of consciousness may be made the subject 



FAITH. 119 

of reflection, and a new consdonsness of the first con- 
sciousness may thus be created ; and that thereby the 
immediate consciousness is raised a step higher, and 
the first consciousness darkened and made doubtful; 
and that to this ladder there is no highest step. I know 
that all scepticism rests upon this process, and that the 
system which has so violently prostrated me is founded 
on the adoption and the clear consciousness of it. 

I know that if I am not merely to play another per- 
plexing game with this system, but intend really and 
practically to adopt it, I must refuse obedience to that 
voice within me. I cannot tuiU to act, for according 
to that system I cannot know whether I can really act 
or not: — I can never believe that I truly act; that 
which seems to be my action must appear to me as 
entirely without meaning, as a mere delusive picture. 
All earnestness and all interest is withdrawn from my 
life; and life, as well as thought, is transformed into a 
mere play, which proceeds from nothing and tends to 
nothing. 

Shall I then refrise obedience to that inward voice i 
I will not do so. I will freely accept the vocation 
which this impulse assigns to me, and in this resolution 
I will lay hold at once of thought, in all its reality and 
truthfrdness, and on the reality of all things which are 
pre-supposed therein. I will restrict myself to the 
position of natural thought in which this impulse places 
me, and cast from me all those over-refined and subtile 
inquiries which alone could make me doubtful of its 
truth. 

I understand thee now, sublime Spirit 1 I have found 
the organ by which to apprehend this reality, and, with 
this, probably all other reality. Knowledge is not this 



120 BOOK III. 

organ : — no knowledge can be its own foundation, its 
own proof; every knowledge pre -supposes another 
higher knowledge on which it is founded, and to this 
ascent there is no end. It is Faith, that voluntary 
acquiescence in the view which is naturally presented 
to us, because only through this view we can fiilfil our 
vocation; — this it is, which first lends a sanction to 
knowledge, and raises to certainty and conviction that 
which without it might be mere delusion. It is not 
knowledge, but a resolution of the will to admit the 
validity of knowledge. 

Let me hold fest for ever by this doctrine, which is 
no mere verbal distinction, but a true and deep one, 
bearing with it the most important consequences for 
my whole existence and character. All my conviction is 
but faith; and it proceeds from the character, not from 
the understanding. Knowing this, I will enter upon 
no disputation, because I foresee that thereby nothing 
can be gained ; I will not suffer myself to be perplexed 
by it, for the source of my conviction lies higher than 
all disputation; I will not suffer myself to entertain 
the desire of pressing this conviction on others by 
reasoning, and I will not be surprised if such an un- 
dertaking should fail. I have adopted my mode of 
thinking first of all for myself, not for others, and be- 
fore myself only will I justify it. He who possesses 
the honest, upright purpose of whidi I am conscious, 
will also attain a similar conviction ; but without that, 
this conviction can in no way be attained. Now that 
I know this, I also know from what point all culture 
of myself and others must proceed ; from the will, not 
from the understanding. If the former be only fixedly 
and honestly directed towards the Good, the latter will 



FAITH. 121 

of itself apprehend the True. Should the latter only 
be exercised, whilst the former remains neglected, there 
can arise nothing whatever but a dexterity in groping 
after vain and empty refinements, throughout the ab- 
solute void inane. ]N'ow that I know this, I am able 
to confute aU false knowledge that may rise in opposi- 
tion to my faith. I know that every pretended truth, 
produced by mere speculative thought, and not founded 
upon faith, is assuredly &lse and surreptitious; for 
mere knowledge, thus produced, leads only to the con- 
viction that we can know nothing. I know that such 
fidse knowledge never can discover anything but what 
it has previously placed in its premises through faith, 
from which it probably draws conclusions which are 
wholly false. Now that I know this, I possess the 
touchstone of all truth and of all conviction. Con- 
science alone is the root of all truth: whatever is 
opposed to conscience, or stands in the way of the 
frdfilment of her behests, is assuredly false; and it is 
impossible for me to arrive at a conviction of its truth, 
even if I should be unable to discover the fallacies by 
which it is produced. 

So has it been with all men who have ever seen the 
light of this world. Without being conscious of it, 
they apprehend all the reality which has an existence 
for them, through faith alone ; and this faith forces it- 
self on them simultaneously with their existence; — it 
is bom with them. How could it be otherwise ? If 
in mere knowledge, in mere perception and reflection, 
there is no ground for regarding our mental presenta- 
tions as more than mere pictures which necessarily 
pass before our view, why do we yet regard all of them 
as more than this, and assume, as their foundation, 

L 2 



122 BOOK in. 

something which exists independently of all presenta- 
tion ? If we all possess the capacity and the instinct 
to proceed beyond our first natural view of things, why 
do so few actually go beyond it, and why do we even 
defend ourselves, with a sort of bitterness, from every 
motive by which others try to persuade us to this 
course ? What is it which holds us confined within this 
first natural beUef ? Not inferences of reason, for there 
are none such ; it is the interest we have in a reality 
which we desire to produce ; — the good, absolutely for 
its own sake, — the common and sensuous, for the sake 
of the enjoyment they afford. No one who lives can 
divest himself of this interest, and just as little can 
he cast off the feith which this interest brings with it. 
We are all bom in fidth; — he who is blind, follows 
blindly the secret and irresistible impulse; he who sees, 
follows by sight, and believes because he resolves to 
believe. 

What Tinity and completeness does this view pre- 
sent! — what dignity does it confer on himian nature ! 
Our thought is not founded on itself alone, indepen- 
dently of our impulses and affections ; — man does not 
consist of two independent and separate elements ; he 
is absolutely one. All our thought is founded on our 
impulses; — as a man's affections are, so is his know- 
ledge. These impulses compel us to a certain mode of 
thought only so long as we do not perceive the con- 
straint ; the constraint vanishes the moment it is per- 
ceived; and it is then no longer the impulse by itself, 
but we ourselves, according to our impulse, who form 
our own system of thought. 

But I shall open my eyes ; shall learn thoroughly to 



FAITH. 123 

know myself ; shall discover that constraint; — this is 
my vocation. I shall thus, and under that supposition 
I shall necessarily, form my own mode of thought. 
Then shall I stand absolutely independent, thoroughly 
equipt and perfected through my own act and deed. 
The primitive source of all my other thought and of 
my life itself, that from which everything proceeds 
which can have an existence in me, for me, or through 
me, the innermost spirit of my spirit, — is no longer a 
foreign power, but it is, in the strictest possible sense, 
the product of my own will. I am wholly my own 
creation. I might have followed blindly tibe leading 
of my spiritual nature. But I would not be a work of 
Nature but of myself, and I have become so even by 
means of this resolution. By endless subtilties I might 
have made the natural conviction of my own mind dark 
and doubtful. But I have accepted it with freedom, 
simply because I resolved to accept it. I have chosen 
the system which I have now adopted with settled 
purpose and dehberation from among other possible 
modes of thought, because I have recognised in it the 
only one consistent with my dignity and my vocation. 
With freedom and consciousness I have returned to 
the point at which Nature had left me. I accept that 
which she announces ; — but I do not accept it because 
I must ; I believe it because I will. 



The exalted vocation of my understanding fills me 
with reverence. It is no longer the deceptive mirror 
which reflects a series of empty pictures, proceeding 
from nothing and tending to nothing ; it is bestowed 
upon me for a great purpose. Its cultivation for this 



124 BOOK III. 

purpose is entrusted to me; it is placed in my hands, 
and at my hands it will be required. — It is placed in 
my hands. I know immediately, — and here my fiiith 
accepts the testimony of my consciousness without 
&rther criticism, — I know that I am not placed under 
the necessity of allowing my thoughts to float about 
without direction or purpose, but that I can voluntarily 
arouse and direct my attention to one object, turn it 
away again towards another ; — know that it is neither 
a blind necessity which compels me to a certain mode 
of thought, nor an empty chance which runs riot with 
my thoughts ; but that it is I who think, and that I 
can think of that whereof I determine to think. Thus 
by reflection I have discovered something more ; I have 
discovered that I myself, by my own act alone, produce 
my whole system of thought, and the particular view 
which I take of truth in general; since it remains with 
me either to deprive myself of all sense of truth by 
means of over-refinement, or to jdeld myself to this 
view with faithfiil obedience. My whole mode of 
thought, and the cultivation which my understanding 
receives, as well as the objects to which I direct it, 
depend entirely on myself. True insight is merit; — 
the perversion of my capacity for knowledge, thought- 
lessness, obscurity, error, and unbelief, are guilt. 

There is but one point towards which I have un- 
ceasingly to direct all my attention, — namely, what I 
ought to do, and how I may most suitably fulfil the 
obHgation which binds me to do it. All my thoughts 
must have a bearing on my actions, and must be cap- 
able of being considered as means, however remote, to 
this end; otherwise they are an idle and aimless show, 
a mere waste of time and strength, and the perversion 



FAITH. 125 

of a noble power, which is entrusted to me for a very 
diiferent end. 

I dare hope, I dare surely promise myself, to follow 
out this undertaking with good results. The Nature 
on which I have to act is not a foreign element, called 
into existence without reference to me, into which I 
cannot penetrate. It is moulded by my own laws of 
thought, and must be in harmoYiy with them ; it must 
be thoroughly transparent, knowable and penetrable 
to me, even to its inmost recesses. In all its pheno- 
mena it expresses nothing but the connexions and 
relations of my own being to myself, and as surely as 
I may hope to £now myself, so surely may I expect to 
comprehend it. Let me seek only that which I ought 
to seek, and I shall find ; let me ask only that which 
I ought to ask, and I shall receive an answer. 



I. 

That voice within my sold in which I believe, and 
on account of which I believe in every other thing to 
which I attach credence, does not merely command me 
to act in general. This is impossible ; all these general 
principles are formed only through my own voluntary 
observation and reflection, appUed to many individual 
facts ; but never in themselves express any fact what- 
ever. This voice of my conscience announces to me 
precisely what I ought to do, and what leave undone, 
in every particular situation of life ; it accompanies me, 
if I will but hsten to it with attention, through aU the 
events of my life, and never refiises me my reward 
where I am called upon to act. It carries with it im- 



126 BOOK in. 

mediate oonTiction, and irresistibly compels my assent 
to its behests: — it is impossible for me to contend 
against it. 

To listen to it, to obey it honestly and unreservedly, 
without fear or equivocation, — this is my true vocation, 
the whole end and purpose of my existence. My life 
ceases to be an empty play without truth or signifi- 
cance. There is something that must absolutely be 
done for its own sake alone; — that which conscience 
demands of me in this particular situation of life it is 
mine to do, for this only am I here ; — ^to know it, I have 
understanding ; to perform it, I have power. Through 
this edict of conscience alone, truth and reality are in- 
troduced into my conceptions. I cannot refuse them 
my attention and my obedience without thereby sur- 
rendering the very purpose of my own existence. 

Hence I cannot withhold my belief from the reality 
which they announce, without at the same time re- 
nouncing my vocation. It is absolutely true, without 
farther proof or confirmation, — nay, it is the first truth, 
and the foundation of aU other truth and certainty, 
that this voice must be obeyed ; and therefore every- 
thing becomes to me true and certain, the truth and 
certainty of which is assumed in the possibility of such 
an obedience. 

There appear before me in space, certain pheno- 
mena, to which I transfer the idea of myself; — I con- 
ceive of them as beings like myself. Speculation, when 
carried out to its last results, has indeed taught me, or 
would teach me, that these supposed rational beings 
out of myself are but the products of my own presen- 
tative power ; that, according to certain laws of my 
thought, I am compelled to represent out of myself my 



FAITH. 127 

conception of myself; and that, according to the same 
laws, I can only transfer this conception to certain 
definite intuitions. But the voice of my conscience thus 
speaks : — " Whatever these beings may be in and for 
themselves, thou shall act towards them as self-existent, 
free, substantive beings, wholly independent of thee. 
Assume it as already known, that they can give a pur- 
pose to their own being wholly by themselves, and quite 
independently of thee ; never interrupt the accomplish- 
ment of this purpose, but rather further it to the utmost 
of thy power. Honour their freedom, lovingly take 
up their purposes as if they were thine own." Thus 
ought I to act : — by this course of action ought all my 
thought to be guided, — nay, it shoM and must neces- 
sarily be so, if I have resolved to obey the voice of 
my conscience. I shall therefore always regard these 
beings as in possession of an existence for tiiemselves 
wholly independent of mine, as capable of forming and 
carrying out their own purposes ; — from this point of 
view, I shall never be able to regard them otherwise, 
and my previous speculations shall vanish from before 
me like an empty dream. — I think of them as beings 
like myself, I have said; but strictly speaking, it is 
not mere thought by which they are first presented to 
me as such. It is by the voice of my conscience, — the 
conmiand: — " Here set a limit to thy freedom; here 
recognise and reverence purposes which are not thine 
own." This it is which is first translated into the 
thought, " Here, certainly and truly, are beings like 
myself, free and independent." To view them other- 
wise, I must in action renounce, and in speculation 
disregard, the voice of my conscience. 

Other phenomena present themselves before me which 



128 BOOK III. 

I do not regard as beings like myself, but as things 
irrational. Speculation finds no difficulty in showing 
how the conception of such things is developed solely 
from my own presentative &culty, and its necessary 
modes of activity. But I apprehend these things, also, 
through want, desire, and enjoyment. Not by the 
mental conception, but by hunger, thirst, and their 
satis&ction, does anything become for me food and 
drink. I am necessitated to believe in the reality of 
that which threatens my sensuous existence, or in that 
which alone is able to maintain it. Conscience enters 
the field in order that it may at once sanctify and re- 
strain this natural impulse. '' Thou shalt maintain, ex- 
ercise, and strengthen thyself and thy physical powers, 
for they have been counted upon in the plans of reason. 
But thou canst only maintain them by using them in 
a legitimate manner, comformable to the inward nature 
of such things. There are also, besides thee, many other 
beings like thyself, whose powers have been counted 
upon like thine own, and can only be maintained in 
the same way as thine own. Concede to them the 
same privilege that has been allowed to thee. Respect 
what belongs to them, as their possession; — use what 
belongs to thee, legitimately as thine own." Thus 
ought I to act, — according to this course of action must 
I think. I am compelled to regard these things as 
standing under their own natural laws, independent 
of, though perceivable by, me; and therefore to ascribe 
to them an independent existence. I am compelled to 
believe in such laws ; the task of investigating them is 
set before me, and that empty speculation vanishes like 
a mist when the genial sun appears. 

In short, there is for me absolutely no such thing as 



FAITH. 129 

an existence which has no relation to myself, and 
which I contemplate merely for the sake of contem- 
plating it; — whatever has an existence for me, has it 
only through its relation to myself. But there is, in 
the highest sense, only one relation to me possible, all 
others are but subordinate forms of this: — my vocation 
to moral activity. My world is the object and sphere 
of my duties, and absolutely nothing more ; there is no 
other world for me, and no other qualities of my world 
than what are implied in this; — my whole united capa- 
city, all finite capacity, is insufficient to comprehend 
any other. Whatever possesses an existence for me, 
can bring its existence and reality into contact with 
me only through this relation, and only through this 
relation do I comprehend it : — for any other existence 
than this I have no organ whatever. 

To the question, whether, in deed and in fact, such 
a world exists as that which I represent to myself, I 
can give no answer more fundamental, more raised 
above all doubt, than this: — I have, most certainly 
and truly, these determinate duties, which announce 
themselves to me as duties towards certain objects, to 
be fulfilled by means of certain materials; — duties which 
I cannot otherwise contjeive of, and cannot otherwise 
fulfil, than within such a world as I represent to my- 
self. Even to one who had never meditated on his own 
moral vocation, if there could be such a one, or who, 
if he had given it some general consideration, had, at 
least, never entertained the slightest purpose of fulfil- 
ling it at any time within an indefinite futurity, — even 
for him, his sensuous world, and his belief in its reality, 
arises in no other manner than from his ideas of a mo- 
ral world. If he do not apprehend it by the thought 



130 BOOK III. 

of his daties, he certainly does so by the demand for 
his rights. What he perhaps never requires of himself, 
he does certainly exact from others in their conduct 
towards him, — that they should treat him with pro- 
priety, consideration, and respect, not as an irrational 
thing, but as a free and independent being ; — ^and thus, in 
supposing in them an ability to comply with his own de- 
mands, he is compelled also to regard them as themselves 
considerate, free, and independent of the dominion of 
mere natural power. Should he never propose to himself 
any other purpose in his use and enjoyment of surround- 
ing objects, but simply that of enjoying them, he at 
least demands this enjoyment as a right, in the posses- 
sion of which he must be left undisturbed by others; and 
thus he apprehends even the irrational world of sense, 
by means of a moral idea. These claims of respect for 
his rationality^ independence, and preservation, no one 
can resign who possesses a conscious existence; and 
with these claims, at least, there is united in his soul, 
earnestness, renunciation of doubt, and faith in a rea- 
lity, even if they be not associated with the recogni- 
tion of a moral law within him. Take the man who 
denies his own moral vocation, and thy existence, and 
the existence of a material world, except as a mere 
futile eifort in which speculation tries her strength, — 
approach him practically, introduce his own principles 
into hfe, and act as if either he had no existence at 
all, or were merely a portion of rude matter, — he will 
soon lay aside his scornfrj indiiference, and indignantly 
complain of thee ; earnestly call thy attention to thy 
conduct towards him ; maintain that thou oughtst not 
and darest not so to act ; and thus prove to thee, by 
deeds, that thou art assuredly capable of acting upon 



, FAITH. 131 

him; that he is, and that thou art, — ^that there is a me- 
dium by which thou canst influence him, and that 
thou, at least, hast duties to perform towards him. 

Thus, it is not the operation of supposed external 
objects, which indeed exist for us, and we for them, 
only in so far as we already know of them ; and just 
as little an empty vision evoked by our own imagina- 
tion and thought, the products of which must, like 
itself, be mere empty pictures ; — it is not these, but 
the necessary faith in our own freedom and power, in 
our own real activity and in the definite laws of human 
action, which lies at the root of all our consciousness of 
a reality external to ourselves ;— a consciousness which 
is itself but faith, since it is founded on another faith, 
of which however it is a necessary consequaMse. We 
are compelled to believe that we act, and that we ought 
to act in a certain manner; we are compelled to assume 
a certain sphere for this action; this sphere is the real, 
actually present world, such as we find it ; — and on the 
other hand, the world is absolutely nothing mose than 
this sphere, and cannot, in any other way, extend itself 
beyond it. From this necessity of action proceeds the 
consciousness of the actual world; and not the reverse 
way, from the consciousness of the actual world the 
necessity of action: — this, not that, is the first; the 
former is derived from the latter. We do not act be- 
cause we know, but we know because we are called 
upon to act: — the practical reason is the root of all 
reason. The laws of action for rational beings are im- 
mediately certain; their world is only certain through 
that previous certainty. We cannot deny these laws, 
without plunging the world, and ourselves with it, 
into absolute annihilation; — we raise ourselves from 



132 BOOK UI. 

this abyss, and maintain ourselYes above it, .solely by 
our moral activity. 



11. 

There is something which I am called upon to do, 
simply in order that it may be done; something to 
avoid doing, solely that it may be left undone. But can 
I act without having an end in view beyond the action 
itself, without directing my intention to something 
which can become possible through my action, and only 
through that ? Can I will, without having something 
which I will ? No : — this would entirely contradict the 
nature of my mind. To every action there is united 
in my thought, immediately and by the laws of thought 
itself, a condition of things placed in futurity, to which 
my action is related as the efficient cause to the effect 
produced. But this purpose or end of my action must 
not be given to me for its own sake, — perhaps through 
some necessity of Nature, — ^and then my course of action 
determined according to this end ; I must not have an 
end assigned to me, and then inquire how I must act 
in order to attain this end; my action must not be 
dependent on the end; but I must act in a certain 
manner, simply because I ought so to act ; — this is the 
first point. That a result will follow &om this course 
of action, is proclaimed by the voice within me. This 
result necessarily becomes an end to me, since I am 
bound to perform the action which brings it, and it 
alone, to pass. I will that something shall come to 
pass, because I must act so that it may come to pass ; — 
thus &s I do not hunger because food is before me, but 
a thing becomes food for me because I hunger ; so I 



FAITH. 133 

do not act as I do because a certain end is to be at- 
tained, but the end becomes mine because I am bound 
to act in the particular manner by which it may be 
attained. I have not first in view the point towards 
which I am to draw my line, and then, by its posi- 
tion, determine the direction of my line, and the angle 
that it shall make ; but I draw my line absolutely in 
a right angle, and thereby the points are determined 
through which my line must pass. The end does not 
determine the commandment; but, on the contrary, 
the primitive purport of the commandment determines 
the end. 

I say, it is the law which commands me to act that 
of itself assigns an end to my action; the same inward 
voice that compels me to think that I ought to act 
thus, compels me also to believe that from my action 
some result will arise ; it opens to my spiritual vision 
a prospect into another world, — which is really a world, 
a state, namely, and not an action, — but another and 
better world than that which is present to the physical 
eye ; it makes me aspire after this bettei: world, em- 
brace, it with every impulse, long for its realization, 
live only in it, and in it alone find satis&ction. The 
law itself is my guarantee for the certain attainment 
of this end. The same resolution by which I devote 
my whole thought and life to the fulfilment of this law, 
and determine to see nothing beyond it, brings with it 
the indestructible conviction, that the promise it implies 
is likewise true and certain, and renders it impossible 
for me even to conceive the possibility of the opposite. 
As I live in obedience to it, I live also in the contem- 
plation of its end; live in that better world which it 
promises to me. 

M 2 



134 BOOR III. 

Even in the mere consideration of the world as it is, 
apart from this law, there arises within me the wish, 
the desire, — no, not the mere desire, but the abso- 
lute demand for a better world. I cast a glance on 
the present relations of men towards each other, and 
towards Nature; on the feebleness of their powers, the 
strength of their desires and passions. A voice within 
me proclaims with irresistible conviction — " It is im- 
possible that it can remain thus ; it must all become 
different and better." 

I cannot think of the present state of humanity as 
that in which it is destined to remain ; I am absolutely 
unable to conceive of this as its complete and final 
vocation. Then, indeed, were aU a dream and a de- 
lusion; and it would not be worth the trouble to have 
lived, and played out this ever-repeated game, which 
tends to nothing, and signifies nothing. Only in so 
£ir as I can regard this state as the means of a better, 
as the transition point to a higher and more perfect 
state, has it any value in my eyes; — not for its own 
sate, but for the sake of that better world for which 
it prepares the way, can I support it, esteem it, and 
joyfully perform my part in it. My mind can take no 
place in the present, nor rest in it even for a moment, 
but is irresistibly repelled from it; my whole being 
flows onward, heedless of restraint or barrier, towards 
that future and better state of things. 

Shall I eat and drink only that I may hunger and 
thirst and eat and drink again, till the grave which 
is open beneath my feet shall swallow me up, and I 
myself become the food of worms? Shall I beget 
beings like myself, that they too may eat and drink 



FAITH. 135 

and die, and leave behind them beings like themselyes 
to do the same that I have done ? To what purpose 
this ever-revolving circle, this ceaseless and unvarying 
round, in which all things appear only to pass away, 
and pass away only that they may re-appear unaltered; 
— this monster continually devouring itself that it may 
again bring itself forth, and bringing itself forth only 
that it may again devour itself? 

This can never be the vocation of my being, and of 
all being. There must be something which exists 
because it has come into existence ; and now endures, 
and cannot again re-appear, having once become such 
as it is. And this element of permanent endurance 
must be produced amid the vicissitudes of the transi- 
tory and perishable, maintain itself there, and be borne 
onwards, pure and inviolate, upon the waves of time. 

Our race still laboriously extorts the means of its 
subsistence and preservation from an opposing Nature. 
The larger portion of mankind is stiU condemned through 
life to severe toil, in order to supply nourishment for 
itself and for the smaller portion which thinks for it ; 
— immortal spirits are compelled to fix their whole 
thoughts and endeavours on the earth that brings forth 
their food. It still frequently happens, that when the 
labourer has finished his toil, and promises himself in 
return a lasting endurance both for himself and for his 
work, a hostile element will destroy in a moment that 
which it has cost him years of patient industry and 
deliberation to accomplish, and the assiduous and care- 
ful man is undeservedly made the prey of hunger and 
misery; — often do floods, storms, volcanoes, desolate 
whole countries, and works which bear the impress of 
a rational soul are mingled with their authors in the 



136 BOOK m. 

wild chaos of death and destraction. Disease sweeps into 
an untimelj grave men in the pride of their strength, 
and children whose existence has as jet borne no fruit ; 
pestilence stalks through blooming lands, leaves the 
few who escape its ravages Kke lonely orphans bereaved 
of the accustomed support of their fellows, and does all 
that it can do to give back to the desert regions which 
the labour of man has won from thence as a possession 
to himself. Thus it is now, but thus it cannot remain 
for ever. No work that bears the stamp of Reason, 
and has been undertaken to extend her power, can ever 
be wholly lost in the onward progress of the ages. 
The sacrifices which the irregular violence of Nature 
extorts from Reason, must at least exhaust, disarm, 
and appease that violence. The same power which has 
burst out into lawless fury, cannot again commit like 
excesses; it cannot be destined to renew its strength; 
through its own outbreak its energies must hence- 
forth and for ever be exhausted. All those outbreaks 
of imregulated power before which human strength 
vanishes into nothing, those desolating hurricanes, those 
earthquakes, those volcanoes, can be nothing else than 
the last struggles of the rude mass against the law of 
regular, progressive, living, and systematic activity to 
which it is compelled in opposition to its own undi- 
rected impulses; — nothing but the last shivering strokes 
by which the perfect formation of our globe has yet 
to be completed. That resistance must gradually be- 
come weaker and at length be exhausted, since, in the 
regulated progress of things, there can be nothing to 
renew its strength ; that formation must at length be 
completed, and our destined dwelling-place be made 
ready. Nature must gradually be resolved into a con- 



FAITH. 137 

dition in which her regular action may be calculated 
and safely relied upon, and her power bear a fixed and 
definite relation to that which is destined to govern 
it, -^ that of man. In so far as this relation already 
exists, and the cultivation of Nature has obtained a 
firm footing, the works of man, by their mere existence, 
and by an influence altogether beyond the original 
intent of their authors, shall again react upon Nature, 
and become to her a new vivifying principle. Cul- 
tivation shall quicken and ameUorate the sluggish and 
baleful atmosphere of the primeval forests, deserts, and 
marshes; more regular and varied cultivation shall 
dififiise throughout the air new impulses to Hfe and fer- 
tiUty ; and the sun shall pour his most animating rays 
into an atmosphere breathed by healthfiil, industrious, 
and civilized nations. Science, first called into exist- 
ence by the pressure of necessity, shall afterwards 
calmly and carefully investigate the unchangeable laws 
of Nature, review its powers at large, and learn to cal- 
culate their possible manifestations ; and while closely 
following the footsteps of Nature in the living and 
actual world, form for itself in thought a new ideal 
one. Every discovery which Reason has extorted from 
Nature shall be maintained throughout the ages, and 
become the ground of new knowledge, for the common 
possession of our race. Thus shall Nature ever become 
more and more intelligible and transparent, even in 
her most secret depths; and human power, enhghtened 
and armed by hmnan invention, shall rule over her 
without difficulty, and the conquest, once made, be 
peacefully maintained. This dominion of man over 
Nature shall gradually be extended, until, at length, 
no farther expenditure of mechanical labour shall be 



138 BOOK III. 

necessary than what the human body requires for its 
development, cultivation, and health ; and this labour 
shall cease to be a burden ; — for a reasonable being is 
not destined to be a bearer of burdens. 

But it is not Nature, it is Freedom itself, by which 
the greatest and most terrible disorders incident to our 
race are produced ; man is the crudest enemy of man. 
Lawless hordes of savages still wander over vast wil- 
dernesses; — they meet, and the victor devours his foe 
at the triumphal feast : — or where culture has at length 
united these wild hordes under some social bond, they 
attack each other, as nations, with the power which 
law and union have given them. Defying toil and pri- 
vation, their armies traverse peaceful plains and forests; 
— they meet each other, and the sight of their brethren 
is the signal for slaughter. Equipt with the mightiest 
inventions of the human understanding, hostile fleets 
plou^ a way through the ocean ; through storm and 
tempest man rushes to meet his fellow-man upon the 
lonely, inhospitable sea; — they meet, and defy the 
fury of the elements, that they may destroy each other 
witii their own hands. Even in the interior of states, 
where men seem to be united in equality under the 
law, it is still for the most part only force and fraud 
which rule under that venerable name ; and here the 
warfare is so much the more shameful that it is not 
openly declared to be war, and the party attacked is 
even deprived of the privilege of defending himself 
against unjust oppression. Smaller associations rejoice 
aloud in the ignorance, the folly, the vice, and the 
misery in which the greater number of their brethren 
are sunk, and ma^ it their avowed object to retain 
them in this state of degradation, and even to plunge 



FAITH. 139 

them deeper in it, in order that thej may perpetuate 
their slavery to themselves, — and to destroy any one 
who should venture to enlighten or improve them. No 
attempt at amelioration can anywhere be made without 
rousing up from slumber a host of selfish interests, 
and exciting them to war against it ; without uniting 
together the most varied and opposite opinions in a 
common hostility. The good cause is ever the weaker, 
for it is simple, and can be loved for itself alone ; the 
bad attracts each individual by the promise which is 
most seductive to him; and its adherents, always at 
war among themselves, so soon as the good makes its 
appearance, conclude a truce, that they may unite the 
whole powers of their wickedness against it. Scarcely, 
indeed, is such an opposition needed, for even the good 
themselves are but too often divided by misunderstand- 
ing, error, distrust, and secret self-love ; and that so 
much the more violently, the more earnestly each strives 
to propagate that which he recognises as best, and thus 
dissipates by internal discord a power, which, even when 
united, could scarcely hold the balance with evil. One 
blames the other for rushing onwards with stormy im- 
patience to his object, without waiting until the good 
result shall have been prepared; whilst the other 
blames him that, through hesitation and cowardice, 
he accomplishes nothing, but allows things to remain 
as they are, contrary to his better conviction; and 
that for him the hour of action never arrives; — and 
only the Omniscient can determine whether either of 
the parties in the dispute is in the right. Every one 
regards the undertaking, the necessity of which is most 
apparent to him, and in the prosecution of which he 
has acquired the greatest skiU, as the most important 



UO BOOK III. 

and needful, — as the point from which all improve- 
ment must proceed ; he requires all good men to unite 
their efforts with his, and to subject them to him for 
the accomplishment of his particular purpose, and holds 
it to be treason to the good cause if they refuse ; — while 
they on the other hand make the same demands upon 
him, and accuse him of similar treason, should he re- 
fuse. Thus do all good intentions among men appear 
to be lost in vain disputations, which leave behind them 
no trace of their existence; while in the meantime the 
world goes on as well, or as ill, as it can without 
human eflFort, by the blind mechanism of Nature, — 
and so will go on for ever. 



And so go on for ever? — No; — not so, unless the 
whole existence of humanity is to be an idle game, 
without significance and without end. It cannot be 
intended that those savage tribes should always re- 
main savage : no race can be born with all the capa- 
cities of perfect humanity, and yet be destined never 
to develop these capacities, and never to become more 
than that which a sagacious animal by its own proper 
nature might become. Those savages must be des- 
tined to be the progenitors of more powerful, culti- 
vated, and virtuous generations ; — otherwise it is im- 
possible to conceive of a purpose in their existence, 
or even of the possibility of their existence in a world 
ordered and arranged by reason. Savage races may 
become civilized, for this has already occurred, and 
the most cultivated nations of modern times are the 
descendants of savages. Whether civilization be a 
direct and natural development of human society, or 



FAITH. HI 

invariably arise through instruction and example from 
without, and the primary source of all human culture 
must be sought in a super-human guidance, — by the 
same way in which nations which once were savage have 
emerged into civilization, will those who are yet unci- 
vilized gradually attain it. They must, no doubt, at first 
pass through the same dangers and corruptions of a 
merely sensual civilization, by which the civilized nations 
are still oppressed, but they will thereby be brought 
into union with the great whole of humanity, and be 
made capable of taking part in its farther progress. 

It is the vocation of our race to unite itself into one 
single body, aU the parts of which shall be thoroughly 
known to each other, and all possessed of similar cul- 
ture. Nature, and even the passions and vices of men, 
have from the beginning tended towards this end ; a 
great part of the way towards it is already passed, and 
we may surely calculate that this end, which is the 
condition of all ferther social progress, will in time 
be attained. Let us not ask of history if man, on the 
whole, have yet become purely moral! To a more 
extended, comprehensive, energetic freedom he has 
certainly attained ; but it has been hitherto an almost 
necessary result of his position, that this freedom has 
been applied chiefly to evil purposes. Neither let us 
ask whether the aesthetic and intellectual culture of 
the ancient world, concentrated on a few points, may 
not have excelled in degree that of modem times! 
It might happen that we should receive a humiliating 
answer, and that in this respect the human race has 
not advanced, but rather seemed to retrograde, in 
its riper years. But let us ask of history at what 

N 



142 BOOR III. • 

period the ezisting culture has been most widely dif- 
fused, and distributed among the greatest number of 
individuals; and we shall doubdess find that from 
the beginning of history down to our own day, the 
few light-points of civilization have spread themselves 
abroad from their centre, that one individual after an- 
other, and one nation after another, has been embraced 
within their circle, and that this wider outspread of 
culture is proceeding under our own eyes. And 
this is the first point to be attained in the endless 
path on which humanity must advance. Until this 
shall have been attained, until the existing culture of 
every age shall have been difiused over the whole in- 
habited globe, and our race become capable of the 
most unlimited inter-communication with itself, one 
nation or one continent must pause on the great com- 
mon path of progress, and wait for the advance of the 
others ; and each must bring as an offering to the uni- 
versal commonwealth, for the sake of which alone it 
exists, its ages of apparent immobility or retrogression. 
When that first point shall have been attained, when 
every useful discovery made at one end of the earth 
shall be at once made known and communicated to all 
the rest, then, without farther interruption, without 
halt or regress, with united strength and equal step, 
humanity shall move onward to a higher culture, of 
which we can at present form no conception. 

Within those singular associations, thrown together 
by unreasoning accident, which we call States, — after 
they have subsisted for a time in peace, when the re- 
sistance excited by yet new oppression has been lulled 
to sleep, and the fermentation of contending forces 
appeased, — abuse, by its continuance, and by general 



FAITH. 143 

sufferance, assumes a sort of established form ; and the 
ruling classes, in the uncontested enjoyment of their 
extorted privileges, have nothing more to do but to 
extend them further, and to give to this extension also 
the same established form. Urged by their insatiable 
desires, they will continue from generation to generation 
their efforts to acquire wider and yet wider privileges, 
and never say " It is enough I" until at last oppression 
shall reach its limit, and become wholly insupportable, 
and despair give back to the oppressed that power which 
their courage, extinguished by centuries of tyranny, 
could not procure for them. They will then no longer 
endure any among them who cannot be satisfied to 
be on an equality with others, and so to remain. In 
order to protect themselves against internal violence or 
new oppression, all wiU take on themselves the same 
obligations. Their deliberations, in which every man 
shall decide, whatever he decides, for himself, and not 
for one subject to him whose sufferings will never 
affect him, and in whose fate he takes no concern ; — 
deliberations, according to which no one can hope that 
it shall be he who is to practise a permitted injustice, 
but every one must fear that he may have to suffer it ; 
— deliberations that alone deserve the name of legis- 
lation, which is something wholly different from the 
ordinances of combined lords to the countless herds 
of their slaves; — these deliberations will necessarily 
be guided by justice, and wiU lay the foundation of a 
true State, in which each individual, from a regard 
for his own security, will be irresistibly compelled to 
respect the security of every other without exception ; 
since, under the supposed legislation, every injury 
which he should attempt to do to another, would not 



144 BOOK III. 

fall upon its object, but would infallibly recoil upon 
himself. 

Bj the establishment of this only true State, this finn 
foundation of internal peace, the possibility of foreign 
war, at least with other true states, is cut off. Even 
for its own advantage, even to prevent the thought 
of injustice, plunder, and violence entering the minds 
of its own citizens, and to leave them no possibility of 
gain, except by means of industry and diligence within 
their legitimate sphere of activity, every true state 
must forbid as strictly, prevent as careftdly, compen- 
sate as exactly, or punish as severely, any injury to the 
citizen of a neighbouring state, as to one of its own. 
This law concerning the security of neighbours is ne- 
cessarily a law in every state that is not a robber-state; 
and by its operation the possibility of any just com- 
plaint of one state against another, and consequently 
every case of self-defence among nations, is entirely pre- 
vented. There are no necessary, permanent, and imme- 
diate relations of states, as such, with each other, which 
might be productive of strife ; there are, properly speak- 
ing, only relations of the individual citizens of one state 
to the individual citizens of another; a state can be 
injured only in the person of one of its citizens; but such 
injury will be immediately compensated, and the ag- 
grieved state satisfied. Between such states as these, 
there is no rank which can be insulted, no ambition 
which can be offended. No officer of one state is 
authorised to intermeddle in the internal affairs of an- 
other, nor is there any temptation for him to do so, 
since he could not derive the slightest personal advan- 
tage from any such influence. That a whole nation 
should determine, for the sake of plunder, to make war 



FAITH. 145 

on a neighbouring country, is impossible; for in a 
state where all are equal, the plunder could not be- 
come the booty of a few, but must be equally divided 
amongst aQ, and the share of no one individual could 
ever recompense him for the trouble of the war. Only 
where the advantage &lls to tiie few oppressors, and 
the injury, the toil, the expense, to the countless herd of 
slaves, is a war of spoEation possible and conceivable. 
Not from states like themselves could such states as 
these entertain any fear of war ; only from savages or 
barbarians, whose lack of skiU to enrich themselves by 
industry impels them to plunder; or from enslaved 
nations, driven by their masters to a war from which 
they themselves wiU reap no advantage. In the for- 
mer case, every individual state must, through the arts 
of civilization, already be the stronger party ; against 
the latter danger, the common advantage of aU de- 
mands that they should strengthen themselves by union. 
No free state can reasonably suffer in its vicinity as- 
sociations governed by rulers whose interests would be 
promoted by the subjugation of adjacent nations, and 
whose very existence is therefore a constant source of 
danger to their neighbours; a regard for their own 
security compels all free states to transform aU around 
them into free states like themselves; and thus, for 
the sake of their own welfare, to extend the empire of 
culture over barbarism, of freedom over slavery. Soon 
will the nations, civilized or enfranchised by them, find 
themselves placed in the same relation towards others 
still enthralled by barbarism or slavery, in which the 
earlier free nations previously stood towards them, and 
be compelled to do the same things for these which 
were previously done for themselves ; and thus, of ne- 

N 2 



146 BOOR III. 

cessity, by reason of the existence of some few really 
free states, will the empire of civilization, freedom, and 
with it universal peace, gradually embrace the whole 
world. 

Thus, from the establishment of a just internal or- 
ganization, and of peace between individuals, there will 
necessarily result integrity in the external relations of 
nations towards each other, and universal peace among 
them. But the estabhshment of this just internal or- 
ganization, and the emancipation of the first nation that 
shall be truly free, arises as a necessary consequence 
from the ever-growing oppression exercised by the 
ruling classes towards their subjects, which gradually 
becomes insupportable, — a progress which may be 
safely left to the passions and the blindness of those 
classes, even although warned of the result. 

In these only true states all temptation to evil, nay, 
even the possibihty of a man resolving upon a bad 
action with any reasonable hope of benefit to himself 
vdll be entirely taken away ; and the strongest possible 
motives wiU be offered to every man to make virtue 
the sole object of his will. 

. There is no man who loves evil because it is evil ; 
it is only the advantages and enjoyments expected from 
it, and which, in the present condition of humanity, 
do actually, in most cases, result from it, that are loved. 
So long as this condition shall continue, so long as a 
premium shall be set upon vice, a fundamental improve- 
ment of mankind, as a whole, can scarcely be hoped 
for. But in a civil society constituted as it ought to 
be, as reason requires it. to be, as the thinker may 
easily describe it to himself although he may nowhere 
find it actually existing at the present day, and as it 



FAITH. 147 

must necessarily exist in the first nation that really 
acquires true freedom, — ^in such a state of society, evil 
will present no advantages, but rather the most certain 
disadvantages, and self-love itself will restrain the ex- 
cess of self-love when it would run out into injustice. 
By the unerring administration of such a state, every 
fraud or oppression practised upon others, all self- 
aggrandizement at their expense, will be rendered not 
merely vain, and all labour so apphed fruitless, but 
such attempts would even recoil upon their author, 
and assuredly bring home to himself the evil which he 
would cause to others. In his own land, — out of his 
own land, — throughout the whole world, he could find 
no one whom he might injure and yet go unpunished. 
But it is not to be expected, even of a bad man, that 
he would determine upon evil merely for the sake of 
such a resolution, although he had no power to carry 
it into effect, and nothing could arise from it but in- 
famy to himself. The use of Uberty for evil purposes 
is thus destroyed; man must resolve either to re- 
nounce his freedom altogether, and patiently to become 
a mere passive wheel in the great machine of the uni- 
verse, or else to employ it for good. In soil thus pre- 
pared, good will easily prosper. When men shall no 
longer be divided by selfish purposes, nor their powers 
exhausted in struggles with each other, nothing will 
remain for them but to direct their imited strength 
against the one common enemy which still remains 
unsubdued, — ^resisting, uncultivated nature. No longer 
estranged from each other by private ends, they will 
necessarily combine for this common object ; and thus 
there arises a body, everywhere animated by the same 
spirit, and the same love. Every misfortune to the 



148 BOOK III. 

indiyidual, since it can no longer be a gain to any other 
individual, is a misfortune to the whole, and to each 
individual member of the whole ; and is felt with the 
same pain, and remedied with the same activity, by 
every member; — every step in advance made by one 
man is a step in advance made by the whole race. Here, 
where the petty, narrow self of mere individual per- 
sonahty is merged in the more comprehensive unity 
of the social constitution, each man truly loves every 
other as himself, — as a member of this greater sdf 
which now claims all his love, and of which he himself 
is no more than a member, only capable of participating 
in a common gain or in a common loss. The strife 
of evil against good is here aboHshed, for here no evil 
can intrude. The strife of the good among themselves 
respecting good, disappears, now that they find it easy 
to love what is good for its own sake alone, and not 
because they are its authors ; now that it has become 
of all-importance to them that truth should really be 
discovered, that the useful action should be done, — ^but 
not at all by whom this may be accomplished. Here 
each individual is at all times ready to join his strength 
to that of others, to make it subordinate to that of 
others; and whoever, according to the judgment of all, 
is most capable of accompHshing the greatest amount 
of good, will be supported by all, and his success re- 
joiced in by all with an equal joy. 



This is the purpose of our earthly hfe, which reason I 
sets before us, and for the in&Uible attainment of 

which she is our pledge and security. This is not an ' 

object given to us only that we may strive after it for ] 



FAITH. 149 

the mere purpose of exercising our powers on some- 
thing great, the real existence of which we may per- 
haps be compelled to abandon to doubt; it shall, it 
must be realized; there must be a time in which it 
shall be accomplished, as surely as there is a sensible 
world, and a race of reasonable beings, existent in time, 
with respect to which nothing earnest and rational is 
conceivable besides this purpose, and whose existence 
only becomes intelhgible through this purpose. Unless 
all human life be metamorphosed into a mere theatrical 
display for the gratification of some malignant spirit, 
who has implanted in poor humanity this inextinguish- 
able longing for the imperishable only to ainuse himself 
with its ceaseless pursuit of that which it can never over- 
take, — its ever-repeated efforts, Ixion-like, to embrace 
that which still eludes its grasp, — its restless hurrying 
onward in an ever-recurring circle; — only to mock its 
earnest aspirations with an empty, insipid farce; — 
unless the wise man, seeing through this mockery, and 
feeling an irrepressible disgust at contiauing to play 
his part in it, is to cast life indignantly from him, and 
make the moment of his awakening to reason also that 
of his physical death ; — unless these things are so, this 
purpose most assuredly must be attained. — ^Yes I it is 
attainable in life, and through life, for Reason comi- 
mands me to live : — it is attainable, for I am. 



III. 

But when this end shall have been attained, and 
humanity at length stand at this point, what is there 
then to do ? Upon earth there is no higher state than 



150 BOOK in. 

this; — the generation which has once reached it, can 
do no more thafi abide there, steadfastly maintain its 
position, die, and leave behind it descendants who shall 
do the like, and who will again leave behind them 
descendants to follow in their footsteps. Humanity 
would thus stand still upon her path ; and therefore 
her earthly end cannot be her highest end. This 
earthly end is conceivable, attainable, and finite. Even 
although we consider all preceding generations as 
means for the production of the last complete one, we 
do not thereby escape the question of earnest reason, — 
to what end then is this last one? Since a human 
race has appeared upon earth, its existence there must 
certainly be in accordance with, and not contrary to, 
reason ; and it must attain all the development which 
it is possible for it to attain on earth. But why should 
such a race have an existence at all, — why may it not 
as well have remained in the womb of chaos ? Reason 
is not for the sake of existence, but existence for the 
sake of reason. An existence which does not of itself 
satisfy reason, and solve all her questions, cannot by 
possibility be the true being. 

And, then, are those actions which are commanded 
by the voice of conscience, — by that voice whose dic- 
tates I never dare to criticise, but must always obey 
in silence, — are those actions, in reality, always the 
means, and the only means, for the attainment of the 
earthly purpose of humanity ? That I cannot do other- 
wise than refer them to this purpose, and dare not 
have any other object in view to be attained by means 
of them, is incontestible. But then are these, my in- 
tentions, always fulfilled? — is it enough that we will 
what is good, in order that it may happen? Alas! 



FAITH. 151 

many virtuous intentions are entirely lost for this 
world, and others appear even to hinder the purpose 
which they were designed to promote. On the other 
hand, the most despicable passions of men, their vices 
and their crimes, often forward, more certainly, the 
good cause than the endeavours of the virtuous man, 
who will never do evil that good may come I It seems 
that the Highest Good of the world pursues its course 
of increase and prosperity quite independently of all 
human virtues or vices, according to its own laws, 
through an invisible and unknown power, — just as 
the heavenly bodies run their appointed course, inde- 
pendently of all human effort; and that this power 
carries forward, in its own great plan, all human in- 
tentions, good and bad, and, with superior power, 
employs for its own purpose that which was under- 
taken for other ends. 

Thus, even if the attainment of this earthly end 
could be the purpose of our existence, and every doubt 
which reason could start with regard to it were si- 
lenced, yet would this end not be ours, but the end 
of that unknown power. We do not know, even for 
a moment, what is conducive to this end ; and nothing 
is left to us but to give by our actions some material, 
no matter what, for this power to work upon, and to 
leave to it the task of elaborating this material to its 
own purposes. It would, in that case, be our high- 
est wisdom not to trouble ourselves about matters 
that do not concern us ; to live according to our own 
fancy or inclinations, and quietly leave the conse- 
quences to that unknown power. The moral law within 
us would be void and superfluous, and absolutely un- 
fitted to a being destined to nothing higher than this. 



152 BOOK III. 

In order to be at one with ourselyes, we should have 
to refuse obedience to that law, and to suppress it as a 
perverse and foolish fanaticism. 



No! — I will not refuse obedience to the law of duty; 
surely as I live and am, I will obey, absolutdy 
because it commands. This resolution shall be first 
and highest in my mind; that by which everything 
else is determined, but which is itself determined by 
nothing else ; — this shall be the innermost principle of 
my spiritual life. 

But, as a reasonable being, before whom a purpose 
must be set solely by its own will and determination, 
it is impossible for me to act without a motive and 
without an end. If this obedience is to be recognised 
by me as a reasonable service, — if the voice which de- 
mands this obedience be really that of the creative 
reason within me, and not a mere fanciful enthusiasm, 
invented by my own imagination, or communicated 
to me somehow from without, — this obedience must 
have some consequences, must serve some end. It 
is evident that it does not serve the purpose of the 
world of sense; — there must, therefore, be a super- 
sensual world, whose purposes it may promote. 



The mist of delusion clears away from before my 
sight I I receive a new organ, and a new world opens 
before me. It is disclosed to me only by the law of 
reason, and answers only to that law in my spirit. I 
apprehend this world, — limited as I am by my sen- 
suous view, I must thus name the unnameable — I 



FAITH. 153 

apprehend this world merely in and through the end 
which is promised to my obedience; — it is in reahty 
nothing else than this necessary end itself which reason 
annexes to the law of duty. 

Setting aside everything else, how could I suppose 
that this law had reference to the world of sense, or 
that the whole end and object of the obedience which 
it demands is to be found within that world, since 
that which alone is of importance in this obedience 
serves no purpose whatever in that world, can never 
become a cause in it, and can never produce results. 
In the world of sense, which proceeds on a chain of 
material causes and efifects, and in which whatever 
happens depends merely on that which preceded it, it 
is never of any moment how, and with what motives 
and intentions, an action is performed, but only what 
the action is* 

Had it been the whole purpose of our existence to 
produce an earthly condition of our race, there would 
only have been required an unerring mechanism by 
which our outward actions might have been deter- 
mined, and we would not have needed to be more 
than wheels well fitted to the great machine. Free- 
dom would have been, not merely in vain, but even 
obstructive ; a virtuous will wholly superfluous. The 
world would, in that case, be most imsldlfully directed, 
and attain the purposes of its existence by wasteful 
extravagance and circuitous byeways, Hadst thou, 
mighty World-Spirit I withheld from us this freedom, 
which thou art now constrained to adapt to thy plans 
with labour and contrivance ; hadst thou rather at once 
compelled us to act in the way in which thy plans 
required that we should act, thou wouldst have at- 



154 BOOK III. 

tained thy purposes by a much shorter way, as the 
humblest of the dwellers in these thy worlds can tell 
thee. But I am free ; and therefore such a chain of 
causes and effects, in which freedom is absolutely 
superfluous and without aim, cannot exhaust my whole 
nature. I must be free ; for it is not the mere me- 
chanical act, but the free determination of free ¥nll, for 
the sake of duty and for the ends of duty only, — thus 
speaks the voice of conscience within us, — this alone 
it is which constitutes our true worth. The bond with 
which this law of duty binds me is a bond for Uving 
spirits only; it disdains to rule over a dead mechanism, 
and addresses its decrees only to the living and the 
free. It requires of me this obedience; — ^this obedience 
therefore cannot be nugatory or superfluous. 



And now the Eternal World rises before me more 
brightly, and the frmdamental law of its order stands 
clearly and distinctly apparent to my mental vision. In 
this world, will alone, as it lies concealed from mortal 
eye in the secret obscurities of the soul, is the first link 
in a chain of consequences that stretches through the 
whole invisible realms of spirit; as, in the physical 
wOTld, action^^h certain movement of matter — is the 
first link in a material chain that runs through the 
whole system of nature. The will is the efficient, Hving 
principle of the world of reason, as motion is the ef- 
ficient, living principle of the world of sense. I stand 
in the centre of two entirely opposite worlds : — a visi- 
ble world, in which action is the only moving power ; 
and an invisible and absolutely incomprehensible world, 
in which will is the ruling principle. I am one of 
the primitive forces of both these worlds. My will 



PAITH. 155 

embraces both. This will is, in itself, a constituent 
element of the super-sensual world ; for as I move it 
by my several successive resolutions, I move and change 
something in that world, and my activity thus extends 
itself throughout the whole, and gives birth to new 
and ever-enduring results, which henceforward possess 
a real existence and need not again to be produced. 
This will may break forth in a material act, and this 
act belongs to the world of sense, and does there that 
which pertains to a material act to do. 

It is not necessary that I should first be severed 
from this terrestrial world before I can obtain admis- 
sion into the celestial one ; — I am, and live in it even 
now, fax more truly than in the terrestrial ; even now 
it is my only sure foundation, and the eternal life on 
the possession of which I have already entered is the 
only ground why I should still prolong this earthly 
one. That which we call heaven does not lie beyond 
the grave ; it is even here difiused around us, and its 
light arises in every pure heart. My will is mine, and 
it is the only thing that is wholly miiie and entirely 
dependent on myself; and through it I have already 
become a citizen of the realm of freedom and of pure 
spiritual activity. What determination of my will — 
of the only thing by which I am raised from the dust 
into this region — is best adapted to its order, is pro- 
claimed to me, at every moment, by my conscience, 
the bond that constantly unites me to this world ; — 
and it depends solely on myself to give my activity 
the appointed direction. Thus I cultivate myself for 
this world; labour in it, and for it, in cultivating 
one of its members ; in it, and only in it, pursue my 
purpose according to a settled plan, without doubt or 



156 BOOK III. 

hesitation, certain of the resnlt, since here no foreign I 

power stands opposed to my free ¥nll. That, in the I 

world of sense, my will, in so far as it is actually 
determined as it ought to be, comes forth into action, 
is but the law of this sensuous world. I did not 
send forth the act as I did the will ; only the latter ' 

was wholly and purely my work, — it was all that , 

proceeded forth from me. It was not even necessary j 

that there should be another particular act on my part f 

to unite the deed to the will; the deed imites itself 
to it according to the law of that second world with 
which I am connected through my will, and in which j 

this will is likewise an original force, as it is in the ' 

first. I am indeed compelled, when I regard my will, 
determined according to the dictates of conscience, as a 
fact, and an efficient cause in the world of sense, to refer 
it to that earthly purpose of humanity as a means to 
the accomplishment of an end ; — not as if I should first 
survey the plan of the world, and from this knowledge 
calculate what I had to do ; but the specific action, 
which conscience directly enjoins me to do, reveals 
itself to me at once as the only means by which, in 
my position, I can contribute to the attainment of that 
end. Even if it should afterwards appear as if this 
end had not been promoted — nay, if it should even 
seem to have been hindered — by my action, yet I can 
never regret it, nor perplex myself about it, so surely 
as I have only obeyed my conscience in performing 
this act. Whatever consequences it may have in this 
world, in the other world there can nothing but good 
result from it. And even in this world, should my 
action appear to have failed of its purpose, my con- 
science for tJuxt very reason commands me to repeat 



FAITH. 157 

it in a manner that may more effectually reach its end; 
or» should it seem to have hindered that purpose, 
for thai very reason to make good the detriment, 
and aimihilate the untoward result. I will as I ought, 
and the new deed follows. It may happen that the 
consequences of this new action, in the world of sense, 
may appear to me not more beneficial than those of 
the first ; but, with respect to the other world, I retain 
the same calm assurance as before; and, in the present, 
it is again my bounden duty to make good my pre- 
vious fidlure by new action. And thus, should it still 
appear that, during my whole earthly Kfe, I have not 
advanced the good cause a single hair's-breadth in this 
world, yet I dare not cease my efforts: — after every 
unsuccessM attempt, I must still believe that the next 
will be successful. But in the spiritual world no step 
is ever lost. In short, I do not pursue the earthly 
purpose for its own sake alone, or as a final aim ; but 
only because my true final aim, obedience to the law 
of conscience, does not present itself to me in this world 
in any other shape than as the advancement of this end. 
I may not cease to pursue it, imless I were to deny 
the law of duty, or imless that law were to manifest 
itself to me, in this life, in some other shape than as 
a commandment to promote this purpose in my own 
place; — I shall actually cease to pursue it in anollier 
life in which that commandment shall have set before 
me some other purpose wholly incomprehensible to 
me here. In this life, I must %mll to promote it, be- 
cause I must obey ; whether it be actually promoted 
by the deed that follows my will thus fittingly directed 
is not my care; I am responsible only for the will, 
but not for the result. Previous to the actual deed, 

o 2 



158 BOOK in. 

I can never resign this purpose ; the deed, when it is 
completed, I may resign, and repeat it, or improve 
it. Thus do I live and labour, even here, in my most 
essential nature and in my nearest purposes, only for 
the other world; and my activity for it is the only 
thing of which I am completely certain ; — in the world 
of sense I labour only for the sake of the other, and 
only because I cannot work for the other without at 
least willing to work for it. 



I will establish myself firmly in this, to me, wholly 
new view of my vocation. The present life cannot be 
rationally regarded as the whole purpose of my exist- 
ence, or of the existence of a human race in general ; 
— there is something in me, and there is something 
required of me, which finds in this life nothing to 
which it can be applied, and which is entirely super- 
fluous and unnecessary for the attainment of the highest 
objects that can be attained on earth. There must 
therefore be a purpose in human existence which lies 
beyond this life. But should the present life, which 
is nevertheless imposed upon us, and which cannot be 
designed solely for the development of reason, since 
even awakened reason commands us to maintain it and 
to promote its highest purposes with all our powers, — 
should this life not prove entirely vain and inefifectual, 
it must at least have relation to a future life, as means 
to an end. Now there is nothing in this present life, 
the ultimate consequences of which do not remain on 
earth, — nothing whereby we could be connected with 
a future life — but only our virtuous will, which in this 
world, by the fundamental laws thereof, is entirely 



FAITH. 159 

fruitless. Only our virtuous will can it, must it be, 
by which we can labour for another life, and for the 
first and nearest objects which are there revealed to 
us ; and it is the consequences, invisible to us, of this 
virtuous will, through which we first acquire a firm 
standing point in that life from whence we may then 
advance in a farther course of progress. 



That our virtuous will, in and for and through itself, 
must have consequences, we know already in this life, 
for reason cannot command anything which is without 
a purposa; but what these consequences may be, — 
nay, how it is even possible for a mere will to produce 
any effect at all, — as to this we can have no concep- 
tion whatever, so long as we are stiU confined within 
this material world ; and it is true wisdom not to 
undertake an inquiry in which we know beforehand 
that we shall be imsuccessful. With respect to the 
nature of these consequences, the present life is there- 
fore, in relation to the future, a life in faith. In the 
future life, we shall possess these consequences, for we 
shall then proceed from them as our starting-point, and 
build upon them as our foundation ; and this other life 
will thus be, in relation to the consequences of our 
virtuous will in the present, a life in sight. In that 
other life, we shall also have an immediate purpose 
set before us, as we have in the present ; for our ac- 
tivity must not cease. But we remain finite beings, — 
and for finite beings there is but finite, determinate 
activity ; and every determinate act has a determinate 
end. As, in the present life, the actually existing 
world as we find it around us, the fitting adjustment 



160 BOOK in. 

of this world to the work we have to do in it, the 
degree of culture and virtue ahreadj attained hj men, 
and our own physical powers, — as these stand related 
to the purposes of this life, — so, in the fixture life, the 
consequences of our virtuous will in the present shall 
stand related to the purposes of that other existence. 
The present is the commencement of our existence ; 
the endowments requisite for its purpose, and a firm 
footing in it, have been freely bestowed on us: — the 
future is the continuation of this existence, and in it 
we must acquire for ourselves a commencement, and 
a definite standing-point. 

And now the present life no longer appeaqi vain and 
useless ; for this and this alone it is given to us — that 
we may acquire for ourselves a firm foundation in 
the future IHe, and only by means of this foundation 
is it connected with our whole eternal existence. It is 
very possible, that the immediate purpose of this se- 
cond life may be as unattainable by finite powers, with 
certainty and afler a fixed plan, as the purpose of the 
present life is now, and that even there a virtuous will 
may appear superfluous and without result. But it 
can never be lost there, any more thdn here, for it is 
the unalterable command of reason and inseparable 
from her existence. Its necessary efficacy would, in 
that case, direct us to a third life, in which the con- 
sequences of our virtuous will in the second life would 
become visible; — a life which during the second life 
would again be believed in through &ith, but with 
firmer, more unwavering confidence, since we should 
already have had practical experience of the truthfulness 
of reason, and have regained the fruits of a pure heart 
which had been fidthfrdly garnered up in a previously 
completed life. 



FAITH. 161 

As in the present life it is only from the command 
of conscience to follow a certain course of action that 
there arises our conception of a certain purpose in this 
action, and from this our whole intuitive perception 
of a world of sense ; — so in the future, upon a similar, 
but now to us wholly inconceivable command, will be 
foimded our conception of the immediate purpose of 
that life, and upon this, again, our intuitive perception 
of a world in which we shall set out from the conse- 
quences of our virtuous will in the present life. The 
present world exists for us only through the law of 
duty; the other will be revealed to us, in a similar 
manner, through another command of duty; for in 
no other manner can a world exist to any reasonable 
being. 



This, then, is my whole sublime vocation, my true 
nature. I am a member of two orders : — the one purely 
spiritual, in which I rule by my will alone ; the other 
sensuous, in which I operate by my action. The whole 
end of reason is pure activity, absolutely by itself 
alone, having no need of any instrument out of itself, 
— independence of everything which is not reason, — 
absolute freedom. The wiU is the living principle 
of reason, — is itself reason, when purely and simply 
apprehended; that reason is active by itself alone, 
means, that pure will, merely as such, operates and 
rules. Immediately and wholly in this purely spiritual 
order lives only the Infinite Reason. The finite reason 
— which does not itself constitute the world of reason, 
but is only one of its many members, — ^lives necessarily 
at the same time in a sensuous order ; that is to say. 



162 BOOK III. 

in one which presentB to it another object besides a 
purely spiritual activity ; — a material object, to be pro- 
moted by instruments and powers which indeed stand 
under the immediate dominion of the will, but whose 
activity is also conditioned by their own natural laws. 
Yet as surely as reason is reason, must the will operate 
absolutely by itself, and independently of the natural 
laws by which the action is determined ; and therefore 
does the sensuous life of every finite being point to- 
wards a higher, into which the will, by itself alone, 
may open the way, and of which it may acquire pos- 
session, — a possession which indeed we must again 
sensuously conceive of as a state, and by no means as 
a mere will. 

These two orders, — the purely spiritual and the sen- 
suous, the latter consisting possibly of an innumerable 
series of particular lives, — have existed in me from 
the first moment of the development of my active 
reason, and still proceed parallel to each other. The 
latter order is only a phenomenon for myself, and for 
those whose being is similar to my own; the former 
alone gives it significance, purpose, and value. I crni 
immortal, imperishable, eternal, as soon as I form the 
resolution to obey the laws of reason ; I do not need 
to become so. The super-sensual world is no future 
world ; it is now present ; it can at no point of finite 
existence be more present than at another ; not more 
present after an existence of myriads of lives than at 
this moment. My sensuous existence may, in future, 
assume other forms, but these are just as little the 
true life, as its present form. By that resolution I 
lay hold on eternity, and cast off this earthly life and 
all other forms of sensuous life which may yet lie be- 



FAITH. 163 

fore me in ftitniity, and place myself far abore them. 
I become the sole source of all my own being and its 
phenomena; and, henceforth, unconditioned by any- 
thing without me, I have life in myself. My will, 
which is directed by no foreign agency in the order 
of the super-sensual world, but by myself alone, is 
this source of true Ufe, and of eternity. 

But it is my will alone which is this source of true 
life, and of eternity ; — only by recognising this will as 
the pecuUar seat of moral goodness, and by actually 
raising it thereto, do I obtain the assurance and the 
possession of that super-sensual world. 

Without respect to any conceivable or visible object, 
without inquiry as to whether my will may be followed 
by any other result than the mere volition, — I must 
will in accordance with the moral law. My will stands 
alone, apart from all that is not itself, and is its own 
world merely by itself and for itself; not only as being 
itself an absolutely prst^ primary and original power, 
without any preceding influence by which it may be 
governed, but also as being followed by no conceivable 
or comprehensible result, or secand step in the series, 
by which its activity might be brought under the do- 
minion of a foreign law. Did there proceed from it 
any second, and from this again a third result, and so 
forth, in any conceivable sensuous world opposed to 
the spiritual world, then would its strength be broken 
by the resistance it would encounter from the inde- 
pendent elements of such a world which it would set 
in motion ; the mode of its activity would no longer 
exactly correspond to the purpose expressed in the 
volition; and the will would no longer remain free, 
but be partly limited by the peculiar laws of its hetero- 



164 BOOK in. 

geneoTis sphere of action. And thus must I actually 
regard the will in the present sensuous world, the only 
one known to me. I am indeed compelled to believe, 
and consequently to act as if I thought, that by my 
mere volition, my tongue, my hand, or my foot, might 
be set in motion ; but how a mere aspiration, an im- 
press of intelligence upon itself, such as will is, can 
be the principle of motion to a heavy material mass, — 
this I not only find it impossible to conceive, but the 
mere assertion is, before the tribunal of the under- 
standing, a palpable absurdity, — and here the move- 
ment of matter even in myself can only be explaiaed 
by the internal forces of matter itself. 

Such a view of my will as I have taken can, how- 
ever, only be attained through an intimate conviction 
that it is not merely the highest active principle for 
this world, — ^which it certainly might be without having 
freedom in itself, by the mere influence of the system 
of the universe, perchance, as we must conceive of 
a formative power in Nature,— but that it absolutely 
despises all earthly objects, and generally all objects 
lying out of itself, and recognises itself, for its own 
sake, as its own ultimate end. But by such a view of 
my will I am at once directed to a super-sensual order 
of things, in which the will, by itself alone and with- 
out any instrument lying out of itself, becomes an 
eflicient cause in a sphere which, Hke itself, is purely 
spiritual, and is thoroughly accessible to it. That 
moral volition is demanded of us absolutely for its own 
sake alone, — a truth which I only discover as a fact 
in my inward consciousness, and to the knowledge of 
which I cannot attain in any other way : — this was the 
first step of my thought. That this demand is reason- 



PAITH. 165 

able, and the source and standard of all else that is 
reasonable ; that it is not modelled upon any other thing 
whatever, but that all other things must, on the con- 
trary, model themselves upon it, and be dependent upon 
it, — a conviction which also I cannot arrive at from 
without, but can only attain by inward experience, by 
means of the unhesitating and immovable assent which 
I freely accord to this demand: — this was the second 
step of my thought. And from these two terms I 
have attained to fidth in a super-sensual Eternal World. 
If I abandon the former, the latter &lls to the ground. 
If it were true, — as many say it is, assuming it without 
farther proof as self-evident, and extolling it as the 
highest smnmit of human wisdom, — that all human 
virtue must have before it a certain definite external 
object, and that it must first be assured of the possi- 
bility of attaining this object, before it can act, and 
before it can become virtue ; that, consequently, reason 
by no means contains within itself the principle and 
the standard of its own activity, but must receive this 
standard from without, through contemplation of an 
external world ; — if this were true, then might the ulti- 
mate end of our existence be accomplished here below ; 
human nature might be completely developed and ex- 
hausted by our earthly vocation, and we should have 
no rational ground for raising our thoughts above the 
present life. 

But every thinker who has anywhere acquired those 
first principles even historically, perhaps by a mere 
love of the new and unusual, and who is able to pro- 
secute a correct course of reasoning from them, might 
speak and teach as I have now spoken to myself. He 

p 



166 BOOK III. 

would then present us with the thoughts of some 
other being, not with his own ; everything would float 
before him empty and without significance, because 
he would be without the sense whereby he might ap- 
prehend its reaUty. He is a bhnd man, who, upon 
certain true principles concerning colours which he 
has learned historically, has built a perfectly correct 
theory of colour, notwithstanding that there is in 
reaUty no colour existing for him; — he can tell how, 
under certain conditions, it must he; but to him it is 
not so, because he does not stand under these condi- 
tions. The feculty by which we lay hold on Eternal Life 
is only to be attained by actually renouncing the sen- 
suous and its objects, and sacrificing them to that law 
which takes cognizance of our will only, and not of 
our actions; — renouncing them with the firmest con- 
viction that it is reasonable for us to do so, — nay, that 
it is the only thing reasonable for us. By this renun- 
ciation of the Earthly, does fidth in the Eternal first 
arise in our soul, and is there enshrined apart, as the 
only support to which we can cling after we have given 
up all else, — as the only animating principle that can 
elevate our minds and inspire our lives. We must 
indeed, according to the figure of a sacred doctrine, 
first " die unto the world and be bom again, before we 
can enter the kingdom of God." 



I see — I now see clearly before me the cause 
of my former indiflference and blindness concerning 
spiritual things! Absorbed by mere earthly objects, 
lost in them with all my thoughts and efforts, moved 
and urged onward only by the notion of a result to 



FAITH. 167 

be realized out of ourselves, — by the desire of such a 
result, and our enjoyment therein, — ^insensible and dead 
to the pure impulse of reason, which gives a law to 
itself, and offers to our aspirations a purely spiritual 
end, — the inunortal Psyche remains, with fettered pi- 
nions, fiustened to the earth. Our philosophy becomes 
the history of our own heart and life ; and according 
to what we ourselves are, do we conceive of man and 
his vocation. Never impelled by any other motive 
than the desire after what can be actually realized in 
this world, there is for us no true freedom, — no 
freedom which holds the groimd of its determination 
absolutely and entirely within itself. Our freedom is, 
at best, that of the self-forming plant ; not essentially 
higher in its nature, but only more artistical in its 
results; not producing a mere material form with 
roots, leaves, and blossoms, but a mind with impulses, 
thoughts, and actions. We cannot have the slightest 
conception of true freedom, because we do not our- 
selves possess it ; when it is spoken of, we either bring 
down what is said to the level of our own notions, or 
at once declare all such talk to be nonsense. Without 
the idea of freedom, we are likewise without the &culty 
for another world. Everything of this kind floats past 
before us like words that are not addressed to us; 
like a pale shadow, without colour or meaning, which 
we know not how to lay hold of or retain. We leave 
it as we find it, without the least participation or 
sympathy. Or should we ever be urged by a more 
active zeal to consider it seriously, we then convince 
ourselves to our own satis&ction that aU such ideas 
are untenable and worthless reveries, which the man 
of sound understanding unhesitatingly rejects ; and 



168 BOOK III. 

according to the premises from which we proceed, 
which are made up of our own inward experiences, we 
are perfectly in the right, and secure from either re- 
citation or conversion, so long as we remain what we 
are. The excellent doctrines which are taught amongst 
us with a special authority, concerning freedom, duty, 
and everlasting Ufe, become to us romantic fables, like 
those of Tartarus and the Elysian fields ; although we 
do not publish to the world this our secret opinion, 
because we find it expedient, by means of these figures, 
to maintain an outward decorum among the populace ; 
or, should we be less reflective, and ourselves bound 
in the chains of authority, then we sink to the level 
of the conmion mind, and beheving what, thus under- 
stood, would be mere foolish fables, we find in those 
pure spiritual symbols only the promise of continuing 
throughout eternity the same miserable existence which 
we possess here below. 

In one word: — only by the frmdamental improve- 
ment of my will does a new Ught arise within me 
concerning my existence and vocation; without this, 
however much I may speculate, and with what rare 
intellectual gifts soever I may be endowed, darkness re- 
mains within me, and around me. The improvement of 
the heart alone leads to true wisdom. Let then my 
whole life be unceasingly devoted to this one purpose. 



IV. 

My moral will, merely as such, in and through itself, 
shall certainly and invariably produce consequences; 
every determination of my will in accordance with 



FAITH. 169 

duty, although no action should follow it, shall operate 
in another, to me incomprehensible, world, in which 
nothing but this moral determination of the will shall 
possess efficient activity. What is it that is assumed 
in this conception ? 

Obviously a Law; a rule absolutely without excep- 
tion, according to which a will determined by duty 
must have consequences ; just as in the material world 
which surrounds me I assume a law according to which 
this ball, when thrown by my hand with this particular 
force, in this particular direction, necessarily moves in 
such a direction with a certain degree of velocity, — 
perhaps strikes another ball with a certain amount of 
force, which in its turn moves on with a certain ve- 
locity, — and so on. As here, in the mere direction and 
motion of my hand, I already perceive and apprehend 
all the consequent directions and movements, with the 
same certainty as if they were already present before 
me ; even so do I embrace by means of my virtuous will 
a series of necessary and inevitable consequences in the 
spiritual world, as if they were already present before 
me ; only that I cannot define them as I do those in 
the material world, — that is, I only know that they 
must be, but not how they shall be; — and even in 
doing this, I conceive of a Law of the spiritual world, 
in which my pure will is one of the moving forces, as 
my hand is one of the moving forces of the material 
world. My own firm confidence in these results, and 
the conception of this law of the spiritual world, are 
one and the same ; — they are not two thoughts, one of 
which arises by means of the other, but they are en- 
tirely the same thought ; just as the confidence with 
which I calculate on a certain motion in a material body, 

P2 



170 BOOK III. 

and the conception of a mechanical law of nature on 
which that motion depends, are one and the same. The 
conception of a Law expresses nothing more than the 
firm, immovable confidence of reason in a principle, and 
the absolute impossibility of admitting its opposite. 

I assume such a law of a spiritual world, — not given 
by my will, nor by the will of any finite being, nor 
by the will of all finite beings taken together, but to 
which my will, and the will of all finite beings, is sub- 
ject. Neither I, nor any finite and therefore sensuous 
being, can conceive how a mere will can have conse- 
quences, nor what may be the nature of those conse- 
quences ; for herein consists the essential character of 
our finite nature, — that we are unable to conceive this, 
— that having indeed our will, as such, wholly within 
our power, we are yet compelled by our sensuous 
nature to regard the consequences of that will as sen- 
suous states: — how then can I, or any other finite 
being whatever, propose to ourselves as objects, and 
thereby give ffeaUty to, that which we can neither 
imagine nor conceive ? I cannot say that, in the ma- 
terial world, my hand, or any other body which be- 
longs to that world and is subject to the universal 
law of gravity, brings this law into operation; — these 
bodies themselves stand under this law, and are able 
to set another body in motion only in accordance 
with this law, and only in so far as that body, by 
virtue of this law, partakes of the universal moving 
power of Nature. Just as httle does a finite will 
give a law to the super-sensual world, which no finite 
spirit can embrace ; but all finite wills stand under the 
law of that world, and can produce results therein only 
inasmuch as that law already exists, and inasmuch as 



FAITH. 171 

they themselves, in accordance with the form of that 
law which is appUcable to finite wills, bring themselves 
under its conditions, and within the sphere of its ac- 
tivity, by moral obedience; — by moral obedience, I 
say, the only tie which unites them to that higher 
world, the only nerve that descends from it to them, 
and the only organ through which they can re-act 
upon it. As the universsjl power of attraction em- 
braces all bodies, and holds them together in them- 
selves and with each other, and the movement of each 
separate body is only possible on the supposition of 
this power, so does that super-sensual law unite, hold 
together, and embrace aU finite reasonable beings. My 
will, and the will of all finite beings, may be regarded 
from a double point of view: — partly as a mere voli- 
tion, an internal act directed upon itself alone, and, 
in so far, the wiU is complete in itself, concluded in 
this act of voUtion ; — partly as something beyond this, 
a fact It assumes the latter form to me, as soon as 
I regard it as completed ; but it must also become so 
beyond me; — in the world of sense, as the moving 
principle, for instance, of my hand, from the move- 
ment of which, again, other movements follow, — in the 
super-sensual world, astheprincipleof a series of spiritual 
consequences of which I have no conception. In the 
first point of view, as a mere act of volition, it stands 
wholly in my own power ; its assmnption of the latter 
character, that of an active first principle, depends not 
upon me, but on a law to which I myself am subject ; 
—on the law of nature in the world of sense, on a super- 
sensual law in the world of pure thought. 

What, then, is this law of the spiritual world which 
I conceive ? This idea now stands before me, in fixed 



172 BOOK III. 

and perfect shape; I cannot, and dare not add any- 
thing whatever to it; I have only to expound and 
interpret it distinctly. It is obviously not such as I 
may suppose the principle of my own, or any other 
possible sensuous world, to be, — a fixed, inert exist- 
ence, from which, by the encounter of a will, some 
internal power may be evolved, — something altogether 
different from a mere will : For, — and this is the sub- 
stance of my behef, — ^my will, absolutely by itself, and 
without the intervention of any instrument that might 
weaken its expression, shall act in a perfectly congenial 
sphere, — reason upon reason, spirit upon spirit; — in 
a sphere to which nevertheless it does not give the law 
of Ufe, activity, and progress, but which has that law 
in itself; — therefore, upon self-active reason. But self- 
active reason is will. The law of the super-sensual 
world must, therefore, be a Will: — A Will which 
operates purely as will ; by itself, and absolutely with- 
out any instrument or sensible material of its activity ; 
which is, at the same time, both act and product; with 
whom to will is to do, to command is to execute; 
in which, therefore, the instinctive demand of reason 
for absolute freedom and independence is realized : — 
A Will, which in itself is law ; determined by no fancy 
or caprice, through no previous reflection, hesitation, 
or doubt; — but eternal, unchangeable, on which we 
may securely and infelUbly rely, as the physical man 
rehes with certainty on the laws of his world: — A 
Will in which the moral will of finite beings, and this 
alone, has sure and imfailing results ; since for it all 
else is unavailing, all else is as if it were not. 

That subHme Will thus pursues no solitary path 
withdrawn from the other parts of the world of reason. 



PAITH. 173 

There is a spiritual bond between Him and all finite 
rational beings ; and He himself is this spiritual bond 
of the rational universe. Let me will, purely and de- 
cidedly, my duty, and He wills that, in the spiritual 
world at least, my will shall prosper. Every moral 
resolution of a finite being goes up before Him, and — 
to speak after the manner of mortals — moves and 
determines Him, not in consequence of a momentary 
satisfaction, but in accordance with the eternal law of 
His being. With surprising clearness does this thought, 
which hitherto was surrounded with darkness, now 
reveal itself to my soul ; the thought that my will, 
merely as such, and through itself, shall have results. 
It has results, because it is immediately and infaUibly 
perceived by another Will to which it is related, which 
is its own accomplishment, and the only living prin- 
ciple of the spiritual world ; in Him it has its first 
results, and, through Him, it then acquires an influence 
on the whole spiritual world, which is nothing but a 
product of that Infinite WilL 

Thus do I approach — the mortal must speak in his 
own language — thus do I approach that Infinite Will ; 
and the voice of conscience in my soul, which teaches 
me, in every situation of life, 'what I have there to 
do, is the channel through which again His influence 
descends upon me. That voice, sensualized by my en- 
vironment, and translated into my language, is the 
oracle of the Eternal World which announces to me 
how I am to perform my part in the order of the 
spiritual universe, or in the Infinite Will, who is Him- 
self that order. I cannot, indeed, survey or compre- 
hend that spiritual order, and I need not to do so ; — I 
am but a hnk in its chain, and can no more judge of 



174 BOOK III. 

the whole, than a single tone of music can judge of 
the entire harmony of which it forms a part. Bat 
what I myself ought to be in this harmony of spirits 
I must know, for it is only I myself who can make 
me so, — and this is immediately revealed to me by a 
Toice whose tones descend upon me from that other 
world. Thus do I stand related with the One who 
alone has existence, and thus do I participate in His 
being. There is nothing real, lasting, imperishable in 
me, but these two elements : — the voice of conscience, 
and my free obedience. By the first, the spiritual 
world bows down to me, and embraces me as one of 
its members; by the second I raise myself into this 
world, apprehend it, and act upon it. That Infinite 
Will, however, is the mediator between it and me ; for 
He himself is the original source both of it and me. 
This is the one True and Imperishable for which my 
soul yearns even from its inmost depths; all else is 
mere appearance, ever vanishing, and ever returning 
in a new semblance. 



This Will unites me with himself; He also unites 
me with all finite beings like myself, and is the uni- 
versal mediator between us all. This is the great 
mystery of the invisible world, and its frmdamental 
law, in so far as it is a world or system of many indi- 
vidual wills : — the union, and direct reciprocal action, 
of many separate and independent wills; a mystery 
which already lies clearly before every eye in the pre- 
sent life, without attracting the notice of any one, or 
being regarded as in any way wonderful. The voice 
of conscience, which imposes on each his particular 



FAITH. 175 

duty, is the light-beam on which we come forth from 
the bosom of the Infinite, and assume our place as 
particular individual beings ; it fixes the limits of our 
personality ; it is thus the true original element of our 
nature, the foundation and material of all our life. 
The absolute freedom of the will, which we bring down 
with us from the Infinite into the world of Time, is 
the principle of this our life. I act : — and, the sensi- 
ble intuition through which alone I become a personal 
intelligence being supposed, it is easy to conceive how 
I must necessarily Imow of this my action, — I know 
it, because it is I myself who act ; — it is easy to con- 
ceive how, by means of this sensible intuition, my 
spiritual act appears to me as a fact in a world of 
sense ; and how, on the other hand, by the same sen- 
sualization, the law of duty which, in itself, is a purely 
spiritual law, should appear to me as the command to 
such an action ; — it is easy to conceive, how an actually 
present world should appear to me as the condition of 
this action, and, in part, as the consequence and pro- 
duct of it. Thus far I remain vnthin myself and upon 
my own territory ; everything here, which has an ex- 
istence for me, unfolds itself purely and solely from 
myself; I see everywhere only myself, and no true 
existence out of myself. But in this my world I 
admit, also, the operations of other beings, separate 
and independent of me, as much as I of them. How 
these beings can themselves know of the influences 
which proceed from them, may easily be conceived; 
they know of them in the same way in which I know of 
my own. But how I can know of them is absolutdy 
inconceivable ; just as it is inconceivable how they can 
possess the knowledge of my existence, and its mani- 



176 BOOK III. 

festations, which neyertheless I ascribe to them. How do 
they come within my worid, or I within theirs, — since 
the principle by which the consciousness of ourselves, 
of our operations, and of their sensuous conditions, is 
unfolded from ourselves, — t. e, that each individual 
must undoubtedly know what he himself does, — is 
here whoUy inapplicable? How have free spirits know- 
ledge of free spirits, since we know that free spirits 
are the only reality, and that an independent world of 
sense, through which they might act on each other, 
is no longer to be thought of Or shall it be said, I 
perceive reasonable beings like myself by the changes 
which they produce in the world of sense ? Then I 
ask again, — How dost thou perceive these changes ? I 
comprehend very well how thou canst perceive changes 
which are brought about by the mere mechanism of 
nature ; for the law of this mechanism is no other than 
the law of thy own thought, according to which, this 
world being once assumed, thou continuest to develope 
it. But the changes of which we now speak are not 
brought about by the mechanism of nature, but by a 
free will elevated above all nature; and only in so fiu: 
as thou canst regard them in this character, canst thou 
infer from them the existence of free beings like thy- 
self Where then is the law within thyself, according 
to which thou canst unfold the determinations of other 
wills absolutely independent of thee ? In short, this 
mutual recognition and reciprocal action of free beings 
in this world, is perfectly inexpHcable by the laws of 
nature or of thought, and can only be explained 
through the One in whom they are united, although 
to each other they are separate ; through the Infinite 
Will who sustains and embraces them aU in His own 



FAITH. 177 

sphere. Not immediately from thee to me, nor from 
me tathee, flows forth the knowledge which we have 
of each other; — we are separated by an insurmount- 
able barrier. Only through the common fountain of 
our spiritual being do we know of each other ; only in 
Him do we recognise each other, and influence each 
other. " Here reverence the image of freedom upon 
the earth; — here, a work which bears its impress:*' 
— thus is it proclaimed within me by the voice of that 
Will, which speaks to me only in so far as it imposes 
duties upon me; — and the only principle through 
which I recognise thee and thy work, is the command 
of conscience to respect them. 

Whence, then, our feelings, our sensible intuitions, 
our discursive laws of thought, on all which is foimded 
the external world which we behold, in which we be- 
lieve that we exert an influence on each other ? With 
respect to the two last — our sensible intuitions and 
our laws of thought — to say, these are laws of reason 
in itself, is only to give no satisfectory answer at all. 
For us, indeed, who are excluded from the pure do- 
main of reason in itself, it may be impossible to think 
otherwise, or to conceive of reason imder any other 
law. But the true law of reason in itself is the prac- 
tical law, the law of the super-sensual world, or of 
that subhme Will. And, leaving this for a moment 
undecided, whence comes our imiversal agreement as 
to feelings, which, nevertheless, are something positive, 
immediate, inexphcable ? On this agreement in feeling, 
perception, and in the laws of thought, however, it 
depends that we all behold the same external world. 

" It is a harmonious, although inconceivable, limi- 
tation of the finite rational beings who compose our 

Q 



178 BOOK lU. 

race ; and only by means of such a harmonious limi- 
tation do they become a race:" — thus answers the 
philosophy of mere knowledge, and here it must rest 
as its highest point. But what can set a limit to rea- 
son but reason itself? — what can limit all finite reason 
but the Infinite Reason? This universal agreement 
concerning a sensible world, — assumed and accepted 
by us as the foundation of all our other life, and as 
the sphere of our duty — which, stricily considered, is 
just as incomprehensible as our unanimity concern- 
ing the products of our reciprocal freedom, — this 
agreement is the result of the One Eternal Infiutiite 
Will. Our faith, of which we have spoken as faith 
in duty, is only faith in Him, in His reason, in His 
truth. What, then, is the peculiar and essential truth 
which we accept in the world of sense, and in which 
we beUeve? Only that from our faithfrd and impar- 
tial performance of our duty in this world, there will 
arise to us throughout all eternity a life in which our 
freedom and moraUty shall prolong their activity. If 
this be true, then indeed is there truth in our world, 
and the only truth possible for finite beings ; and it 
must be true, for this world is the result of iJie Eternal 
WiU in us, — and that Will, by the law of His own 
being, can have no other purpose with respect to finite 
beings, than that which we have set forth. 

That Eternal Will is thus assuredly the Creator of 
the World, in the only way in which He can be so, 
and in the only way in which it needs a creation :— in 
the finite reason. Those who regard Him as building up 
a world from an everlasting inert matter, which must 
still remain inert and Ufeless, — like a vessel made by 
human hands, not an eternal procession of His sel& 



FAITH, 179 

development, — or who ascribe to Him the production 
of a material imiverse out of nothing, know neither 
the worid nor Him. If matter only can be reality, 
then were the worid indeed nothing, and throughout 
all eternity would remain nothing. Reason alone ex- 
ists: — the Infinite in Himself, — the finite in Him and 
through Him. Only in our minds has He created a 
world ; at least that from which we imfold it, and 
that hy which we imfold it: — the voice of duty, and 
harmonious feelings, intuitions, and laws of thought. It 
is His hght through which we behold the Hght, and 
all that it reveals to us. In our minds He still creates 
this world, and acts upon it by acting upon our minds 
through the call of duty, as soon as another free being 
changes aught therein. In our minds He upholds 
this world, and thereby the finite existence of which 
alone we are capable, by continually evolving from each 
state of our existence other states in succession. When 
He shall have sufiidently proved us according to His 
supreme designs, for our next succeeding vocation, 
and we shall have sufficiently cultivated ourselves for 
entering upon it, then, by that which we call death, 
will He annihilate for us this life, and introduce us to 
a new life, the product of our virtuous actions. All 
our life is His life. We are in His hand, and abide 
therein, and no one can pluck us out of His hand. 
We are eternal, because He is eternal. 

Sublime and Living Will! named by no name, 
compassed by no thought I I may well raise my soul 
to Thee, for Thou and I are not divided. Thy voice 
sounds within me, mine resoimds in Thee ; and all my 
thoughts, if they be but good and true, live in Thee 
also. In Thee, the Incomprehensible, I myself, and 



180 BOOK III. 

the world in which I Kve, become clearly compre- 
hensible to me; all the secrets of my existence are 
laid open, and perfect harmony arises in my soul. 

Thou art best known to the child -like, devoted, 
simple mind. To it Thou art the searcher of hearts, 
who seest its inmost depths; the ever-present true 
witness of its thoughts, who knowest its truth, who 
knowest it though all the world know it not. Thou 
art the Father who ever desirest its good, who rulest 
all things for the best. To Thy wiU it unhesitatingly 
resigns itself: " Do with me," it says, " what thou 
wilt; I know that it is good, for it is Thou who doest 
it." The inquisitive understanding, which has heard of 
Thee, but seen Thee not, would teach us thy nature ; 
and, as Thy image, shows us a monstrous and in- 
congruous shape, which the sagacious laugh at, and 
the wise and good abhor. 

I hide my &ce before Thee, and lay my hand 
upon my mouth. How Thou art, and seemest to 
Thine own being, I can never know, any more than I 
can assume Thy nature. After thousands upon thou- 
sands of spirit-lives, I shall comprehend Thee as little 
as I do now in this earthly house. That which I 
conceive, becomes finite through my very conception 
of it ; and this can never, even by endless exaltation, 
rise into the Infinite. Thou differest fi-om men, not 
in degree but in nature. In every stage of their ad- 
vancement they think of Thee as a greater 97ian, 
and still a greater ; but never as God — the Infinite, 
— whom no measure can mete. I have only this 
discursive, progressive thought, and I can conceive 
of no other: — how can I venture to ascribe it to 
Thee ? In the Idea of person there are imperfections. 



FAITH. 181 

limitations: — how can I clothe Thee with it without 
these ? 

I will not attempt that which the imperfection of 
my finite nature forbids, and which would be useleas 
to me : — how Thou art, I may not know. But Thy 
relations to me — the mortal — and to all mortals, lie 
open before my eyes : — let me be what I ought to be, 
and they will surround me more clearly than the con- 
sciousness of my own existence. Thou workest in me 
the knowledge of my duty, of my vocation in the world 
of reasonable beings: — how, I know not, nor need 
I to know. Thou hruywest what I think and what I 
will : — how Thou canst know, through what act thou 
bringest about that consciousness, I cannot understand, 
— nay, I know that the idea of an act, of a particular 
act of consciousness, belongs to me alone, and not to 
Thee, — the Infinite One. Thou wUlest that my free 
obedience shall bring with it eternal consequences : — 
the act of Thy will I cannot comprehend, I only 
know that it is not like mine. Thou doest, and Thy 
will itself is the deed ; but the way of Thy working 
is not as my ways, — I cannot trace it. Thou livest 
and arty for Thou knowest and wiliest and workest, 
omnipresent to finite Reason ; but Thou art not as / 
now and always must conceive of being. 



In the contemplation of these Thy relations to me, 
the finite being, will I rest in calm blessedness. I 
know immediately only what I ought to do. This 
wiU I do, impartially, joyfully, and without cavilHng 
or sophistry, for it is Thy voice which commands me 
to do it ; it is the part assigned to me in the spiritual 

Q2 



. 



182 BOOK m. I 

World-plan; and the power with which I shall perform 
it is Thy power. Whatever is commanded by that 
voice, whatever executed by that power, is, in that 
plan, assuredly and truly good. I remain tranquil amid 
all the events of this world, for they are in Thy world. 
Nothing can perplex or surprise or dishearten me, as 
surely as Thou livest, and I can look upon Thy life. 
For in Thee, and through Thee, O Infinite One ! do I 
behold even my present world in another light. Na- 
ture, and natural consequences, in the destinies and 
conduct of free beings, as opposed to Thee, become 
empty, unmeaning words. Nature is no longer ; Thou, 
only Thou, art. It no longer appears to me to be 
the end and purpose of the present world to produce 
that state of universal peace among men, and of un- 
limited dominion over the mechanism of nature, merely 
for its own sake ; — but that it should be produced by 
man himself, — and, since it is expected from ail, that 
it should be produced by cdl, as one great, free, moral, 
community. Nothing new and better for an individual 
shall be attainable, except through his own virtuous 
will ; nothing new and better for a community, except 
through the common will being in accordance with 
duty : — this is a fimdamental law of the great moral 
empire, of which the present life is a part. Thus is the 
good will of the individual so often lost to this world, 
because it is but the will of the individual, and the will 
of the majority is not in harmony with his ; — and then 
its results are to be foimd solely in a future world. 
Thus do even the passions and vices of men cooperate 
in the attainment of good, — not in and for themselves, 
for in this sense good can never come out of evil, — but 
by holding the balance against the opposite vices, and. 



FAITH. 183 

at last, by their excess, annihilatiiig these antagonists, 
and themselves with them. Oppression could never 
have gained the upper hand in human affairs, imless 
the cowardice, baseness, and mutual mistrust of men 
had smoothed the way to it. It will continue to in- 
crease, imtil it extirpate cowardice and slavishness; 
and despair itself at last reawaken courage. Then 
shall the two opposite vices have annihilated each 
other, and the noblest of all himian relations, lasting 
freedom, come forth from their antagonism. 

The actions of free beings have, strictly considered, 
only results in other free beings ; for in them, and for 
them alone, there is a world ; and that in which they 
all agree, is itself the world. But they have these 
results only through the Infinite Will, — the medium 
through which aU individual beings influence each 
other. But the announcement, the publication of this 
Will to us, is always a call to a particular duty. Thus 
even what we call evil in the world, the consequence of 
the abuse of freedom, exists only through Him ; and 
it exists for those who experience it only in so far as, 
through it, duties are laid upon them. Were it not 
in the eternal plan of our moral culture, and the cul- 
ture of our whole race, that precisely these duties 
should be laid upon us, they would not be so laid 
upon us ; and that through which they are laid upon 
us — i. e, what we call evil — would not have been pro- 
duced. In so far, everything that is, is good, and 
absolutely legitimate. There is but one world pos- 
sible, — a thoroughly good world. All that happens 
in this world is subservient to the improvement and 
culture of man, and, by means of this, to the promo- 
tion of the purpose of his earthly existence. It is this 



184 BOOK III. 

higher World-plan which we call Nature, when we 
say, — Nature leads men through want to industry; 
through the evils of general disorder to a just con- 
stitution; through the miseries of continual wars to 
endless peace on earth. Thy will, O Infinite One ! thy 
Providence alone, is this higher Nature. This, too, is 
best understood by artless simplicity, when it regards 
this life as a place of trial and culture, as a school for 
eternity; when, in all the events of life, the most trivial 
as well as the most important, it beholds thy guiding 
Providence disposing all for the best ; when it firmly 
believes that all things must work together for the good 
of those who love their duty, and who know Thee. 



Oh I I haye, indeed, dwelt in darkness during the 
past days of my life I I have indeed heaped error upon 
error, and imagined myself wise ! Now, for the first 
time, do I wholly understand the doctrine which from 
thy lips, O Wonderful Spirit! seemed so strange to 
me, although my understanding had nothing to oppose 
to it ; for now, for the first time, do I comprehend it 
in its whole compass, in its deepest foundations, and 
through all its consequences. 

Man is not a product of the world of sense, and 
the end of his existence cannot be attained in it. His 
vocation transcends Time and Space, and everything 
that pertains to sense. What he is, and to what he 
is to train himself, that he must know ; as his vocation 
is a lofty one, he must be able to raise his thoughts 
above all the limitations of sense. He must accomplish 
it: — ^where his being finds its home, there his thoughts, 
too, seek their dwelling-place; and the truly human 



FAITH. 185 

mode of thought, that which alone is worthy of him, 
that in which his whole spiritual strength is mani- 
fested, is that whereby he raises himself above those 
limitations, whereby all that pertains to sense vanishes 
into nothing, — into a mere reflection, in mortal eyes, 
the One, Self-existent Infinite, 

Many have raised themselves to this mode of thought 
without scientific inquiry, merely by their nobleness 
of heart and their pure moral instinct, because their 
life has been preeminently one of feeling and senti- 
ment. They have denied, by their conduct, the efli- 
ciency and reality of the world of sense, and made it 
of no account in regulating their resolutions and their 
actions ; whereby they have not indeed made it clear, 
by reasoning, that this world has no existence for the 
intellect. Those who could dare to say, " Our citizen- 
ship is in heaven; we have here no continuing city, 
but we seek one to come;" — those whose chief prin- 
ciple it was " to die to the world, to be bom again, 
and already here below to enter upon a new life," — 
certainly set no value whatever on the things of sense, 
and were, to use the language of the schools, practical 
Transcendental IdeaUsts. 

Others, who, besides possessing the natural prone- 
ness to mere sensuous activity which is common to 
us all, have also added to its power by the adoption 
of similar habits of thought, imtil they have got 
wholly entangled in it, and it has grown with their 
growth, and strengthened with their strength, can 
raise themselves above it, permanently and completely, 
only by persevering and conclusive thought; other- 
wise, with the purest moral intentions, they would be 
continually drawn down again by their understanding. 



1S6 BOOK III. 

and their whole being would remain a prolonged and 
insoluble contradiction. For these, the philosophy 
which I now, for the first time, thoroughly imder- 
stand, will be the first power that shall set fi-ee the 
imprisoned Pysche and unfold her wings, so that, 
hovering for a moment above her former self, she 
may cast a glance on her abandoned slough, and then 
soar upwards, thenceforward to Uve and move in higher 
spheres. 

Blessed be the hour in which I first resolved to in- 
quire into myself and my vocation I All my doubts 
are solved; I know what I can know, and have no 
apprehensions regarding that which I cannot know. 
I am satisfied; perfect harmony and clearness reign 
in my soul, and a new and more glorious spiritual 
existence begins for me. 

My entire complete vocation I cannot comprehend ; 
what I shall be hereafter transcends aU my thoughts. 
A part of that vocation is concealed firom me ; it is 
visible only to One, to the Father of Spirits, to whose 
care it is committed. I know only that it is sure, 
and that it is eternal and glorious like Himself But 
that part of it which is confided to myself, I know, 
and know it thoroughly, for it is the root of all my 
other knowledge. I know assuredly, in every moment 
of my life, what I ought to do ; and this is my whole 
vocation in so far as it depends on me. From this 
point, since my knowledge does not reach beyond it, 
I shall not depart; I shall not desire to know aught 
beyond this ; I shall take my stand upon this central 
point, and firmly root myself here. To this shall 
all my thoughts and endeavours, my whole powers, 



FAITH. 187 

be directed; my whole existence shall be interwoven 
with it. 

I ought, as &r as in me lies, to cultivate my un- 
derstanding and to acquire knowledge; — ^but only with 
the purpose of preparing thereby within me a larger 
field and wider sphere of duty. I ought to desire to 
have much ; — in order that much may be required of 
me. I ought to exercise my powers and capacities in 
every possible way; — ^but only in order to render myself 
a more serviceable and fitting instrument of duty, for 
until the commandment shall have been realized in the 
outward world, by means of my whole personality, I am 
answerable for it to my conscience. I ought to exhibit 
in myself, as far as I am able, humanity in all its com- 
pleteness ; — not for the mere sake of humanity, which 
in itself has not the slightest worth, but in order that 
virtue, which alone has worth in itself, may be ex- 
hibited, in its highest perfection, in human nature. I 
ought to regard myself, body and soul, with all that is 
in me or that belongs to me, only as a means of duty ; 
and only be solicitous to fulfil that, and to make myself 
able to fulfil it, as far as in me lies. But when the 
commandment, — provided only that it shall have been 
in truth the commandment which I have obeyed, and 
I have been really conscious only of the pure, single 
intention of obeying it, — ^when the commandment shall 
have passed beyond my personal being to its realization 
in the outward world, then I have no more anxiety 
about it, for thenceforward it is committed into the 
hands of the Eternal Will. Farther care or anxiety 
would be but idle self-torment ; would be unbeUef and 
distrust of that Infinite Will. I shall never dream of 
governing the world in His stead ; of listening to the 



188 BOOK m. 

voice of my own imperfect wisdom, instead of to His 
voice in my conscience ; or of substituting the partial 
views of a short-sighted individual for His vast plan 
which embraces the universe. I know that thereby 
I should lose my own place in His order, and in the 
order of all spiritual being. 

As with calmness and devotion I reverence this higher 
Providence, so in my actions ought I to reverence the 
freedom of other beings aroimd me. The question for 
me is not what they, according to my conceptions, 
ought to do, but what I may venture to do in order to 
induce them to do it. I can only desire to act imme> 
diately on their conviction and their will, as far as the 
order of society and their own consent will permit ; 
but by no means, without their conviction and con- 
sent, to influence their powers and relations. They do, 
what they do, on their own responsibility : with this I 
neither can nor dare intermeddle, and the Eternal Will 
will dispose all for the best. It concerns me more to 
respect their freedom, than to hinder or prevent what 
to me seems evil in its use. 



In this point of view I become a new creature, and 
my whole relations to the existing world are changed. 
The ties by which my mind was formerly united to 
this world, and by whose secret guidance I followed 
all its movements, are for ever sundered, and I stand 
free, calm and immovable, a imiverse to myself No 
longer through my affections, but by my eye alone, do 
I apprehend outward objects and am connected with 
them ; and this eye itself is purified by freedom, and 
looks, through error and deformity, to the True and 



FAITH. 189 

Beautiful, as upon tiie unruffled surface of water forms 
are more purely mirrored in a milder light. 

My mind is for ever closed against embarrassment 
and perplexity, against uncertainty, doubt, and anxiety; 
— my heart, against grief, repentance, and desire. 
There is but one thing that I may Imow, — namely, 
what I ought to do ; and this I always know in&llibly. 
Concerning all else I know nothing, and know that 
I know nothing. I firmly root myself in this my 
ignorance^ and refrain &om harassing myself with con- 
jectures concerning that of whidi I know nothing. 
No occurrence in this world can affect me either 
with joy or sorrow ; calm and unmoved I look down 
upon all things, for I know that I cannot explain a 
single event, nor comprehend its connexion with that 
which alone concerns me. All that happens belongs 
to the plan of the Eternal World, and is good in its 
place : thus much I know ; — what in this plan is pure 
gain, what is only a means for the removal of some 
existing evil, what therefore ought to afford me more 
or less satisfaction, I know not. In His world all 
things prosper; — this satisfies me, and in this belief 
I stand fast as a rock: — but what in His world is 
merely the germ, what the blossom, and what the fruit 
itself, I know not. 

The only matter in which I can be concerned is 
the progress of reason and morality in the world of 
reasonable beings; and this only for its own sake, — 
for the sake of this progress. Whether I or some 
one else be the instrument of this progress, whether 
it be my deed or that of another which prospers or 
is prevented, is of no importance to me. I regard 
myself merely as one of the instruments for carrying 



190 BOOK in. 

out the purpose of reason; I respect, love, or feel 
an interest in myself only as such, and desire the 
Buccessftd issue of my deed only in so far as it pro- 
motes this purpose. I regard all the events of this 
world, in the same way, only with reference to this 
one purpose ; whether they proceed from me or from 
others, whether they relate directly to me or to others. 
My breast is steeled against annoyance on account of 
personal offences and vexations, or exultation in per- 
sonal merit ; for my whole personality has disappeared 
in the contemplation of the purpose of my being. 

Should it ever seem to me as if truth had been put 
to silence, and virtue expelled from the world ; as if 
folly and vice had now simimoned all their powers, 
and even assumed the place of reason and true wisdom; 
should it happen, that just when all good men looked 
with hope for the regeneration of the human race, 
everything should become even worse than it had been 
before ; should the work, well and happily begun, on 
which the eyes of all true-minded men were fixed with 
joyous expectation, suddenly and unexpectedly be 
changed into the vilest forms of evil, — these things 
will not disturb me ; and as little will I be persuaded 
to indulge in idleness, neglect, or false security, on 
account of an apparent rapid growth of enUghtenment, 
a seeming diffusion of freedom and independence, an 
increase of more gentle manners, peacefulness, docility, 
and general moderation among men, as if now every- 
thing were attained. Thus it appears to me ; or rather 
it is so, for it is actually so to me; and I know in 
both cases, as indeed I know in all possible cases, what 
I have next to do. As to everything else, I rest in 
the most perfect tranquillity, for I know nothing what- 



FAITH. 191 

ever about any other thing. Those, to me, so sorrowful 
events may, in the plan of the Eternal One, be the direct 
means for the attainment of a good result; — ^that strife 
of evil against good may be their last decisive struggle, 
and it may be permitted to the former to assemble all 
its powers for this encoimter only to lose them, and 
thereby to exhibit itself in all its impotence. These, 
to me, joyful appearances may rest on very imcertain 
foimdations; — what I had taken for enlightenment may 
perhaps be but hollow superficiality, and aversion to 
all true ideas; what I had taken for independence, 
but imbridled passion ; what I had taken for gentle- 
ness and moderation, but weakness and indolence. I 
do not indeed know this, but it might be so ; and then 
I should have as little cause to mourn over the one as 
to rejoice over the other. But I do know, that I live 
in a world which belongs to the Supreme Wisdom and 
Goodness, who thoroughly comprehends its plan, and 
will infallibly accompUsh it ; and in this conviction I 
rest, and am blessed. 

That there are free beings, destined to reason and 
morality, who strive against reason, and call forth all 
their powers to the support of folly and vice ; — just as 
little will this disturb me, and stir up within me indig- 
nation and wrath. The perversity which would hate 
what is good because it is good, and promote evil 
merely from a love of evil as such, — this perversity 
which alone could excite my just anger, I ascribe to no 
one who bears the form of man, for I know that it does 
not lie in human nature. I know that for all who act 
thus, there is really, in so far as they act thus, neither 
good nor evil, but only an agreeable or disagreeable 
feeling ; that they do not stand under their own do- 



1^ BOOK III. 

minion^ bat under the power of Nature; and that it is 
not themselves, but this nature in them, which seeks 
the former, and flies from the latter with all its str^zkgth, 
without regard to whether it be, otherwise, good or 
eviL I know that bemg, once for all, what they are, 
they oaanot act in any respect otherwise than as they 
do act, and I am very far from getting angry with ne- 
cessity, or indulging in wrath against blind and un- 
conscious Nature. In this indeed lies thdr guilt and 
their unworthiness, that they are what they are ; and 
that, in place of being free and independent, they 
hare resigned themselves to the eurrent of natural 
nnpulse* 

It is this alone which could excite my indignation ; 
but here I should fall into absolute absurdity. I cannot 
call iiiem to account for their want of freedom, without 
first attributing to them the power of making themr- 
selves free. I wish to be angry with them, and find 
no object fi:>r my wrath. What they actually areyiloes 
not deserve my anger; what might deserve it, they 
are not, and they would not deserve it, if they were. 
My displeasure would strike an impalpable nonentity. 
I must indeed always treat them, and address them, as 
if they were what I well know they are not ; I must 
always suppose in them that whereby alone I can ap- 
proach them, and communicate with them. Duty 
commands me to act towards them accc»rding to a 
conception of them, the opposite of that whidi I arrive 
at by contemplating them. And thus it may certainly 
happen, that I turn towards them with a noble in- 
dignation, as if they were free, in order to arouse 
within them a similar indignation against themselves, 
— an indignation which in my own heart I cannot 



FAITH. 19S 

reasonably entertain. It is only the practical man of 
society within me whose anger is excited by folly and 
vice; not the contemplative man who reposes undis- 
turbed in the calm completeness of his own spirit. 

Should I be visited by corporeal suffering, pain, or 
disease, I cannot avoid feeling them, for they are 
accidents of my nature ; and as long as I remain here 
below, I am a part of Nature. But they shall not 
grieve me. They can only touch the nature with 
which, in a wonderful manner, I am united, — not 
myself, the being exalted above all Nature. The sure 
end of all pain, and of all sensibility to pain, is death ; 
and of all things which the mere natural man is wont 
to regard as evils, this is to me the least. I shall not 
die to myself, but only to others ; to those who remain 
behind, from whose fellowship I am torn : — for myself 
the hour of Death is the hour of Birth to a new, more 
excellent life. 

Now that my heart is closed against all desire for 
earthly things, now that I have no longer any sense 
for the transitory and perishable, the universe appears 
before my eyes clothed in a more glorious form. The 
dead heavy mass, which did but stop up space, has 
vanished; and in its place there flows onward, with 
the rushing music of mighty waves, an eternal stream 
of life and power and action which issues from the 
original Source of all life — from Thy Life, Infinite 
One I for all life is Thy Life, and only the reUgious 
eye penetrates to the realm of True Beauty. 

I am related to Thee, and what I behold around 
me is related to me; all is life and blessedness, and 
regards me with bright spirit-eyes, and speaks with 
spirit-voices to my heart. In all the forms that sur- 

R 3 



Id4 BOOK in. 

round me, I behold the reflection of my own being, 
broken up into countless dirersified shapes, as the 
morning sun, broken in a thousand dew-drops, sparkles 
towards itself. 

Thy Life, as alone the finite mind can conceiye 
it, is self-forming, self-manifesting Will: — this Life, 
clothed to the eye of the mortal with manifold sen- 
suous forms, flows forth through me, and Ihroughout 
the immeasurable imiverse of Nature. Here^ it streams 
as self-creating and self-forming matter through my 
veins and muscles, and pours its abundance, into thJe 
tree, the flower, the grass. Creative life flows forth in 
one continuous stream, drop on drop^ through all forms 
and into all places where my eye can follow it ; and 
reveals itself to me, in a different shape in each various 
comer of the universe, as the same power by which in 
secret darkness my own frame was formed. Therey in 
free play, it leaps and dances as spontaneous motion in 
the animal, and manifests itself in each new form as a 
new, peculiar, self-subsisting world: — the same power 
which, invisibly to me, moves and animates my own 
framCr Everything that lives and moves follows this 
universal impulse, this one principle of all motion, 
which, from one end of the imiverse to the other, 
guides the harmonious movement ;.— in the animal 
wUlwut freedom ; in me, from whom in the visible 
world the motion proceeds although it has not its 
source in me, with freedom. 

But pure and holy, and as near to Thine own nature 
as aught can be to mortal eye, does this Thy Life flow 
forth as the bond which unites spirit with spirit, as 
the breath and atmosphere of a rational world, un- 
imaginable and incomprehensible, and yet there, clearly 



FAITH. 195 

visible to the spirittial eye. Borne oitwards in this 
stream of light, thought floats from soul to soul, with- 
out pause or variation, and returns purer and brighter 
from a kindred mind. Through this mysterious union 
does each individual perceive, understand, and love him- 
self only in another ; every soul developes itself only 
by means of other souls, and there axe no longer 
individual men, but only one humanity ; no individual 
thought or love or hate, but only thought, love, and 
hate, in and through each other. Through this won^ 
drous influence does the affinity of spirits in the invisible 
world permeate even their physical nature; mani- 
fest itself in two sexes, which, even if that spiritual 
bond could be torn asunder, would, simply as creatures 
of nature, be compelled to love each other ; flow forth 
in the tenderness of parents and children, brothers 
and sisters, as if the souls were of one blood like the 
bodies, and their minds were branches and blossomis 
of the same stem ; and from these, embrace, in nar- 
rower or wider circles, the whole sentient world. Even 
at the root of their hate, there lies a thirst after 
love ; and no enmity springs up but from friendship 
denied. 

Through that which to others seems a dead mass, 
my eye beholds this eternal life and movement in every 
vein of sensible and spiritual Nature, and sees this life 
rising in ever-increasing growth, and ever purifying 
itself to a more spkitual expression. The universe is to 
me no longer that ever-recurring circle, that eternally- 
repeated play, that monster swallowing itself up, only 
to bring itself forth again as it was before ; it has be- 
come transfigured before me, and now bears the one 
stamp of spiritual life, — a constant progress towards 



196 BOOK III. 

higher perfection in a line that runs out into the 
Infinite. 

The sun rises and sets, the stars sink and re- 
appear, and all the spheres hold their circle-dance ; but 
they never return again as they disappeared, and even 
in the bright fountain of life itself there is life and 
progress. Every hour which they lead on, every mor- 
ning, and every evening, sinks with new increase upon 
the world ; new life and new love descend from the 
spheres Uke dew-drops from the clouds, and encircle 
nature as the cool night the earth. 

All Death in nature is Birth, and in Death itself 
appears visibly the exaltation of Life. There is no de- 
structive principle in Nature, for Nature throughout 
is pure, unclouded life; it is not death which kills, 
but the new life, which, concealed behind the former, 
begins, and developes itself. Death and Birth are 
but the struggle of life with itself to assume a more 
glorious and congenial form. And my death, — how 
can it be aught else, since I am not a mere show and 
semblance of life, but bear within me the one original, 
true, and essential Life ? It is impossible to conceive 
that Nature should annihilate a life which does not 
proceed from her; the Nature which exists for me, 
and not I for her. 

Yet even my natural life, even this mere outward 
manifestation to mortal sight of the inward invisible 
Life, she cannot destroy without destroying herself, — 
she who only exists for me, and on account of me, and 
exists not if I am not. Precisely because she destroys 
me, must she animate me anew ; it is only my higher 
life, unfolding itself in her, before which my present 
life can disappear ; and what mortals call Death is the 



FAITH. 197 

Tisible appearance of a second Life. Did no reasonable 
being who had once beheld the light of this world die^ 
there would be no ground to look with faith for a new 
heavens and a new earth ; the only possible purpose of 
Nature, to manifest and maintain Reason, would be ful- 
filled here below, and her circle would be completed. 
But the act by which she consigns a free and inde- 
pendent being to death, is her own solemn entrance, 
intelKgible to all Reason, into a region beyond this 
act itself, and beyond the whole sphere of existence 
which is thereby closed. Death is the ladder by which 
my spiritual eye ascends to a new Life, and a new 
Nature. 

Every one of my feUow-creatures, who leaves this 
earthly brotherhood, and whom my spirit cannot re- 
gard as annihilated, — because he is my brother, — draws 
my thoughts after him beyond the grave ; — he is still, 
and to him belongs a place. While we mourn for 
him here below, as in the dim realms of imconsdous- 
ness there might be mourning when a man bursts from 
them into the Ught of this world's sun, above there is 
rejoicing that a man is bom into that world, as we 
citizens of the earth receive with joy those who are 
bom unto us. When I shall one day follow, there will 
be but joy for me ; sorrow shall remain behind in the 
sphere I shall have left. 

The world, on which but now I gazed with wonder, 
passes away from before me, and sinks from my sight. 
With all the ftJness of life, order, and increase which 
I beheld in it, it is yet but the curtain by which one 
infinitely more perfect is concealed from me, and 
the germ from which that other shall develope itself 
My Faith looks behind this veil, and cherishes and 



198 BOOK III. FAITH. 

animates this germ. It sees nothing definite, but it 
expects more than it can conceive here below, more 
than it will ever be able to conceive in all time. 



Thus do I live, thus am I, and thus am I unchange- 
able, firm, and completed for all Eternity; — for this 
is no existence assumed from without, — it is my own, 
true, essential life and being. 



THE END. 



PJilNTED BT ROBERT HARDIB A OOMPANT, 
VBEDEJUOK STREET, EDINBUBGH. 



FICHTE'S POPULAR WORKS AND LIFE. 



JUST PUBLISHED, 



Memoir of Johann Gottlieb Fiohte. 



By William Smith. 
price 4b. 6d. 



Second EditioD, Post Octavo, cloth boards, 



« .... A Life of Flchtc ftJl of 
nobleness and instmctioiif of grand pur- 
pose, tender feeling, and brave effort; 
.... the compilation of whicli is exe- 
cuted with great Judgment and fidelity."— 

^ The material trials that Fichte encoun- 
tered in the body are lost sight of in the 
spiritual contest which he maintained with 
his own mind. The page that keeps the 
record of incidents is dignified throughout 
by the strong moral light that fidls every- 
where upon it lilce a glory, and sweetened 
by a living episode that flows through its 
dark and bright places like a stream of 
music." — Atftenceum. 



'*We state Fichte's character as it is 
known and admitted by men of all parties 
among the Germans, when we say that so 
robust an intellect, a soul so calm, so lofty, 
massive, and immovable, has not mingled 
in philosophical discussion since the time 
of Luther. .... Fichte's opinions may 
be true or fiilse; but his character as a 
thinker can be slightly valued only by such 
as know it ill ; and as a man approved by 
action and suffering, in his life and in his 
death, he ranks with a class of men who 
who were common only in bett^ ages than 
ours." — State qf Oerman Literaiurej by Tho- 
9nas Carole, 



II. 



The Vocatioii of the Scholar. 

Translated by William Smith. 

"•The Vocation of the Scholar* • . . . 
is distinguished by the same high moral 
tone, and manly, vigorous expression which 
characterize all Fichte's works in the Ger- 
man, and is nothing lost in Mr. Smith's 
clear, unembarrassed, and thoroughly Eng- 
lish translation."— Z)ou0r/ctt JerrokTs Paper. 

** We are glad to see this excellent trans- 
lation of one of the best of Fichte's works 



Post Octavo, cloth boards, price 2s. 

presented to the public in a very neat form 
.... No class needs an earnest and 
sincere spirit more than the literary class ; 
and therefore the ' Vocation of the Scholar,* 
the ' Guide of the Human Race,* written in 
Fichte's most earnest, most commanding 
temper, will be welcomed in its English 
dress by public writers, and be beneficial to 
the cause of truth." — Economist. 



III. 

The Hatare of the Scholar and its HanifestationB. 



Translated by William Smith. 
boards, price 3s. 6d. 

" With great satisfaction we welcome this 
first English translation of an author who 
occupies the most exalted position as a 
profound and original thinker; as an ir- 
resistible orator in the cause of what he 
believed to be truth; as a thoroughly honest 
and heroic man. .... The appeutmce 
of any of his works in our language is, we 

belie\'e, a perfect novelty These 

orations are admirably fitted for their pur- 
pose ; so grand is the position taken by the 
lecturer, and so irresistible their eloquence." 
—Examiner. 

'* A pure and exalted morality and deep 



Second Edition, Post Octavo, cloth 



religions feeling breathes throughout the 
whole."— /ruA MontlUy Maganne. 

** This work must inevitably arrest the 
attention of the scientific physician, by the 
grand q)irituality of its doctrines, and the 
pure morality it teaches. .... Shall 
we be presumptuous if we recommend these 
views to our professional brethren? or if 
we say to the enlightened, the thoughtfti], 
the serious, This— if yon be true Sdiolars— 
is your Vocation ? We know not a higher 
morality than this, or more noble principles 
than these : they are flill of truth."— flrtttWk 
and Foreign MecHeo-CMrurgkal Review. 



FicWs Popular Works. 



IT. 



The y ooation of Han. 



Translated by William Smith. Post Octavo, cloth bds. price 4s. 6d. 



" In the progreas of my present work, I 
hare taken a deeper glance into religion 
than eyer I did before. In me the emotions 
of the heart proceed only ftom perfect in- 
tellectnal deamess:— it cannot be but that 
the deamess I have now attained on this 
sabiect Shan also take possearion of my 
heart "~/VcA«e'« Ckim^piondenee. 

"'The Vocatiok of Mak' is, as Fidite 
tmly says, tntelligtble to aU readers who are 
really able to understand a book at all ; and 
as tiie history of the mind tn its various 
phases of doubt, knowledge, and lUth, it is 
of interest to alL Agree with Fiohte, or dis- 
agree with him, you cannot help being car- 
ried along by his earnestness; yon cannot 
help being struck with his subtlety and 
depth. Argument, in such a matt^, ¥re 
take to be wholly indifferent A book of this 
stamp is sure to teach yon much, because it 



The Characteristics of fhe Present Age. 

Translated by William Smith. Post Octavx>, cloth boards, price 78. 



excites thought If it rouses you to combat 
his condnsions, it has done a good work; 
for in that very effort you are stirred to a 
consideration of points which have hither- 
to escaped your indolent acQuisesoence. "" — 
Foreign Quarterly Review. 

^ This is Fichte*s most popular work, and 
is every way remarkable. Aware tiiat the 
great public was ftilly competent to grapple 
with the most arduous problCTis of philoso- 
phy, when hiddly stated, however it mi^ht 
shrink from the jargon of the schools, Fichte 
undertook to present his opinions in a popu- 
lar form.** — AUcu. 

'* It appears to us the boldest and most 
emphatic attempt that has yet been made 
to explain to man his restless and uncon- 
querable desire to win the True and the 
EtemaL*' ~ " 



"• A noble and most notable aequiritlon 
to the literature of England.**— Ztoti^&M Jer- 
roUTs Weekly Paper. 

*' We accept these lectures as a true and 
most admirable delineation of the present 
age; and on this ground alone we should 
bestow on them our heartiest recommenda- 
tion; but it is because they teach us how 
we may rise above the age, that we bestow 
on them our most emphatic praise. 



" He makes us think, and perhaps more 
sublimely than we have ever formerly 
thought, but it is only in order that we may 
the more nobly act 

" As a miyjestic and most stirring utter- 
ance from the lips of the greatest German 
prophet, we trust that the book wiU find a 
response in many an English soul, and 
potently hdp to regenerate English sodety.** 
— OrUic. 



VI. 
The Popular Works of Johaan Gottlieb Fichte. 

With a Memoir of the Authoe by William Smith. Volume First, 
contaming — 1. MsMoia of Fiohtk — 2. The Vocation of the Scho- 
LAB — 3. The Natube of the Scholae — 4. The Vooatioh of Man — 
Post Octavo, cloth boards, price 128. 

Voluvne Second vnU contain — ^1. The CharacterisHos of the Present Age. 
2. The Doctrine of Religion, 

VII. 
The Way towards the Blessed Life; or, The Doctrine of 

Beligion. Translated by William Smith. — (Preparing for 
Publication.) 




-r^^ Af iS- j-<pJlJ-. jy JLjL jg ^ljL ^ 



LONDOK, 142, STaAITD, 

September 20th, 1851 




A LIST 



MR. CHAPMAN'S 



^uMimtiniii 




*<«^ 



MR. CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 



-'^^s^ 

$ 



Mm WukB, 



NOBIC A ; or, Tales of Niirenberg from the Olden Time. After a Manu- 
script of the 16th Century. Translated from the German of August 
Hagen. Fcp. Svo., ornamental hinding. Nearly Ready. 



LECTUBES ON POLITICAL ECONOMY. Jij^ru^cm 

William Newman, Author of " Phases of Faith," " BBstory of the 
Hebrew Monarchy," &c. Post 8vo, cloth, la, Qd. 



** This most able and instructive book. I 
which exhibits, we think, no less moral | 



than economical wiaAom,**-'Pro»peetive 
Rffvifffo* 



THE CBEED OF CHEISTENDOM ; its Foundations and 
Superstructure. By Wiluam Rathbonb Greg. 8vo, cloth, lOs. 6d. 

" Wm rank high with those critical and 
erudite works which have of late cleared 
up so many obscure matters in the history 
of religrion, corrected so many false theo- 
ries, dispelled so many errors, and done so 
much to bring into harmony, science, and 
religion, the voice of Nature, and the voice 
of OodJ*— Economist. 

** In a calm, dispassionate manner, and in 
a style peculiarly elegant, and, at the same 
time, arjgrumentative, the momentous ques- 
tions ofrevelation, Christianity, and a fu- 
ture state, are discussed. There is no dog- 
matism, no assertion, no arriving with an 
undue haste at irrelevant conclusions in its 
pages; but there are to be found all the 
evidences of profound study, scholarship, 
much reading, more thinking, and cer- 
tainly there is every indication of sincerity 
and truth. It will arouse a spirit of in- 
quiry where that is dormant, and will take 
its place among those suggestive and intel- 



ligent works which are now becoming the 
moral alphabets of a new generation.'' — 
Weekly Dispatch. 

** He appears to us to have executed his 
task with thorough honesty of purpose* 
and in a spirit essentially reverential— in a 
style clear, animated, and often eloquent, 
and, for one who disclaims the poesession 
of learning, with no small amount of criti- 
cal knowledge and philosophic endo-w^ 
ment."— Prospective Review. 

" No candid reader of the * Creed of 
Christendom' can close the book without 
the secret acknowledgment that it is a 
model of honest investigation and clear 
exposition; that it is conceived in the true 
spirit of serious and faithAil research ; and 
that whatever the author wants of being aa 
, ecclesiastical Christian, is plainly not essen- 
tial to the noble guidance of life, and the 
' devout earnestness of the affections.*' — 
Westminster Beviem, 



r<0^ 



--^ 




<^ 



'^^t^i 



MR CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 



$ 



CHBISTIM ASPECTS OF 

courses by John James Tayleb, 

'* AboundB with lessons of the highest 
practical wisdom conveyed in language of 
consummate beauty."— in<M«<rer. 

** These sermons are admirable. They 
partake more directly of the character of 
religious instruction, and possess vastlv 
more literary merit than is usual in such 
compositions. The thought is arranged 
with great clearness, and the stjrle for its 
lucid and felicitous phraseology is beyond 
all praise. The greatest charm of the whole 
volume, however, is its fine spirit. All the 
writer's human sympathies are generous 



FAITH AND DUTY, wb- 

B.A. Post 8vo, cloth, 7«. 6<?. 

and elevated, and his religious feelings and 

aspirations pure and fervent « We 

are sure that many will thank us for com- 
mending to them a volume flrom which 
such catholic views and elevated sentiments 
may be derived.**— i\r<w«w%/br»»i«*. 

•*^ Marked by much fervid sincerity, 
plain and clear language, by calm, quiet 

frood taste. The business and duties o. 
ife are viewed under a Christian aspect, 
and the object of elevating and improving 
the human character is never lost sight of." 
—BamomUU 



I 



THE COTTON AND COMMEECE OF INDIA considered 

in relation to the Interests of Great Britain ; with Remarks on Bailway 
Communication in the Bombay Presidency. By John Chapman, 
Founder and late Manager of the Great Indian Peninsular Railway 
Company. 8vo, cloth, 12*. 

rftfWd, Bo f&T Bfl tli£y Qxt«id, his survej 
ami rbaractej- of diilrirts, hi§ concleislaiiB 
as to the HUFtpIy th* ^ruih rmi yipldn and 
his lussi^rtlun Uiat thu cost ol tniiiilt \a wtUi 
ludiuii cotton the artt ftnd rullfig element 
of prteo.*'— JJtfi/^ J^etKit. 

'" Mtr CliopmiiT/i vnrk is only appjt^i- 
abli^ in Xho ftilTiesfl of I tj value 4iid meritB 
by those who nn* inti;ir^t«d jii Dtte or other 
brtujch of iiifi fi^iil>Jeft. Fkiil of dAla for 
ti'Bion'iav* r^pleU.' with facta to which the 
niofn ;itr>pliiiit firedit may be ii.tta(Jied, and 
free froiti any poliUcnl tiUMij tl]e Tuluine Ie 
thai rara^ if not intagniia titiXj 4 tnUli- 
ful hlMe book* a Vulume of i>lu£ii§tieR not 
conkt'tt up to niii^t a tlivtiij or defend a 
prucl ic€."—Bn tfimi ia , 

'^ A tnu^t Valuable volunio.*'— If tmiS 

" Tlio arran^^mpnt Is clear, and Uh: 
trtTttEiH'iit uf tlic^ KUbJfet in aJl etuee mas- 

'- An Mtfemtly luluubM wufk» and will. 
Yii.' hiivc no dunbt, elaim u- largn.* shary of 
puttiie ikitt-niiuu from the liLrge amu'imt of 
lEjJariiiiiitLtKii Lteontaiiii^tH^'J tbeeareftiJ eon-. 
SLJLiiLifjiii man nor iu which the invtu^iittn- 
tKnt oi tLte fiulieet ha^ bmn cxniiiJuctcfL^'^ 
A'iii^slin-try lirjiorter. 

'* TJit^ JA fi coinpreJienplve^ prajPtleoJ, 
cartrui, urn I tiJniiitijrttti} invesUvatloD/* jS«j. 



** Promises to be one of the most useftil 
treatises that have been furnished on this 
important subject It is distin- 
guished by a close and logical style, coupled 
with an accuracy of detail which will. In a 

^-eat measure, render it a text-book."— 
imest Jan. 22, 1851. 

" This book will go far to forestall the 
inquiries to be instituted by Mr. Alexander 
Mackay for the Manchester Chamber of 
Commerce. . . . Mr. Chajpman examines 
the subject in detail and gives ample rea^ 
sons for his deductions. . . . His work is 
marked, too, by sound good sense, aldn to 
the highest wisdom of the statesman. The 
author has given to the public the most 
complete book we have for some time met 
with on any subject." — Economist. 

" Mr. Chapman's great practical know- 
ledge and experience of the subjects upon 
which he treats has enabled him to col- 
lect an amount of information, founded 
upon facts, such as we believe has never 
before been laid before the public. The all- 
important questions of supply, production, 
and prices of cotton in India, as well as the 
commercial and financial questions con- 
nected with it, are most ably treated."— 
Morning Chronicle. 

** Written by an intelligent, painstaking, 

and well-informed gentleman 

Nothing can be more correct than his 



-^ 



i^St^- 



-ft«^ 



MB. CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 



t 



k 



SOCIAL STATICS ; or, the Conditions essential to Human Happi- 
ness Specified, and the First of them Developed. By Hesbebt Spbh- 
CER. 8vo, cloth, 12s. 
*' It is the most eloquent, the most i the rights of men in society. The book will 
Interesting, the most clearly expressed and i mark an epoch in the literature of scientific 
logically reasoned work, with views the I morality."— £(;onomis<. 
most orif^nal, that has appeared in the I ** We remember no work on ethics, 
science of social polity.*'— Xt^erary &a- ' since that of Spinoza, to be compared with 
zette. ' it in the simplicitr of its premises, and the 

** The author of the present work is no • logical rigour witn which a complete sys- 
ordinary thinker, and no ordinary writer ; tem of scientific ethici is evolved from 
and he gives, in language that sparkles them. This is high praise, but we give it 
with beauties and reasoning, at once novel I deliberately."— I^otf^. 
and elaborate, precise and logical, a very I **A very interesting and beautifully 
comprehensive and complete exposition of logical yrork.'*—Nancoi\formut. 

LETTEBS ON THE LAWS OF MAN'S NATURE 

and Development. By H. G. Atkinson and Harriet Mabtinbau. 
Post 8vo, cloth, 9«. 

" Of th& muny t^mbrkaMe fftits related 
In (hie iMJok yrfi cm Jtajr httl*> jh^it. What 
mtlit-r »ti\ki^ »i is ttie elr^vntirii^ influence 
of ati flu(r|tiiDw](?dgemi?nt wf titii-i'^ry in any 
form at ul!, Fti ^tit*i ot nil \fnn we have 
uid, tiwn is a. tune In Mr. Atkinson's 
thoufUts fur uboye Uinst' t>( luin^f of us who 
livo In tljiTfify tn A^ily --j^tij^^n nee. The 

world U iiwful to him— > s sacred. 

liowt'Vflf wtldiv hi^ II !■: in search 

of It, truth Ls uU Lj r ^N I . . es to live. 

If liL' is dupiiiitic, Ji.' I- 1. . ; if he is 

dry hit; ui> tht' to II II iii ill tM UV. ^et to him 
111^ i» iuAy* ]^' tlov- nut i^ni'o For fame. 
Tar wtialtU, for funk, (nr n-oiiriition, for 
anythinff. except to ilad truili and to live 
beautifully by it ; and all this because he 
feels the unknown and terrible forces which 
are busy at the warp and woof of the mar- 
vellous existence."— FrazCT^s Mugazine. 

*' A book from the reasonings and con- 
clusions of which we are bound to express 
our entire dissent, but to which it is im- 
possible to deny the rare merit of strictest 
nonesty of purpose, as an investigation 
into a subject of the highest importance, 
upon which the wisest of us is almost 
entirely ignorant, begun witli a sincere 
desire to penetrate the mystery and ascer- 
tain the truth, pursued with a brave resolve 
to shrink from no results to which that 
inquiry might lead, and to state them. 



whatever reception they might have from 
the world."— ^«c. 

** A curious and valuable contribution to 
psychological science, and we regard it 
with interest, as containing the best and 
fullest development of the new theories of 
mesmerism, clairvoyance, and the kindred 
hypotheses. The book is replete with pro- 
found reflections thrown out incidentally, 
is distinguished by a peculiar elegance of 
style, and in the hands of a calm and 
philosophical theologian may serve as a 
useful precis of the most formidable diffi- 
culties ne has to contend against in the 
present day. "—ITce/t/y News. 

" The Letters are remarkable for the 
analytical powers which characterize them, 
and will be eagerly read by all those who 
appreciate the value of the assertion, that 
*Tne proper study of mankind is man.' 
The range of reading which they embody 
is no less extensive than the sincerity as 
well as depth of thought and earnestness 
in the search after truth which are their 
principal features. Without afibctation or 
pedantry, faults arrived at by so easy a 
transition, they are marked by simplicity 
of diction, by an ease and grace of lan- 
guage and expression that gives to a sub- 
ject, for the most part intricate and per- 
plexing, an inexpressible charm,*'— Weekly 
Dispatch. 



SOCIAL ASPECTS. Byjo™ 

a Life History." Post 8vo, cloth, 

"This work isthe production of athought- 
ful mind, and of an ardent and earnest 
spirit, and is well deserving of a peruss.! in 
extenso by all those who reflect on so so- 
lemn and important a theme as the future 
destiny of their native country."— Jlfom- 

whose merits we can hardly 



ing Chronicle. 

** A work of T 

speak too Yi\%ti\v."— Literary Otizette. 

** This book has awakened in us many 

Gainful thoughts and intense feelings. It 
I fearfully true— passionate in its upbraid- 



Stores Smith, author of " Mirabean, 

price 6s. 

ings, unsparing In its exposures— yet full 
of wisdom, and pervaded by an earnest 
loving spirit. The author sees things as 
they are— too sad and too real for silence — 
and courageously tells of them with stem 

and honest truth We receive with 

pleasure a work so free from polite lisp- 
ings, pretty theorizings, and canting pro- 
gressionisms ; speaking, as it does, earnest 
truth, fearlessly but in lore."— Noncon^ 
fornUst. 



BELIGIOUS SCEPTICISM AND INEIDELirT: their 

History, Cause, Cure, and Mission. By John Alfred Langford. 



Post 8vo, cloth, 6«. 



$^<si«-- 




l^t»^^ 



MR. CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 



THE PEOGBESS OF THE INTELLECT, a^ exemplified in 

the Religious Developments of the Greeks and Hebrews. By R. W. 

Mackay, M. a. 2 vols. 8vo, cloth, price 24«. 

"Mf. MucrkEiy brltip ff>rwflr<l in Biipixjrt 

othli vif^w§ fin amount at Dnjditlou wliirh 

will itK^vti fqrmidable to hJs untnguniiits. 

^[ast of L}ie bc-at Ocfrmiin edktJorJs tif t\m 




Grffk uiid Lutln eIa*sk-8 weuj to be per- 
fwUy riLniJlJiir to tbc author, who knows 
well how to wield iui-'b poonerou^ tiitite- 
rialB, . , . , The account of th*; tijensfijilij 
of A^rijitotle, (?Evifn jn ibe first volumes Ih 
eiEd^ntty th^ production of a muster of the 

'*'The Promts of the Intwllecf la iii- 
coiflpam^i^y ini; most Important contrtbu- 
tloii yet made bj any Enelitlt wrltt^T to 
views first b road Ir put forth lpj' ratiiJiULlisti!; 
Geniiazi Theo]o^iaA«, Ho hiuvidonod their 
hmiB — (jjvi'ii tliem frrer ecopc and larger 
iLiinB^ supported thcui by titorts of ns 
TBJ-10U3 and accumulated li^Hrrjlnp, and 
Lmpurted to iiumi 6*11 tim aipnity whmrb curt 
be ilerfvi[^ from a $otscT and weighty atylo 
of wrltfii|r» and froni prot-efiiiep of thouif^hl 
toirhich iiDa^lniitton und rt>ftBoni!;ontrlbute 
in atmoit erjuul degme.e* This it uiiu&ual 
prrtlse; iMit it Ih dUf? to unusual jiowprg j 
and to Nb.> [.TtfETPd to ^fr.Muclcuy quite apart 
from any uffreement in the tendency or 
Hbject of hirt trc&tiM'. Wif will not i?v«j 
Mf tli^t we hav£v ivad Uwi(h Eutficlent enre 
or critical guidance to be entitled to ofter 
ftn oplnicn ofi tlit^Noiiniintaiuf m cfltl^ium 
or reo^onlue^^ ur on the truth or false hcx»d 
of itft particular concluftitins, vft iridted* 
on uuytliErtj; but itJ^ manlfeBt liibntir and 
patic'ncel the mre and indiiputable monu- 
meiitK of knowledge wlikh we find In lU 
and dsf* surprising rmi^p of uietlMnl it In- 
{^ludei— lu^icaU ptdloaophicaU and [main- 
native. Not [fi9Ti:y bookB hn?e at any time 
been pubLifhediTJthfeucli irre^LEtible cUime 



to atiifHtJon Jn these reBpecfei; in our own 
day we j^m^jntier none/'— JLrfltwjJn^r. 

*^ 0¥er the vftst flrea of (^toud-lund^ 
b«iundefl on one Bide Ijy tho wars of Uie 
Chrtdtlaftft, and on tlio other by tlict la^t 
book of tltti OiiiffHy, he htu thrown the 
penetrating olectrle hgtit of modem scteuee, 
and found a meaningr fuF every fahl^ ond 
PVt^rS^ uhtuUoia bt which the myeterioaB 
region is haunte! A,"^ At fiu. 

" All the viewB arc jiiatl^ed by authorftleiH, 
The Viurk etohracea many Important null- 
J eft* indudcd in and BTipt^sted hv the reM- 
gioas tliQories of the Gre^^kjs and Hehrewa : 
and from this mLnote u^'curQcy will lie n 
utorehouite for or pi men ts and facte for 
thnfi** diBjmiHMl u> attack tho Lheorte% if not 
for ihQAowhnhuve uii interest in dcl^ndllni; 
them. For a book jto f^ill uf leomino' it U 
romarkJibly well vrrltten."— £ri>ffm7jwrf. 

*■ The wofk before us eThi]>it« an iti- 
daBtry of rcfteandi which reminds us of 
Cud worth, and for whlcli, in recf^nt literu- 
ture^ we must ftwk a [^nmlh:] 3n ClL^rmaoy 
fiither (hFm in En^liuidi wliile its pldlo- 
sophy and jjJiniy ane at ont^e loi^y und 
practicaL Bcattttad through its mnnj 
abstruBc dlsq uleifpona^ are found {msau|ios of 
jin^euilincint beauty— gwms Into whicli are 
absorbed the flm-flt mys of Inti^Mit^^m^ und 
fueling. We b{>lli;vo Mr* Maekay'n work 
is unif^u^ io Up kind ...» Tbu anulyeiifl 
and hittory of Uie iheoiT of mediation, 
froiiJi H» earliefit mythii^al einbtMliments, 
are artmirable* bolh from thtflr panorflntJic 
bread til and ttit^ir rSdinci^E in UluBtrative 
detjijls. We ean only recommend the 
reailer to retort himBclf to this treiisn nr of 
mingled thouE^ht >i,nd leurninff ."'— H^s*- 
iiUnster llffviefc, Jan. 1, 1651. 



LOCAL SELF-GOVEBNMENT AND CENTEALTZATION: 

The characteristics of each, and its Practical Tendencies as affect- 
ing social, moral, and political welfare and progress: including com- 
prehensive outlines of the English Constitution. By J. TOULMIN 
SMITH. Post 8vo, cloth, Ss, 65. 



^ yemn 



** This is a valuable, because a thought- 
ful, treatise upon one of the general sub- 
jects of theoretical and practical politics. 
Mo one in all probability will ^ve an abso- 
lute assent to all its conclusions, but the 
reader of Mr. Smith's volume will in any 
case be induced to give more weight to the 
important principle insisted on/'-^Tait*s 
Magazine. 

** Embracing, with a vast range of con<- 
stitutional learning, used in a singularlv 
attractive form, an elaborate review of all 
the leading questions of our day."— £tZec- 
tic JReview. 

" This is a book, therefore, of immediate 
interest, and one well worthy of the most 
studious consideration of every reformer ; 
but it is also the only complete and correct 
exposition we have of our political system ; 
and we mistake much if it does not take its 
place in literature as our standard text-book 
of the constitution." 

** The special chapters on local self-go- 
vernment and centralization will be found 



chapters of the Booni![i?9t pntctical philo- 
sophy ; every pagi? bt^arin^ the marks of 
priilLiuud aud praLtical thouKhtn" 

" The chapters on the crown^, anti on 
cimiinon hiw, and i^t4tuEe law, di«pi(ty a 
tli-'r*«iiJT]| knuwiedgi! of ccmatltutional Iriw 
ajLoL Jiisitoryt and Ji vait tiody of leurnin^ is 
briiiLTht fonvjjri] for popular InfortniuTon 
wJtiiCHUt the least pHmile or ijedauLry." 

" .Mr* Touhrdn ?^nilt]« ha* m^ude a most 
viiiln4ii)l*^ j?j.ihtriLiution to EngHBh literature; 
f(H En litis fc!ive« itn- pvopie a tme eccnunt 
oJ Tlicir onee glorlouE lionstEtUtlon i mare 
tlinu I bat, be 1ia» given them a hook repTi'te 
WJiJi tlio iouode^t and tntwt practical Ti^wi 
of pQiilk'Etl pbitoiophy/'— iFff'Aii/ AVir*. 

" There ta much reeean^h, jK?uni) prlntil- 
pli , and conjd lopfic in tlds book; and we 
Cm . . , . M nd it to lite peruBal of all who 
y lilt a c?omp?teht knowledge of 

t. .'l lastinur hoAifl of liliigli^h con- 

B.iiJii-iMi; law tind practice*"— JfanUn^? 



"^^^S^l 



$lf<»«- 



f 



MB. GHAPMAirS PUBUCATIONS. 



THE BISTORT OF ANCIENT AST AMONG TEE GREEKS. 

By John Winckxlmann. From the Gennan, by G. H. LoDos. Demy 
8vo, cloth, with UlTistrations, price 12«. 

'* That Wlnckelmaim wu well fitted for ' or less indebted. He poaseseed extendTe 
the task of writing a HIstonr of Ancient ' information, a refined taste, and great xeaL 
Art, no one can deny who is acquainted with His style is plain, direct, and specific, so 
his profound learning and genias. . . . > that you are never at a loss for his meaning. 
He undoubtedly possessed in the highest ' Some verr good outlines, representing fine 
dwree the power of appreciating arostic types of Ancient Greek Art, illustrate the 
skfll wherever it was met witli, but never text, and the volume is got up in a style 
more so than when seen in the garb of an- , worthy of its subiecL**— Spectator. 

tiqnity The work is of * no { ** To all lovers of art this volume will 

common order,' and a careful study of the famish the most necessary and safe guide 
great principles embodied in itmustneces- in studying the pure principles of nature 

sarily tend to form a pure, correct, and and beautv in creative art We 

elevated tasteJ*—Eeleette Revien. cannot wisn better to English art than for 

**The work is throughout lucid, and free I a wide circulation of this mvaluablework." 
from the pedantry of technicality. Its i —Standard of Freedom. 
clearness constitutes its great charm. It> "The mixture of the philosopher and 
does not discuss anyone subject at great -artist in Winckelman's mind gave it at 
length, but aims at a general view of Art, once an elegance, penetration, and know- 
with attention to its mmute developments. > ledge, which fitted nim to a marvel for the 
It is. if we may use the phrase, a Grammar task he undertoolc . . . Such awork ought 
of Greek Art, a tine qud non to all who to be in the library of every artist and man 
would thoroughly investigate its language of taste, and even the most general reader 
of form."— lAterary World. I will find in it much to instruct, and much 

*' Winckelman is a standard writer to to interest him."— A^2a«. 
whom most students of art have been more I 

THE ABTISrS MABRIED LIFE: BEING THAT OF ALBERT 

DUBER. For devout Disciples of the Arts, Pmdent Maidens, as well 
as for the Profit and Instruction of all Christendom, given to the light. 
Translated from the German of Leopold Schbfer, by Mrs. J. R. 
Stodabt. 1 voL fcp. 8vO| ornamental binding, 6s. 

"It is the worthy aim of the novelist to 
show that even the trials of genius are part 
of its education— that its very wounds are 
ftirrows for its harvest. ... No 





fva^ ... x-* u uuc, luuv^m, 

would have a right to expect from the 
author of the *Latenbrevier' (see Ath. No. 
437) such a stern and forcible picture of old 
times and trials as a Meinhold can give- 
still less the wire-drawn sentimentalities of 
a Hahn-Hahn; but pure thoughts— high 
morals— tender feelings— might be looked 

for The merits of this story consist 

in its fine purpose, and its thoughtful, and 
for the most put /ust, exposition of man's 
inner life. To those who, chiefiy appre- 
ciating such qualities, can dispense with 
the stimulants of incident and passion, 
the book before us will not be unaccept- 
able."— AtAtfiuvum. 

HEARTS Df MORTMAEf, AOT) 

8vo, price 10«. 6d. 

**To come to such writings as * Hearts in 
Mortmain, and Cornelia' after the anxieties 
and roughness of our worldly struggle, is 
like bathing in Aresh waters after the dust 

and heat or bodily exertion To a 

peculiar and attractive grace they join con- 
siderable dramatic power, and one or two 
of the characters are conceived and exe- 
cuted with real geni\u." — Prospective 
Meviem. 

" Both stories contain matter of thought 
and reflection which would set up a dozen 
common-place circulating library produc- 
tions." — Examiner. 

"It is not often now-a-days that two 
works of such a rare degree of excellence 
in their class are to be found in one volume ; 



**The work reminds us of the happiest 

efforts of Tieck The design is to 

show how. in spite of every obstacle, genius 
will manifest itself to the world, and give 



shape and substance to its beautinil dreams 

and fancies It is a very pure 

delightful composition, is tasteMly pro- 



duced in an antique style, and retains in 
the transhition all the peculiarities (without 
which the book would^lose half its merit) 
of German thought and idiom." —J?r«- 
tannia. 

** Simply then we assure our readers that 
we have been much pleased with this work. 
The narrative portion is well concdved, 
and completely illustrates the author's 
moral; while it is interspersed with many 
passages which are full of beauty 



nany 
and 



COBIfELIA. ANovel,-inlvoLpo8t 



it is rarer stUl to find two works, each of 
which contains matter for two volumes, 
bound up in these times in one cover."-~ 
Observer. 

"The above is an extremely pleasing 
book. The first story is written in the anti- 
quated form of letters, but its simplicity 
and good taste redeem it from the tedious- 
ness and appearance of egotism which gene- 
rally attend that style of composition."— 
Economist. 

** WeU written and interesting."— DaiZy 
News. 

'* Two very pleasing and elegant novels. 
Some passages display descriptive powers 
of a high order."— JBritannia. 



--^m* 



^^a^ 



-^^^^ 



MB. CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 



f 



PHASES OF FAITH, OB PASSAGES FROM THE HISTORY OF 

MY CBEED. By Francis William Newman, Author of " The 
History of the Hebrew Monarchy " " The Soul : her Sorrows and her 
Aspirations.'* Post 8vo, cloth, 6«. 



"Besidleft a style of remarkable f«*clna- 
tton^ from Its pcrfGot ainipUi.4ty and ihe 
abveDcv of till thou^bt of writing, the lite- 
nuTf chararter of tlili Ijooli ariiM^B from its 
aifttiluvt^f Uio wrf ii'r'jf nimd, pnd tin* nnrn,- 

tivi! ar hii tiraggleB In iiddltLoi] to 

thp reli|jiouf and metoiiihfi^iey inci r^ ■ , it 
cojitftlnA flQiTif^ ttirtiw Utniifiblt' biMLrriii cal 
ucLDtU'!!', in incidciituJ pfctiirpfl ot 1 1 n' ^^ . . r's 
eare<?r, and ^liiuiHie^ of tLi? aliii'iiiiU<>]j> nnnd 
sooittl penurfiJtlfinn he ufiiU'rwc'iit In cotise- 
quence of hit i>p\i\\om,"^Sf^re'tfifor. 

"Tlie book aftofreihyr is a nnsat m.^Tniirk- 
Ab}e book, uid Ib doAtiued^ we think, to 
ac<iult« ali the notcirletr f^hi^rh wns»n,. ; led 
a fi?w fejirB sitsct hf tht? * Vijedg-ea on : »- 
tiqn/and to prvduofi a marfk tastinff eiii^ct." 

" No work in our eicperleDce ho* ypt bficn 
publltili^J 80 dupaTiIe of f;m«Tt^°« ^"'^ i^'iQd 
of Hie rfiftfk^r anrt earrying him thn ' gh 
the tortuous labyrinth of rm^ioui *:<•■> "O- 
Terty: no Tsork so unergeticaJly i*]' ■ ng 
the i«ij!ij*?ct of hU itn urn fi I^uIUm and Si i ia- 
ttcatioTLB; no work »o fapat>lE> ^sf ma^ <• p a 
ptith for tiin new reJormatioo to iri'M-i ie- 
eupfly <m* III till* lilfitory of th# c.aiw. cts 



seeking the truths and conaqi?j-iDff for lt»elft 
bit by uit^tlia rifht to prDDounee do^natl'^ 
caHy on lihat i^hith U liiwl heffiltifoift* ac- 
cr]»ir>"i iraditJonally, wt? «» reficft^d, as in 
a iiiirrorj tlic history of tht? last few eienlu- 
rivs, Modem giilrltualE^itn lin* rtiiunti to im 
d^ ■ :■ ^Ttittful Ut ftJr. Newncifto : liis Ic^arn- 
in iii^ jdi^ty, hici Loura^e, his candour^ 
ai . .lis ithorougfi miLHtery of liijr *ubji?i*ti 
re-nir'! Ll!> nlliAni't^ doubly pr^ciou^ Uf tho 
caiiise,"— T/ii'i Lmiiffr. 

^' Mr. TJL'wmuii is a master of «tyle^ and 
hi? Ji'jok, written In plftJii and nt^r^nus 
E< -ii-l^ ti^>atfi of iiHi luifKirMirit a flub|t^et 
to ' I in 4»iniiianrlinj? the attention of all 
tb -irj^ men, and pnTtieiiUrly of all Uia 
ZDiiii^iora of rtliijion/* — Ert/iumti4i^ 

" Ai a narrative of Uie various douht* 
anrl triffi^ivliip that h^H a religiaua n>ini 
wlji'Jt 'N>uipi:'ll^l liy etjnTiction to derlata 
fp ihtfurihodOE views J and as a hSttOfr 
ol 'onctijsiotis arrived at by ftii hit^^llf- 

g< rjd edu(?!ittri mSna, wiOi ibe realms 
ai c^ii b)^ which Buch concluiiana wers 

gt :,' thlii Work Is inoEt Ijitereftinif mid 
ol ;it importance."— JforyUrt^ Ad^rer- 



qf a deeply roUsious mind^ counigeuudy 

NEW EDITION, WITH ADDITIONS. 

THE SOUL: HER SORROWS AM) HER ASPIRATIONS. An 

Essay towards the Natural History of the Soul, as the basis of Theo- 
logy. By Francis William Newman, formerly Fellow of Balliol 
College, Oxford, and Author of " A History of the Hebrew Monarchy." 
Post Svo, cloth, 68, 

"The 9|>lplt throughout has our wannest 
armpa.thy , It contalDtf more of the genuine 
life of t Christianity, than half the books that 
are coldly elaborated in its defence. The 
cbann of Ui* pohime l* the tone of faithful- 
nesi and pincoriiy wlilcih it breathes— the 
evidence* which it aifitrds in every page, of 
beitif^ drawn dirnct from the fountafiis of 
cnnviciion."—Pro*pfvtive Review. 

'■*0n the gTitat ability of the author we 




need not comment. The force with which 
he puts his arguments, whether for good 
or for evil, is obvious on every page."— 
Literary Qaxette, 

** We have seldom met with so much preg- 
nant and suggestive matter in a small com- 
paiw, as in this remarkable volume. It is 
distinguished bv a force of thought and 
freshness of feeling, rare in the treatment 
of religious subjects."— /n^ir^r. 

HISTORY OF THE HEBREW MONARCHY, from the Administra- 
tion of Samuel to the Babylonish Captivity. By Francis Willlam 
Newman, formerly Fellow of Balliol College, Oxford, and Author of 
" The Soul : her Sorrows and her Aspirations," &c. Svo, cloth, 10«. 6rf. 

contain the only materials for his work."— 
Projective Review. 

** This book must be regarded, we think, 
as the most valuable contribution ever made 
in the English Language to our means of un- 
derstanding that portion of Hebrew History 

to wtiich it relates The Author has 

not the common superstitious reverence for 
the Bible, but he shows evenrwhere a large, 
humane, and Christian spirit."— ifoMO- 
ehusetta Quarterly Revi^v. 



"It is trulv refreshing to find Jewish 
history treated, as in the volume before us, 
according to the rules of sound criticism, 

and good sense The publication of 

such a work will form an epoch in biblical 
literature in this country."— jTi^tifrffr. 

"The Author has brought a very acute 
mind, familiar with knowledge that is 
beyond the range of ordinary scholarship, 
to the task of combining and interpreting 
tlie antique and fragmentary records which 



-*«>l? 



r 



MR. CHAPMAITS FUBUCATION& 



THE IIPE OF JESUS, CBHICALLT EXAMINED. By Dr. David 
FiucDBiCH Strauss. 8 vols. 8to, 12. 16b^ doth. 

Uf tbe nir Aiid rplrll f>f mn origtiul* A 

wm^/BUX Ibu indoeed the inmlutor oltjeii. 
to nuqitT the read^'riiif inio ^n^ii^b, uf » 
Gtvel guoUtEtkti^, «bi!re th£t¥ ivAj uo cer- 
FWoadin^ i«tidfTin«: Into Genuon In tlie 
arinDAL Indeed, Straus ma.y well iMy, aj» 
he dCN» in tlw no<ke« wbidi ba Trriti?& for 
Lbi* KubU^ Aditioa* that m far a^ bii> ims 
f-'Kiunined iU the transliiLiDa !«« " et aci-u- 

"Iia regnrd to Leftt^mg, arnlenes*, wid 
FatnciDitB cdiiJecAiref , tfee work f«enible« 
Kiebuh^i'HueUiirTof Ram^" The sener&l 
mftuD^r of tmiliiff Xbt fU^^A ftnd — 



"Tbe ertiMTdloajT roprit ftf Uil» bool 
..... Stre«*si dialectit d^tl^rity, hit 
foi^iuic cOf^lofiK, the pri?A poitah of bit 
f trK preti^dt him lo lit u th» acoompUdwd 
pLtvic^r, loo cotDffleiilr moffUsr of hu wo« 
ii> f!*! the (f^ipt«imn to uafiOr a4rvitKp 
*>f UQAi^Tnlr U-oaper , .... We can bMtlI;r 
tJiat ilie (ranjulfltor b&i Achieved a Terr toaifb 
work with rwnArkiible ipirlt and fldtUty. 
TiiM fr'nUior. tbuitih Indoed a p»cl writeTi 
coil Id hiLFdlr hAxe spokt'd tw-tter had hit 
ctiijiitrr and lan^unse bwen KnilUh. Tbf 
wiirk fiM t'TidetJtlf fftlU?n tnto the hand* 
f^r antf who lia* oriC onlj (fffectiv? conunand 
of boLli laniruages. but a fAmiliiu-ity with 
the nubjwt-niJitteT of llviKjlo|ri«il criticism, 
unii tmlriitialwji] iuU; ltd technical jjJifsieo- 
}fjf^,""WfinttUitJiieraiid Foreiif/t Quar- 

" WinMver reudi InP^e TolumeH WJtbDiit 
VLf reference Ui the G^rmanT mmX in- 
pLejued with £hf* easy» jpeffjiicuoiis, iaeom- 
ntStv and hanootiiotit force of the Ru^Urih 
ftvlf. But he will bi? itill more Mititfl^'d 
wKi-Ot nil luraiiiE? to the origin ftl. h? Audi 
llmt ti«' K*ndtrii]j ii word for wfird, tfjougbt 
for ttmuffb^ and HHHiitctiee for ii^nLeoee. In 
pr^^parluic *a h^^aiitiful a i^ndering bm the 
preiieLtT llM' ulilHcuUies L'fln Luve In*" 
neltii^r ff>w nor smftU lEi Ihe way of pre- 
Berviii^, in vtirioij* ptirt* of tlie work, the 
i'»4irlrit'j« of t|](i trfinstialion, comh^ni'd wUli 
ttijkt uniforHi harmony uuA tilfHrm.>sfl of 
■tyle. Which imi*ftj-l to the yolimies before 



nn«inw i^ ehaptei*. i««lon«, and PHtj^wf 
th^ argiLED^&t, r»di{»fi» cgnMnamate dia- 
leetiral •kill i while the stylfl ii cleai-t the 



expretislon direct, hud th<^ author** dpan- 
nsft* Ip referrins to Uifi wurces of Informa- 
tion^ and stAting^ hij; «nielitfl!oni in all their 
ftinipllcitTi, la caoiiid and esemplary < > » * 
It nrjt onlr iiirpaflef all h» prtdficwsore of 
i IB kind in letnjlnjf. acutenftss. and thorousb 
hirt^iK'Liifitii 1"**^ It is niflfkpd by a seftoiui 
nad^arDost minV^—ChrhJian Kajtminer- 
** I found tn M. Slmuis nyouns raaJi full 
of candour, ffentlenesi. and inodeisty-iine 
Piwseswd t)i a soul that wm almost (rtyste- 
rinuB, and, Hs it were^ saddened hy the 
ri^nutatlun ho likd 4^ined. Ho firanoely 
seems ui Ik^ tbe author of i he work undercfiiB- 
aideiMtJoo/'— ft'**":**! Brntc det Matma. 



ENDEATOimS AFTER THE CHRISTIAN LIFE, febst sebies. 

By James Mabtikkau. Second Edition. 12mo, 7<. 6<i, cloth. 



ENDEAVOURS AFTER THE CHRISTIAN LIFE, second sebies. 

By James Mabtineav. 12mo, 7«. 6d., cloth. 



i 



Tolume of 'Endeavours erfter the Christian 
Life/ because when all that suits not our 
taste Is omitted, we have still left more to 
instruct, interest, improve, and elevate, than 
in edmost any other volume with which we 

are acquainted Whatever may be 

its defects, we regard it as one of the most 
precious gifts to the religious world in 
modern times."— In^Mircr. 

** Mr. Martineau is known, much beyond 
the limits of his own denomination, as a 
man of great gifts and accomplishments, 
and his publications have been all marked 
by subtle and vigorous thought, much 
beauty of imagination, and certain charms 
of composition, whicn are sure to find 

admirers There is a delicacy and 

ethereality of ethical sentiment in these 
discourses which must commend them, and 



Wf rnfiy safely say thftt mnny of the orfho* 
d.nt inuU de]H8rtm':nmmlsrht rt^rE-'Lvt^fropi 
tJii !iJ inT^t[e*:timi atiinulu^ moral ftollah, 
aiLd in sonioinoodfi rtilifc'ioua edlli cation. *^ 

'^Om of the inort lntdfesUng, attoifvtiTiE, 
and inofitTftlwahlD Beries of »^aay( which the . 
literuture of Chrbtianity has receii^ed from 
prih.^i itv layman for nanny a Y*^^- . . ^ , 

" Vtjlunies that ha^o in tlufni biSth inM- 
If^et and tnie I'loquence^ and wliSch Batbrfy 
thci undcRitjiiidiiig while they pleaie the 
tHjite lUid Improve the heart* 

" WlJcn we my that thest nu^ourxei fire 
eivum-\ii\ J prtifffrnl^vi^ mean thiitth«yafe 
a I biMt^d, ni:*t cpniy for man In Uie abitTOCt- 
ti i.'i.uli the duths of Clirtstianlty eTerr- 
^tji^n-— but ul&u with refei^ntrn lo the clr- 
cura&taiicen ftf §ociety"«f tJ^? ,.*8^^^ 
country in which tjtir lot is cast. '"Crittc. 



^§40<r 



^^e^j 



k#^^ 



MR CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 



ITALY: PAST AM) PRESENT. Or, General Views of its History, 
Religion, Politics, Literature, and Art. By L. Mabiotti. 2 vols, post 
8vo, cloth, 10*. Qd, 



"This is a usetal book, informed with 
lively feeling and sound judgment. It 
contains an exiiibition of Italian views of 
matters, social and political, by an Italian 
who has learned to speak: through Enelish 
thoughts as well as English words. Par- 
ticularly valuable are the sitetches of recent 
Italian history; for the prominent charac- 
ters are delineated in a cordial and sympa- 
thetic spirit, yet free from enthusiastic 
ideas, and with unsparing discrimination 

The criticisms on *The Past' will 

richly repay perusal; it is, however, in 
*The Present 'of Italy that the main in- 
terest of the book resides. This volume 



does not merely possess an interest similar 
to that of contemporary works; it supplies 
a desideratum, and is well adapted to aid 
the English reader in forming a just esti- 
mate of the great events now in progress in 
Italv. Not the least wonderful part of the 
book is the entire mastery the author has 
acquired of our language."— Examiner, 
AprU, 

" Our author has an earnest, nay, enthu- 
siastic, love and admiration of his native 
country ; with the ability and eloquence to 
render his subject very mteresting and at- 
tractive."— ilomiwflr Advertiser, 



The following notices refer to the first volume of the work: — 



"The work is admirable, useAil, instruc- 
tive. I am delighted to find an Italian 
coming forward with so much noble en- 
thusiasm, to vindicate his country and 
obtain for it its proper intei-est in the eyes 
of Europe. The English is wonderfUl. . . . 
I never saw any approach to such a style 
in a foreigner before— as full of beauty in 
diction as in thought."— Sir E, BtUrver 
Lytton, Bart, 



** I recognise the rare characteristics of 
genius— a large copception of the topic, a 
picturesque diction founded on profound 
tliought, and that passionate sensibility 
which becomes the subject— a 6ubj[ect beau- 
tiful as its climate, and inexhaustible as its 
■oil."— -B. DisraelU Esq,, M.P. 

"A very rapid and summary ristimi of 
the fortunes of Italy from the fall of the 
Roman Empire to the present moment.— 
A work of industry and labour, written 
with a good purpose. — A bird's-eye view of 
the subject that will revive the recollections 
of the scholar, and seduce the tyro into a 
longer course of reading."— J. i7i«n<»ww». 

** This work contains more information 
on the subject, and more references to the 

{iresent position of Italy, than we have seen 
n any recent production." — Foreign 
Quarterly Revietv, 

** In reference to style, the work before 
U8 is altogether extraordinary, as that of a 



foreigner, and in the higher quality of 
thought we may commend the author for 
his acute, and often original, criticism, and 
his qiiick perception of the grand and 
l)eautiful in his native literature."— Pre»- 
cottf in tJie North American Reoiem, 

** The work before us consists of a con- 
tinuous parallel of the political and literary 
history of Italy from the earliest period of 
the middle ages to the present time. The 
author not only penetrates the inner rela- 
tions of those dual appearances of national 
life, but possesses the power of displaying 
them to the reader with great clearness and 
ett'ect. We remember no other work in 
which the civil conditions and literary 
achievements of a people have been blended 
in sucli a series of living pictures, repre- 
senting successive periods of history."— 
Algemeine Zeittmg, 

" An earnest and eloquent work."-^.Esc- 
aminer, 

** A work ranking distinctly in the class 
of belles-lettres, and well deserving of a 
library place in England."- Xit«rar]/ Qa- 
zette, 

" A work warmly admired by excellent 
Judges."— Taii'a Magazine. 

** An admirable work written with ereat 
power and beauty."— Pro/*. LongfeUom, 
—Poets and Poetry of Europe, 



fflSTOEICAl SKETCHES OF THE OLD PATHTERS. By the 

Author of the " Log Cabin." 2«. 6<?., paper cover ; 3*., cloth. 






$ 



I 



i^m^ 



^9^2 



MB. CHAPMAN'S Pt3LICATI0MS. 

A DISCOURSE or MATTERS PERTAOTIfG TO RELIGION. 

By Thsodobb Pasksb. Post 8vo, 7«., cloth. 
CONTENTS. 



Book 1. — Of Religion in General ; or. 
a Discourse of the Sentiment ana 
its Manifestations. 

Book 2.— The Relation of the Reli- 
gious Sentiment to God; or, a Dis- 
course of Inspiration. 

Book 3.— The Relation of the Reli- 
gious Sentiment to Jesus of Naza^ 
reth ; orjaDiscourse of Christianity. 



Book 4.— The BeUtion of the Beli- 
gious Sentiment to the Greatest 
of Books; or, a Discourse of the 
Bible. 

Book 5.— The Relation of the Reli- 

S'ous Sentiment to the Greatest of 
nman Institutions ; or, aDiscourse 
of the Church. 



HEBBEW BECOBDS : An mstoncal Enquiry concerning the Age, 
Authorship, and Authenticity of the Old Testament. By the Rby. Db. 
GiUES. Demy 8vo, cloth, pnce 10«. Gd. 
** There are evidenoee of extensive read- ] talent and scholanhip in Rabbinical lore." 
ing, of long .and lerere studj, of much | —Weekly Di^tateh, 



LECTURES ON SOCIAL SCIENCE, «.d the oiganizaaoa 

of Labour. By James Hole. Demy Svo, stiff cover, price 2s. 6(2. 
" An able and excellent exposition of the i opinions of the SociaUsts."— JSnmomtef. 



THE DECAY OF TRADITIONAL FAITH, AND EE-ESTABLISH- 

MENT OF FAITH UPON PHILOSOPHY. Two Lectures delivered 
at Finsbury Chapel, South Place. By Hbnbt Isbson, M.A. Post 
Svo, paper cover, price U. 



MTIONAI FAITH. 



Bt the dAMB AUTHOB. 

Three Lectures delivered at Finsbury Chapel, 



South Place. Post Svo, paper cover, price la. 



^^v^^^/^^/\^^/v^^^v 



M BTRODUCnON TO THE RELIGION OF NATURE. Being 

the above Five Lectures deh'vered at Finsbury Chapel, South Place. 
By Henby Ibbson, M.A. Post Svo, paper cover, price 2s, 



#^»«- 



^i 



^Il<tf^ 



MR. CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 




THE SIEGE OF DAMASCUS : A Historical Novel. By Jambs 
NiSBET. In 3 vols, post 8vo, 1/. 11«. Q<L 

" A romance of very unusual power, 
such as must arrest attention by its quali- 
ties as a work of fiction, and help the good 
cause of liberty of thought."— Jueader. 

" There is an occasional inequality of 
style in the writing, but, on the whole* it 



may be pronounced beyond the average of 
modern novelists .... whilst descriptive 
passaves might be selected that betray a 
very high order of merit,"— Manchester 
Examiner, 



THE BISHOP'S WIFE: a lale of the Papacy. Translated ftom 
the German of Leopold Schefeb. With a Historical Notice of the 
Life and- Times of Hildebrand (Pope Gregory VII.), to which it relates. 
By Mrs. J. R. Stodakt. Fcap. 8vo, 4*. 



CATHOLICITY, SPIEITUAL AOT) INTELLECTUAL. An Attempt 

at Vindicating the Harmony of Faith and Knowledge. A Series of 
Discourses. By Thosias Wilson, M.A., late Minister of St. Peter's, 
Mancroft, Norwich, Author of " Travels in Egypt and Syria," etc. 8vo, 
cloth, 5«. May be had separately. Is. each, paper cover. 

No. I.— RELATIVE RANK OF OUR EARTH AMONG STELLAR 

WORLDS. 
No. II.— THE INNER KINGDOM. 
No. IIL— SALVATION. 
No. IV.— SCHOLASTIC THEOLOGY. 



A HISTOEICAL ANALYSIS OF CHKISTIAN CIVILI- 

ZATION. By L. Raymond de Vbbicoub. In 1 vol. post 8vo, cloth, 
price 10«. 6rf. 

" It is succinct, clearly-written, and | ** A nsefiil book of historical reference, 
may be called a manual of European his- being well filled with facts and dates.'* 
toTy."—JEk;onamUt, \ —Westminster Beviem, 



THE BEAUTIES OF CHAMING. With an Essay prefixed. By 
WiLLLAJi MouNTFOBD. 12mo, cloth, 28. 6d. 



**This is really a book of beauties. It is 
no collection of shreds and patches, but a 
faithftil representative of a mind which 
deserves to have its image reproduced in 
a thousand forms. It is such a selection 
from Ghanning as Channing himself might 
have made. It is as though we had the 
choicest passages of those divine discourses 



read to us by a kindred spirit 

Those who have read Martyria will feel 
that no man can be better qualified than 
its author, to bring together those passages 
which are at once most characteristic, and 
most rich in matter tending to the moral 
and religious elevation of human beings." 
—Inquirer. 




CHEISnAlOTY : THE DELIVEBMCE OF THE SOUL, AND 

ITS LIFE. Bjr Wiluam Mountfobd, MJL Fcp. 8to, cloth, it. 




r 



-*«^: 



MB. CHAPMAN'S PUBUCATIONS. 



A RETROSPECT OF THE REUGIOUS LIFE OF ENGLAND; 

or, the Church, Puritanism, and Free Inquiry. By John James 
Tayler, BA. Post 8vo, 10«. 6d, cloth. 

"Tbii work la wrftton In 9. chnstelj h<**n- 
tlful itjie, mimifi^tti L'ltC'Dftive nrndfngf und 
eurffiif refluiircli; is full vf thoti^ht, imd 
iI^i<T4'j)1y i^rkinAl in Hb chur^tfT. It is 
miu-kiLHi al«o t>y tt)^' ma\ii'*ty which utinjly 
c!lmraclL<rigi>'5 Inii? merit."— /if wii/^rrr. 

" Mr- 'fuyler ii Dctuatetl by iw Eectariau 
bio*, anJ ^fi heartily tlruiik hliP for (his 
iMl{LiLti»i>taiHir rvIlirlDUif lliijiratiurfi."— W*ftt- 

" Itii not oft™ out- KDOd fortune to TFjeet 
with U lH>!fk Ku mrt'll r<»Tldt!iV(JiI| iu.i itell 
ivrLtti^n, and m instrijctire^ lu thU. The 
varlQiii pham^^ of ihc nuticiDal mind, de- 

JirTllvMi Willi t\ic rti-'iiTiii-;-. nrjiJ t'arcf oT llr. 
!■ . . .. . for 

ruliuuUJii. :i^ i -. 1 L.;»-^ -L- ^i^i puji-;, J in 

turn from an equitable point or view, is 
tolerant towards intolerance, and admires 
seal and excuses fanaticism, wlierever he 



sees honesty. Nay, he openly asserts that 
the religion of mere reason is not the reli- 
gion to produce a practical effect on a 
people; and therefore regards his own class 
only as one element in a better principle 
church. The clear and comprehensive 
grasp with which he marshals his facts, la 
even less admirable than the impartiality, 
nay, more than that, the general kindliness 
with which he reflects upon them.— JEx- 
aminer, 

"The writer of this volume has all the 
calmness belonging to one who feels him- 
self not mixed up with the struggle he de- 
scribes. There is about it a tone of great 
moderation and candour: and we cannot 
but feel confident that we have here, at 
least, the product of a thoroughly honest 
mind."— Lame' t Edinburgh Moffoxine, 



THE ELEMENTS OF INDIVIDUAnSM. 

Post 8vo, 7s. 6rf., cloth. 

"It is a book worthy of perusal. Even 
those who can find no sympathy with its 
philosophy, will derive pleasure and im- 
provement from the many exquisite touclies 
of feeling, and the many pictures of beauty 
which mark its pages. 

** The expansive philosophy, the penetra- 
tive intellect, and the general humanity of 
the author, have rendered The Elements Qf\ 



By William Magcall. 



Individualism a book of strong and gene- 
ral interest."— Criftc. 
" We have been singularly interested by 

this book Here is a speaker and 

thinker whom we may securely feel to be a 
lover oftmthy exliibiting in his work a 
form and temper of mind verv rare and 
peculiar in our time."— JfancA«««er Ex^ 
aminer. 



THE EDUCATION OF TASTE. 

Maocall. 12mo, 2s. 6d. 



A Series of Lectures. By William 



THE AGENTS OF CIVILIZATION, a Series of Lectures. ByWiL- 
UAM Macgall. 12mo, Bs. Qd., cloth. 



AN INQUIRY CONCEBNING THE OBIGIN OF CHRISTIANITY. 

By Chables C. Hennell. Second Edition, 8vo, 12s., cloth. 



*7^0^ 





-^;^ 



MR. CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 

A SECOND EDITION, WITH EXPLANATORY PREFACE. 

THE NEMESIS OF FAITH. By J. A. Fboude, M.A., late FeUow of 
Exeter College, Oxford. Post 8vo, cloth, 6«. 



first reijuiiiifs of u book. If hm \"I"^'^<-t. 
inttter, and inn^tLTy of subjt^ct, will' it 
IftFff VDL'^s wljkli It! u>(t arlstf f roui Ui e iv ■ 's 
mind, and that l/idJvEdi'ial <rhJ»Jiii:ter~ le 
truths of di-tuil — whteh fprinir ffoju >- 

r'ifiTice or observutlon. 'flit? picturn--, n 
KrLM:lLs)j lioauo in ehlhlhuorf, youTh. d 
early m^mhtiod, m wail as tljs ttion^^ai i d 
feeLiiiE^ of t^L^ student at tlifonl. -e 
palQted with f^liiij^ pcrv&diMJ bv a l it 
of tboij itUi \ tlia rtiniJirkft o » Uit li mn i > ■ )f 
the thrtMt letu-oed nrufmiioni^ mon^ '--j'l)- 
cially on Ibe wurldlliitf^a of the cburch^ are 
not mere tlerltitnation, but the uutiifjiiriiig 
of aa camo^t i.-oiivli?tlon : Uio PiftnrM .jf 
Anslj(!an ProtustunUi^iD, dtwd to fiif ■ to 
lovLS and ti> uliiiobt overythiriff but w, i- 
worshlp, wUli the ftattrjiL-tit of tht' « ts 
th[}t AtMYfjiim tlr^^t t>ro|M)!ier1 lo Im f, 
form thi? b L^at dc fi ■ n t** of Tnictjirian i - ^ , i Eit 
ha* a|.*ix^ari'r1„ th. i uk] i dt^d^n rv doua ii^ ■ n 

to J* thu a]ijep('t of the aiitlior is 

the main literary Ghjptt Is to di^pl i le 
fitrugi^kji of a mind with the ^rovul d 
fmundtf^r ojiinlon^ kui'tdffiitJ ate bhi :i- 
natc Uj the tnteth'ctual rcsullii that ^^iring 
friaii thtm ; hut thtrf Is cio pnucity uf ind- 
di^rit If tht? work Ik? judi^sl by ibi own 
■tan J ard/ '— .S/if r#« ^^j r. 

*'Thu mi?!9t (trlkinE (luiiltty in Mr. 
Proude's writJnKS Li hia descriptive elo- 
queiiciiB. Uh diiimi'^ters arfj ull living 
before us, and, Luvsj no aamcmciig. ilia 
quIuiLness of oyu is smmiie&t equally in his 



in&lbfht Inio haman minaBf and in hla pcr- 
cei'i'inii of iiaLuml b«4aty . . , . . J be 
stji if the U'U^Ta In everywhere chBrmitif. 
Tn ■ ■ *nfeEsii>nii of a 3<.>eptic are oft^n hril- 
luid alwuy» toucniflff. Tho cli3«Lng 



na iilie ia i^wui, ^rtiphlc, mid only Itxi 
hij iv wraught ixi ptiinrul beanty." — Pr^- 

' I kie Nsolt l>ec(tmir!f! Iti Ub soul-bur ninf 
tn 1 1 Illness, a aaJte [nTahia^^le reii-ord cf 
th< 'I' I yntrugtrlea and U^miitationB through 
wl . ii the yoiilh of thlft tikiiifteffiith cemury 
ha- t'j foi^v Its wuy in rutlgimui matJi^ri 
..... li^preriaily ia it a (^r4?at wammg' 
and protLift iwaitiiit thrw frewt fultK'hoiid^. 
^t sslf-dvl tided word orthodojiy pnd 



bil "lutry, net ling up iihe Uible for a mere 
de idol fiififead of A iiijn? wEtnesn to 
CI I. Ai;yh]»t froU^y piirUir*:<plUo Jnfl-^ 
de ... niRJ'i^y chanjfitiBr tliu chatf of otd 
syi ■ iiK for the chalf i.if nfw, addres»ht^ 
m< - Intellect* and iienurhit; their iplfitji. 
A| iNt Tractarinnhiiiri, try in if to mtifci? 
in< 'j]l helief, as Stra.i.bur(cera miike gi*cfiu 
all livffr, by dartnesa and crammhifi:t 

mi mctiirini^ litale folly jw tbf IvtWii 

stbi' wisdom : dtiiherotoly giving tljo tSc to 
(Jod, who Im* mmJe iu>tu in hit own iinniijt*, 
boi:iyT ^oul. and anlrll, by ntaklti^ thi^ two 
flrbt dt^rrepii for the pake of j>iimper]off tliu 

Ia»t Againiit tiwio throe taX^Uoods., 

we aay^ does the book before U9 protest; 
after its own mournful faf^hionf tnopt 
striiiQf^ly when most unconscJonflly/'— 
Fni^vr^M Mtj{f., May, JiWii. 



THE PURPOSE OF EXISTENCE. Popularly considered, in relation 
to the ORIGIN, DEVELOPMENT, and DESTINY of the HUMAN 
MIND. Crown 8vo, cloth. Is. 6d, 

"This singularly thoughtful essay em- ' much learning, and an eloquence and 
braces a wide range of topics, but without elevation of style, peculiarly appropriate 
ever departing from its proper theme. In to the loftiness or the subject-matter."— 
the performance of his task, the author; Critic. 
has displayed great power of reflection, I 

GENERAL PRmCIPLES OF THE PHILOSOPHY OF NATURE. 

With an Outline of some of its recent developments among tho Ger- 
mans, embracing the Philosophical Systems of Schellinff and Hegel, 
and Oken's System of Nature, by J. B. Stallo, A.M. Post 8vo, 
cloth, 6*. 

THE PBINCIPLES OF NATURE, HER DIVINE REVELATIONS, 

AND A VOICE TO MANKIND. By and through Andrew Jack- 
son Davis, the ** Poughkeepsie Seer," and "Clairvoyant." 2 vols, 
large 8vo, cloth, 18*. 

♦^* The work consists of 800 pa«[es, including a history of its production, 
with a Biographical Sketch, and Portrait (engraved on Steel) of the 
Author. 



-*«^ 



^^K»i^ 



? 



MB. CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 




THE Um OF THE BET. JOSEPH BLANCO WHITE. Written 

by Himself. With Portions of his Correspondence. Edited by John 
Hamiltoic Thom. 8 vols, post 8yo, IZ. 4s.f doth. 

peculiar construction of his mind. In its 
close union of the moral with the intellec- 
tual faculties, and in its restless desire for 
truth, which may remind the reader of 
Dr. Arnold.**— Examiner. 

"There is a depth and force in this book 
which tellB."— Christian Remembrancer, 

** These volumes have an interest beyond 
the character of Blanco White. And beside 
the intrinsic interest of his self-portraiture, 
whose character is indicated in some of our 
extracts, the correspondence, in the letters 
of Lord Holland, Southev, Goleridee, 
Channinff, Norton, Mill, Professor Powell, 
Dr. Hawkins, and other names of celebrity, 
has considerable attractions in itself, with- 
out anv relation to the bioe 
pose with which it was pubu 
tater. 



"Til If. ]& EL t?(is>k whirli r1vi '- 'en- 

tlon, and muki'f the lk']?rt M las, 

IndiHfit, ftUh mKiiTd til liiiti" II. ab- 

ttano^t tJiough hot in IL-^ lirrNu^.' - an 
aimDit drumutit! choiActer : »u tkMLr]> *nd 
Btrotigly is the llvlng't tliltifcliiff.iietivf^ man 
proj^ct^d IVotD UtG fciCQ <if the ti3vi.*rdB 
whirli h<> has left. 

'Ml is Bpijit Wfts fc biiU!*-fi<!lJ, itpon 
wbi^bt witlir tluetuutlng foriuiie and rin- 
ffu]^r Jiit«*fip;ii7T the powcn of btUef and 
fccptici^iD waved » fturii flrnt to imtj their 
tineuafLTiiir ^at; fijtd wtthin the com;)ji>f of 
H|j& ^JtpCif'tfiiErL' ttft! pr^^K'ntcd 10 our view 
most of tlie vreai jrwt^l utid !ipJrLiual 
probk^ms tliat Attach to the conditio ri of 
OOP fuce*— Qwor/rr/w Jt/rpigfp. 

"tTii* book will iDiprova hif ^hinco 
White's) in>ut&itioii. TM're U much in the 



LIFE OF GODFREY W. 

12mo, Bs. 6d., cloth. 

"We commend this book, not only to 
scholars and men of science, but to all our 
readers who love to contemplate the life 
and labours of a great and good man. It 
merits the special notice of all who are in- 



VON LEIBNITZ. By J. m. mackib. 



terested in the business of education, and 
deserves a place, by the side of Brewster's 
Life of Newton, in all the libraries of our 
schools, academies, and literary institu- 
tions.''— CAri««ton Watchman. 



THE EDUCATION OF TSE FEELINGS. 

Second Edition. Post 8vo, cloth, 2*. 6d. 



By Chables Brat. 



THREE EXPERIMENTS OF LIVING :— Within the Means. Up to 
the Means. Beyond the Means. Fcp. 8vo, ornamental cover and gilt 
edges, Is. 



STORIES FOR SUNDAY AFTERNOONS. From the Creation to the 
Advent of the Messiah. For the use of Children from 6 to 11 years of 
age. By Mrs. Geobob Dawson (late Miss Susan Fanny Crompton). 
16mo, Is. Qd.j cloth. 



"This is a very pleasing little volume, 
which we can confidently recommend. It 
is designed and admirably adapted for the 
use of children from five to eleven years of 
age. It purposes to infuse into that tender 
age some acquaintance with the facts, and 
taste for the study of the Old Testament. 
The style is simple, easy, and for the most 



part correct. The stories are told in a 
spirited and graphic manner. 

"Those who are engaged in teaching the 
young, and in laying the foundation of 
good character by early religious and moral 
impressions, will be thankful for additional 
resources of a kind so Judicious as thif 
volume."— Intfttirffr. 



!:^»*- 







ME. CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 




HIMS FOR THE CHRISTIAN CHURCH AM) HOME. Edited 

hy James MABXiNEAn. Sixth Edition, 12mo, Bs. 6d.j cloth. 



EEVEBBEEATIOIfS. PAET I. Fop. 8vo, paper cover, U. 



REVEBBEEATIONS. PART 11. Fcp. Svo, paper cover, 2«. 



"In this little verse-pamphlet of some 
sixtv or seventy pages, we think we see 
eviaences of a true poet; of a fresh and 
natural fount of genuine souk; and of a 

Surpose and sympathy admiraoly suited to 
le times The purchaser of it will 

find himself richer in possessing it by many 
wise and charitable thoughts, many gene- 
rous emotions, and much calm and quiet, 
yet deep reflection."— JSaraminer. 
<* Remarkable for earnestness of thought 



and strength of diction/' — Momin(f 
Herald. 

"The author of these rhymed brochures 
has much of the true poetic spirit. He is 
always in earnest. He writes from the ftill 
heart. There is a manliness, too, in all his 
utterances that especially recommends 

them to us As long as we have such 

'Reverberations' as these we shall never 
grow weary of them."— ITctfAZy News. 



TWO ORATIONS AGAINST TAKING AWAY HUMAN LIPE, 

Under any Clrcnmstances ; and in explanation and defence of the 
misrepresented doctrine of Non-resistance. By Thomas Cooper, 
Author of " The Purgatory of Suicides." Post 8vo, 1«., in paper cover. 



*■ Mr. Coo|>er pnss^scn urK^t^nlank alfili- 
tiei of no mi^iui ordor, and niontL courage 
Iwyond mDJiy . . . ^ . The manlmesB with 
which he hvowb, find tlie llM»]ditit^ h^ad 
leol with wliSch htt nrgt^tu the doctrluii':^ of 
jmatie and Iovl'^ rcEpt:ct fur liumQn ri^lits, 
aod muraL povrtr, in tliette lectures^ sire 

" Mr* Cuopor'a itylp ii Intensely t-lear 
and forcible, und dfiptayi gr^flt t^itmcut- 
neai and fine humim lympathy i it lain 



the highest degree manly, plain, and vigor- 
ous."— Mominflf Advertiser. 

" These two orations are thoroughly im* 
bned with the peace doctrines winch have 
lately been making rapid progress in many 
unexpected quarters. To all who take an 
interest in that great movement, we would 
recommend this book, on account of the 
fervid eloquence and earnest truthfulness 
which pervades every line of it."— Jtfan- 
chester Examiner, 



THE CHRISTIAN'S KEY TO THE PHUOSOPHTOF SOCIALISM; 

Being Hints and Aids towards an Analytical Enquiry into the Prin- 
ciples of Social Progress, with a View to the Elucidation of the great 
practical problem of the present day, — the Improvement of the Con- 
dition of the Working Classes. In Ten Propositions, by Upsilon. 
Post 8vo, paper cover, U. 









r 



MR CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 



THE DUTY OF ENGLAM): a Protestant Layman's Keply to Cardinal 
Wiseman's Appeal. 8vo, U. 




"The •Protertant Layman' 
question in the right spirit. __ , „ . 

meet the * Papal aggression ' solelj by I Chester Spectator, 



argues the I logical argument, free inquiry, and free 
He would I thought, unbiassed by authority."— Jfan- 
" nter " -^--— 



BBIEF EXPOSITION OF THE GOSPEL OF ST. MATTHEW. 

By the Rev. B. £. B. Macleixan. 12mo, cloth, price 3». 



ECCLESIASTICAL PRETENSIONS, ROMISH AND ENGLISH; 

with the Antidote which a Catholic Protestantism Supplies. A Tract 
for the Times, being A SERMON, preached in Renshaw Street Chapel, 
Liverpool, Sunday, November 17, 1850. By John Hamilton Thom. 



RELIGION, THE CHURCH, AND THE PEOPLE, a sermon, 

preached in Lewin's Mead Chapel, Bristol, September 23rd, 1849, on 
behalf of The Ministry to the Poor in Bristol. By John Hamilton 
Thom. Published by Bequest. 12mo, paper cover, price 1«. 



THE PEOSPECTIVE EEVIEW. 

A Quarterly Journal of Theology and Literature, price 2«. Qd. 



'^ThoPnoflPBCti^M Rgyibw is dc'voted 
to a tr^ Tff BOLOf^Vf and Gw tDonk] iiKp^cts 
of Lit sit* TUBE. Under (he comi. on 
tliat linirciriiiff l»l[li]pn{N?s from the dnjri ,ne 
of Vfirbfl iOKpiratluij ore not only di'^M i ng; 
tho primitive r^cunt* liftlie&oepel ol L^.eir 
truG inberprftatiai), but t^van d^troving 
rbLth lit ChrfalJiuiky liaeU^ th<! Work is 
conduclod In ttie iv^rjfidfni.? tt^iciT ocdj- a 
livJni; nilrid und honrt^ inA in ' " ^ . to 
hny TettL^r^ can receive l]u Mmi of 

il£>i.-e]4Uijti; iind in tJlit^ f rv- n lat 

for fill sucJi tftfra ij ii trui? Ct>.\^],: . ■, \ ■ )d, 
wlik'ih no<:rltiu»1 or iLLatorlcfiLl §|i^t:u^i on 
COD diicnKlit Of defitruy. II aSme tu i jr- 

fjret anA reprewBt f^pJ ritual ChriFiti^ifMty, 
n itB chamf^tHf of ih^ tjHiversBJ tiulitrion. 
Fully BdapiJng the floiatim^nt of Coleridge, 



that 'the uxftrciafi cf ihv rcusonino' and 
rerli I'llyL* iiu^erft, Increiifilnff tiUiJE^fhtT iUid 
en i-uiu: \ U'«:^ Q.r^ reiiul^ltf to ki^^p ullve 
th ' .-[jiJiLJiil faith Ejf thi^ hijiLxt/— iTith A 

gr ii mpprtfciatioa of tlae livlK>uir« of 
t I ul |ij>di.ut'i;Kn*i of all Churtilies,— it 
es^iei^iuN U ike part of a true levcnace not 
to rtet ill Liin^ir coDctusioutt but to thittk 
and Itvu In thtir dplrit. fly llnj name 
*I !:■ -i^F^CTiTS Rkteew,* it k totffnded 
to Bio claim to Difecoveryj btU ilittply 
to iTF's* the Jpaire ami llie attitude of 
Pi . -:•; f tiP »u>ir^f>«t coiitlniuklly the Duty 
of J r.j^t and Present ba a trudt for 

th ;ii|. ■ iiud OiieiUy to disown Ctie 

id '■■11- r'ojifli'i-viitbm, of whatever tect^ 
wl-u ij iniiki^ (!liriBiJantty but Ii nrtai^fss 
formula.."— M^iraat from th^ Pr&tpcciu^. 



THE NOETH AMEKICAN EEVIEW. 

Published quarterly, price 6«. 



THE AMEEICAN CHEISTIAN EXAMINEE 

AND RELIGIOUS MISCELLANY. 

Edited by the Rev. George Putnam and George E. Ellis. Published 

every alternate month, price 3«. 6d, 

r ^ St^* — ^ .^ 




^<»«e^ 



MB. CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 



€^t Cutlinlir hxiu. 



UNIFORM POST 8vo. 



ST. PAUL'S EPISTLES TO THE COEINTHIANS: 

An Attempt to convey their Spirit and Significance, by the Rev. John 
HAMiLTOif Thom. In 1 vol., cloth, 9«. 
*' A Tolume of singularly free, suggestiye, and beauUftil coxameatary,**— Inquirer, 




EELIGIOUS MYSTEET CONSIDEEED. cioth, price 2,. 

treats his subject both I of the philosopher and the learned.''— 
philosophically, and the Economist, 
orthy the attention both | 



"The author treats his 
learnedly and philos 
little work is worthy 

GOD Cf CHEIST. 

cloth, 6«. 



Discourses by Horace Bushnbll. In 1 vol., 



I. — Preliminary dissertation on the 
nature of laneui^e as related 
to thought and spirit. 

n. — A discourse on Uie divinity of 
Christ. 



CONTENTS. 

III. — ^A discourse on the Atonement. 
IV. — ^A discourse on Dogma and 

Spirit; or the true reviving of 

Religion. 



"Mr. Bushnell's dissertation is valuable 
as giving ns a perfect theoretical founda- 
tion for those practical efforts to secure 
peace and extend toleration which are now 
making in the ^ot\6.."— Economist, 

'*The author of the discourses before us 



is oriorinal in that sense in which no faith- 
ful follower of Christ ever need fear to be 
thought so. He is original in having gone 
himself to the fountain-head of truth, in 
spite of all imposing creeds and customs." 
'-Inquirer, 



POPULAB CHEISTIANITY : its Transition state and probable 
Development. By Frederick Foxton, A.B., formerly of Pembroke 
College, Oxford, and perpetual Curate of Stoke Prior and Docklow, 
Herefordshire. Cloth, 6«. 




"Fewwritera are bolder, tmt hU manner 
ii siiifruljifly cctnilderiitc towardA Uie vc ry 
OTJinhitjs timt hit I'tJijibnti— liU liuii;itii|<e 
eiTi^uMrly culm miU tntniiured* ih^ is 
(!vidi<i;i|ir a tiian who bai It is purp«>!ie 
Bincercly sit hciirt^ find jjidulj^t^a In no 
wriliiijjr for #flL>ct, But wliat most dlstln- 
guinhifa him fnoin njftny with whoin lie 
may lx> rompiirfrd i», tlie wifsltivBaHHS of 
hia dootrSrHv A prritatype fgr bis voltJiue 
majr bo fgund in ihftl ot rUe Amf>r]c li:i, 
Theudon? Parker— Uie 'DlBtBurse of Rtli- 

gion/ lliere m a gmat cuincid^nce In tJie 
■jiin of idcafl, Parkfr i» inoj« i:ic]|jjnus 
and Pluqxient^ but Foiton id for more 
eii)Ii(!it, dtfrinlte. BHd comiJivhenaLbk in 
hi£ mcuniDg,"— S^j^/flfor. 

" He liaa a. pcnc<irBtJon tbto the splrttuul 
dei3r(9t iir>d wAntfg of tim ^^ puifible t^nljr 
to one who porbikes of tfaeiot und ha \um 
uttered tbu moffl {ifotilietfc fuct of our 
rellirlaui condiiioiii wlui k fcircu oi convLc- 
tlOB tf hkJi itself fflvqs cqiifidniice, tbat Uie 



\^j0^ 



fact is as he sees it. His book appears to 
us to contain many Just and profound 
views of the religious character of the 
present age, and Its indications of pro- 
gress. He often touches a deep and fruit- 
ful truth with a power and fulness that 
leave nothing to be desired."— Pra«pec^ivtf 
Meviewi Nov, 1840. 

*" It contains many passages that show a 
warm appreciation of the moral beauty of 
Christianity,— written with considerable 
power."— /n^ttircr. . , 

**.... with earnestness and eloquence." 
—CHtic, 

" We must refer our readers to the work 
itself, which is most ably written, and 
evinces a spirit at once earnest, enlight- 
ened, and liberal ; in a small comnass he 
presents a most lucid exposition of views, 
many of them original, and supported by 
arguments which cannot fail to create a 
deep sensation in the religious world."— 
Observer, 



-9«^|j!? 



n^*^ 



-2^18^3 



MB. CHAPMA^^S PUBLICATIONS. 



THE CATHOUC SERIES-eontfmiecf. 



BEPBESENTATIVE MEN. seven lectubes. By bai™ 



Waldo Emebson. Oloth, Bs. 

"Mr. Emenon'f book is for us rather 
■trange than pleasing. Like Ifr. Carlyle, 
he f trains after effect by quaint phrase- 
ology— the noTelty will gain him admirers 
and readers. At the same time there is 
good sterling stuff in him;— already pos- 
sessing a great name in his own country, 
and being well known to the reading world 
of Europe, his present work, speaking of 
men and things with which we are familiar, 
will extend his fame. It is more real and , 
material than his former volumes; more 
pointedly written, more terse and pithy, 
contains many new views, and is on the 
whole both a good and a readable book.*' 
—Ecorunnist. 

** There are many sentences that glitter 
and sparkle like crystals in the sunlight: 
and many thoughts, which seem invoked 

MEMOIE OF JOHAM GOTTLIEB nCHTE. Bywn. 

LiAM Smith. Second Edition, enlarged- Cloth, 48. 6d, 

in philosophical discussion since the time 
of Luther Fichte's opinions i 



by u fit^m philosophy froiji the depths t>f 
the lipajt"-- WeehJif Xem. 

'^Thtre i& more praftfcal fitnae and 
wifidoui tit 1h^ f^mtid In it (tiiis Buok) thau 
in wiy of iJiP lUroki be (uia given to tie 
w<ir].3t HiiiCH^ Iil9 firat When Emer- 
son kirL-pg ^itliin kifi d^pOi^ lie Acattiirji 
at lii, Islm a ^r^at deoJ of true wiKJtom, 
m; I i -rl H i wllh m u ch ^' ti ulni* poetry. Tliere 
is ul-^u n merit in Mm wliich \t Would be 
uii liiriitifiil not 10 acknowl^p; tie has 
mi= If others think i lie hfts directed Uie 
mJii<]>J ijf tlaousiLDds to loftier iiferclBea 
thiij they hud lEnDwn before; lie hOA 
stirnrj Idled tlie refltwitlve fucultie^ of mul- 
tittiiN'^i^ gnd thug led to Inquiry, and 
inQLiiry certainly wiU ccmduEil to truth."— 
Critic. 



... , maybe 

true or false: but his character as a thinker 
can be slightly valued only by such as 
know it ill; and as a man. approved bj 
action and suffering, in his life and in his 
death, he ranks with a class of men who 
were common only in better ages than 
ours."— iStafc qf Cferman Literature, by 
Thomas Carlyle, 



i 



" A Life of Fichte, full of noble- 
ness and instruction, of grand purpose, 

tender feeling, and brave effort I 

the compilation of which is executed with 
great Judgment and fidelity."— Prosp^- 
tive Review. 

'*We state Fichte's character as it is 
known and admitted by men of all parties 
among the Germans, when we say that so 
robust an intellect, a soul so calm, so lofty, 
massive, and immoveable, has not mingled 

THE WAY TOWAKDS THE BLESSED LIFE; or, The 

Doctrine of Beligion. By Johann GtOttlieb Fichte. Translated by 
William Smith. Cloth, 6«. 

WILLLUtf VON HUMBOLDT'S LETTEKS TO A FE- 

MALE FBIEND. A Complete Edition. Translated from the Second 
German Edition. By Cathebine M. A. Coupek, Author of " Visits 
to Beechwood Farm," « Lucy's Half-Crown," &c. 2 vols., cloth, 10«. 6rf. 

** We cordially recommend these volumes 

to the attention of our readers 

The work is in every way worthy of the 
character and experience of its distin- 
guished author."— Z>ai/y News. 

** These admirable letters were, we believe, 
first introduced to notice in England by 
the *Atfaeneeum;' and perhaps no greater 
boon was ever conferred upon the English 
reader than in the publication of the two 
volumes which contain this excellent trans- 
lation of William Humboldt's portion of 
a lengthened correspondence with his 
female friend."— Westminster and To- 
reian Quarterly Review. 

**The beautiful series of W. Von Hum- 
boldt's letters, now for the first time trans- 
lated and published complete, possess not 



onl: 



high intrinsic interest, but an interest 
.^- -^_i,.i — circum- 



- Jyl „ 

arising from the very strike 
stances in which they origina 
We wish we had space to verify our re- 
marks. But we should not know where to 
begin, or where to end; we have therefore 
no alternative but to recommend the entire 
book to careful perusal, and to promise a 
continuance of occasional extracts into 
our columns from the beauties of thought 
and feeling with which it abounds."— 3«a>»- 
cliester Examiner and Times. 

"It is the only complete collection of 
these remarkable letters, which has yet 
been published in English, and the transla- 
tion 18 singularly perfect; we have seldom 
read such a rendering of German thougnt» 
into the English tongue."— Oitu;. 



"^^&l^\ 



5<ate^ 



'^^^i 



MR. CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 
THE CATHOLIC SEMES-conHnued. 



THE VOCATION OF MAN. By Johann Gottlibb Fichte, 

Translated from the German, by William Smith. Cloth, 4*. 6d. 

sure to teach vou much, because it excites 
thought. If It rouses you to combat his 
conclusions, it has done a good work ; for 
in that very effort you are stirred to a con- 
sideration of points which have hitherto 
escaped your indolent acquiescence.''— 
Foreign Quarterly, 

"This is Fichte's most popular work, 
and is every way remarkable."— J.<Za*. 

** It appears to us the boldest and most 
emphatic attempt that has yet been made 
to explain to man his restless and uncon- 
querable desire to win the True and the 
KtemaL"-^entineL 

OF THE PEESENT AGE. 

Translated from the German, by Wil- 

** He makes us think, and perhaps more 
sublimely than we have ever formerly 
thought, but it is only in order that we 
may the more nobly act. 

*^As a majestic and most stirring utter- 
ance fh>m the lips of the greatest German 
prophet, we trust that the hook will find a 
response in many an English soul, and 
potently help to regenerate English society." 



** In the progress of my present work, I 
have taken a deeper glance into religion 
than ever I did before. In me the emotions 
of tbe heart proceed only from perfect in- 
tellectual clearness;— it cannot be but that 
the clearness I have now attained on this 
subject shall also take possession of my 
heart.**— Fichte's Correspondence. 

"•The Vocation of Man' is. as Fichte 
truly says, intelligible to all readers who are 
really able to understand a book at all ; 
and as the history of the mind in its various 
phases of doubt, luiowledge, and faith, it is 
of interest to aU. A book of this stamp is 

THE CHABACTEEISTIOS 

By Johann Gottlieb Fichte. 
MAM Smith. Cloth, Is. 

**A noble and most notable acquisition 
to the literature of Bng\Bnd.**-'I)otigleu 
Jerrold*8 Weekly Paper. 

** We accept these lectures as a true and 
most admirable delineation of the present 
age; and on this ground alone we should 
bestow on them our heartiest recommend- 
ation ; but it is because they teach us how 
we may rise above the age that we bestow 
on them our most emphatic praise. 



THE VOCATION OF THE SCHOLAB. By johai™ gott- 

LiEB Fichte. Translated from the Ge^an, by William Smith. 
Cloth, 28. ; paper cover, U. 6d, 



"*The Vocation of the Scholar' 

is distinguished by the same hi^h moral 
tone, and manly^fgorous expression which 
characterixe all Ficnte's works in the Ger- 
man, and is nothini 

clear, unembarrassed, 

lish translation." — DotLgUu 
Newspaper. 

" We ar 



riciiu; B wurKB in uw wor- 
thing lost in Mr. Smith's 
issed, and thoroughly Eng- 
J* — DougUu JerroWt 



presented to the public in a very neat form. 
. ... No class needs an earnest and sincere 
spirit more tlian the literary class: and 
therefore the * Vocation of the Scholar,' the 
* Guide of the Human Race,' written in 
Fichte's most earnest, most commanding 
temper, will be welcomed in its English 
dress by public writers, and be beneficial 
to the cause of truth."— £t;an<m»i«^. 



.. 3 are glad to see this excellent trans- 
lation of one of the best of Fichte's works 

ON THE NATTJEE OF THE SCHOLiE, AND ITS 

MANIFESTATIONS. By Johann Gottlieb Fichte. Translated 
from the German, by William Smith. Second Edition. Cloth, Zs. 6d, 

^'^riii-; work mu^t iEi^vitJiblj arrest 11 kU 
airi iiiL<»ri of tlic Bt^juntiilc p]liy»foliuit by tija 
gi,>iKl ^ptrihiJiUtjr of it# dtM^trlrirfl, ainl ttit) 
pibrL* iiunfyHly it Eeachcfi, .... BhuU wo bo 
prusufnptuouA if we recommend thvie views 
Ut mif imA't^*mtuii brctlirtn 



" With great satisfaction we welcome 
this first English translation of an author 
who occupies the most exalted position as 
a profound and original thinker; as an 
irresistible orator in the cause of what he 
believed to be truth; as a thoroughly 
honest and heroic man The appear- 



ance of any of liis works in our language 
is, we believe, a perfect novelty. . . . These 
orations are admirably fitted for their pur- 



pose; so grand is the position taken by the 
lecturer, and so irresistible their eloquence." 
—Examiner, 



? ar If W(3 wiy 
thoughtfulT the 



to the eulifhtenefl, 

""" is— if yoTi 

...linnl Wtf Jtijow mn u hiarlifr 
morality ttinn tliift,OFinare nobl^ prtudpii^g 
thiin these i tliey on* TuM of trutliJ^ — Hrituh 
atiU Foreiffn Stlcdico-Cftirurfjii^l Jlerieip, 



serionf-. This— if you Im? Ifm? pe1i»Lm»— js 



1^9^^ 



rieip, t 



^^^<'^* 



MR. CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 






THE CATHOLIC SERlES-^continwd. 



THE POPULAR WORKS OF JOHAM GOTTLIEB 

FICHTE. Cloth, 12». per volume. 

CONTENTS OF VOL. I. 

1. Mbmoir of thb Author, by Williax Sxith. 

2. Thu Vooatioh or thb Soholab. 

3. Thb Naturb of thb Soholab. 

4. Thb Yooatiob or JUab. 

CONTENTS OF VOL. IL 

1. Thb Chabaotbbistios or thb Pbesebt Agb. 

2. Thb Wat towards thb Blbssed Lifb; or, thb Boctribb or 

BEuaioB. 



SEMONS OF CONSOLATION. 

D.D. 8«. cloth. 



By F. W. P. Greenwood, 



"This a really dellghtftil volume, which 
we would ffladiT see producing its purify- 
ing and elevating influences in all our 
families."— Jnfluir^r. 

'* This beautifttl volume we are sure will 



meet with agrateAil reception from all who 
seek instruction on the topics most interest- 
ing to a thoughtful mind. There are 
twenty-seven sermons in the volume." — 
Christian Examiner, 



SELF-CULTTJEE. 

cover; 1«. cloth. 



By William Ellebt Channing. 6d. paper 



THE CRITICAL AND MISCELLANEOUS WRITINGS 

OF THEODORE PABKER. Cloth, 6«. 

'* It will be seen from these extracts that 
Theodore Parker is a writer of considerable 
power and flreshness, if not originality. Of 
the school of Carlyle, or rather taking the 
same German originalr for his models, 
Parker has a more sober style and a less 
theatric taste. His composition wfmts the 



grotesque animation and richness of Car- 
lyle, but it is vivid, strong, and frequently 
picturesque, with a tenderness that the 



m»^ 



great Scotchman does not po6ses8."--<Spe(> 
tator, 

** Viewing him as a most useful, as well 
as highly-gifted man, we cordially welcome 
the appearance of an English reprint of 
some of his best productions. The '^Miscel- 
laneous' Pieces are characterised by the 
peculiar eloquence which is without a 
parallel in the works of English writers. 



His language is almost entirely figurative : 
the glories of nature are pressed into his 
service, and convey his most careless 
thought This is the principal charm of 
his writings; his eloquence is altogether 
unlike that of the English orator or 
essayist ; it partakes of the grandeur of the 
forests in his native land ; and we seem, 
when listening to his speech, to hear the 
music of the woods, the rustling of the 
pine-trees, and the ringing of the wood- 
man'fe axe. In this respect he resembles 
Emerson ; but, unlike that celebrated man. 
he never discourses audibly with himself, 
in a language unknown to the world— he 
is never obscure ; the stream, though deep, 
reveals the glittering gems whicfi cluster 
so thickly on its bed?*— Inquirer, 




"^10^3 



MR. CHAPMAN'S PUBLICATIONS. 
THE CATHOLIC SER\ES-contlnued, 



THE LIFE OF JEAN PAUL FB. EICHTEE. compued 

from various soxirces. Together with his Autobiography, translated 
from the German. Second Edition. Illustrated with a Portrait en- 
graved on Steel. Cloth, Is. Qd, 

"The autobiography of Richter, which 
extends only to his twelfth year, is one of 
the most interestinpr studies of a true poet's 
childhood ever given to the world." — 
LoTV^i Edinburgh Magazine. 

** Richter has an intellect vehement, 
rugged, irresistible, crushing in pieces the 
hardest problems ; piercing into the most 
hidden combinations of thmgs, and grasp- 



ing the most distant ; an imagination vaguev 
sombre, splendid, or appaOing, brooding 
over the abysses of being, wandering through 
infinitude, and summoning before us, in 
its dim religious light, shajpes of brilliancy, 
solemnity, or terror; a fancy of exube- 
rance literally unexampled, for it pours 
its treasures with a lavishness which knows 
no limit, hanging, liice the sun, a jewel on 
every grass-blade, and sowing the earth at 
large with orient pearls. But deeper than 
all these lies humour, the ruling mialityof 
Richter— as it were the central fire that 
pervades and vivifies his whole being. He 
Is a humourist from his inmost soul ; he 
thinks as a humourist; he imagines, acts, 
feels as a humourist : sport is the element 
in which his nature lives and works.*'— 
Thomas Carlyle, 

"With such a writer it is no common 
treat to be intimately acquainted. In the 
proximity of great and virtuous minds we 
imbibe a poruon of their nature— feel, as 
mesmerists say, a healthful contagion, are 
braced with the same spirit of faith, hope, 
and patient endurance— are furnished with 
data for clearing up and working out the 
intricate problem of life, and are inspired, 
lilce them, with the prospect of immortality. 
No reader of sensibility can rise from the 
perusal of these volumes without becoming 
both wiser and better.''— J. ^2a«. 

" A;)art from the interest of the work, as 
the life of Jean Paul, the reader learns 
something of German life and German 
thought, and is introduced to Weimar 
during its most distinguished period— 
when Ooethe, Schiller, Herder, and Wie- 
land, the great fixed stars of Germanv, in 
conjunction with Jean Paul, were there, 
surrounded by beautiful and admiring 



UONI1 1], of dig most refinGd ftjud e)ir[Jtf>d 
iiHjijitM, ..End of iiriricHy rauk. It Is, full 
of p3iiis;LL'^f:s so attnictire Qiid f^Iunble that 
it k dimciilt to m^k<i a stieclkm ae ei- 
ampl<?p| uf L(£ uli^TTLt'X^t "^Inquirer,. 

'^Thfi work iti u ufioful piybition nfa 
grr^nE and mnlalil^ rnai], whn, pm^HSicd of 
till' kiddlleEt feeUngA, smd the naofil brij- 
iJiiNt ftmtiwy, turned to a LS^h p^jmofia 
tk if humour of ^^lilck ItahHiiini is t^oi^rpat 
t ' . ' - I. and f^ltifrvu one of Hit; lino of 
8 1 rid con EmsU'd i E wi [ h Eiti f talta- 

t JiiJK and a rliapBodlciiJ po^iry 

V . . 1 .li: tntiretT hli own, I>eE 115 hopi> 
tJniL it wiJIi cii>rnplete ihii work begun by 
Jir. Carlylfl*j( Essay e, and en use .Icfin Paul 
tf> bv. really read in this couHtry."— Uj!'- 

'■' JiiuhttT U (<xli]bitcd in 4 mo&t amiable 
LurJit in this biosrftiihy— induftHrious, 
fTuuul, benevolent, with a ddM-liko aiiq- 
plirity of eharn{.'tt>r, and a lieurt overdo w- 
uiLT vrttli tlie puroBt lt>ve. Hii Ititters to 
bin wife nro beautiful nniuioHals of true 
aJS'^ x'lion, and th*! way in wliicli lie perpo- 
tMiily fjifiiks of hifi cliUdren shows tTiat ho 
y,L^ tlic in 0*1 attuclitEi liml iodnlgpnt of 
fiilurs. Wliotvtir craino wjf^hin the sphfiTe 
OH JUn tiompanianshly nppear* ut have con- 
trjiitidiin ati'eetion forlvimthMdcatb only 
di^^ulv^ ! and whilo hU name was re- 
sounding uirou^b Qennany, he rL^malned 
a* meek and huiahj^ m Lf lio had«till been 
an uDknown advomuircr on Paniassua/'— 

"The lit^ ttf Jean Paul jjs a cIinrmLng 

B'\i'*.-i.'. of bjogmphy whicli draw* tmd rH«fEfi 
ti jirTn^jiMon. Thu a^ii^ctfoiiA of tlio ncpder 
an.' lixLHi on Hits htTo TTitii on intensity 
riiri.'ly tn2stowed on an hlatoric^al dumteter. 
It iii imposEiblD m rend tiiii r>iGgiraiipIiy 

1 1 H rfinvictiDn £>f Ut integrity and 

' iJiougJi Aichter'4 atyfo i» moro 
u trniiiilEition than til at of any 

o :ii,in, ypt w* f<?e] that Uiia golden 

tJiiij;;Jir'i (isive rieach<?tl us pnru from the 
nuriH, to wjiicli ho hafi given thut Lnipreea 
of jj'joiiug whieb makes tl]#ra current in alJ 
CO u utriEs/*— t'A riitiiiTi liej\>rtn sr. 



THE KATIONALE OF EEUGIOUS INQUrBT; or, the 

Question stated, of Reason, the Bible, and the Church. By James 
Mabtineau. Third Edition. With a Critical Lecture on Rationalism, 
Miracles, and the Authority of Scripture, by the late Rev. Joseph 
Blanco White. 4«. paper cover ; 4s. 6d. cloth. 



r^St^ 



"^tf^l 



r 



MR. CHAPMAITS PUBLICATION& 



THE CATHOLIC SERIES-eonttotMd. 




THE PHILOSOPHT OF ABT. An oration on the Belation of 
the Plastic Arts to Nature. Translated from the German of F. W. J. 
vow ScHELLiNO, by A. Johnson. U. paper cover ; Is. 6d. cloth. 

work of art the heterogeneous is excluded, 
and a imity is attained not to be found 
elsewhere. Schelling, in his oration, chiefly, 
not exclusively, regards theartsof nainting 
and sculpture ; but his remarks willequally- 
apply to others, such as poetry and music 
This oration of Schelbng's deserves an 
extensive perusal. The translation, with 



"Thb excellent oration is an application 
to art of Schelling's general phflosophic 
principles. Schelling takes the bold course, 
and declares that what is ordinarily called 
nature is not the summit of perfection, but 
is only the inadequate manifestation of a 
high idea, which it is the office of man to 
penetrate. The true astronomer is not he 
who notes down laws and causes which 
were never revealed to sensuous organs, 
and which are often opposed to the prima 
facie influences of sensuous observers. 
The true artist is not he who merely imi- 
tates an isolated object in nature, but he 
who can penetrate into the unseen essence 
that lurks behind the visible crust, and 
afterwards reproduce it in a visible form. 
In the surrounding world means and ends 
are clashed and Jarred together; in the 



the exception of a few trifling inaccuracies, 
is admirably done by Mr. Johnson; and 
we know of no work in our language 
better suited to give a notion of the turn 
which German philosophy took after it 
abandoned the subjectivity of Kant and 
Fichte. The notion will, of course, be a 
faint one ; but it is something to know the 
latitude and longitude of a mental posi- 
tion."— JBxamtn^r. 



ESSAYS. BY E. W. EMEESON. (Second Senes.) With i 
Notice by Thomas Gakltlb. Zs, paper cover ; Sir. 6<{. cloth. 

" The difficulty we find In giving a proper 
notice of this volume arises from the per- 
vadingness of its excellence, and the com- 

Bression of its matter. With more learning 
lan Hazlitt, more perspicuity than Car- 
Ivle, more vigour and depth of thought 
than Addison, and with as much originality 
and fascination as any of them, this volume 
is a briUiant addition to the Table Talk of 



intellectual men, be they who or where 
they mAj."— Prospective Review, 

**^Mt. Emerson is not a common man, 
and everjrthing he writes contains sugges- 
tive matter of much thought and earnest- 
ness." — Examiner. 

"That Emerson is, in a high degree, 
possessed of the faculty and vision of the 
seer, none can doubt who will earnestly 
and with a kind and reverential spirit 
peruse these nine Essays. He deals only 
with the true and the eternal. His piercing 
gaze at once shoots swiftly, surely, tbrouffh 
the outward and the superflcial, to the 
inmost causes and workings. Any one can 
tell the time who looks on the face of the 
clock, but he loves to lay bare the machinery 
and show its moving principle. His words 
and his thoughts are a fresh spring, that 
invigorates the soul that is steeped therein. 
His mind is ever dealing with the eternal ; 
and those who only live to exercise their 
lower intellectual faculties, and desire only 
new facts and new images, and those who 



have not a feeling or an interest In the gretit 
question of mind and matter, eternity and 
nature, will disregard him as unintelligible 
and uninteresting, as they do Bacon and 
Plato, and, indeed, philosophy itself." — 
Douglas JerroWs Magazine. 

** Beyond social science, because beyond 
and outside social existence, there lies the 
science of self, the development of man in 
his individual existence, within himself 
and for himself. Of this latter science, 
which may perhaps be called the philo- 
sophy of individuality, Mr. Emerson is an 
able apostle and interpreteT."— League. 

"As regards the particular volume of 
Embrson before us, we think it an im- 
provement -upon the first series of essays. 
The subjects are better chosen. They come 
home more to the experience of the mass 
of mankind, and are consequently more 
interesting. Their treatment also indicates 
an artistic improvement in the composi- 
tion."— iSpcctefor. 

"All lovers of literature will read Mr. 
Emerson's new volume, as the most of 
them have read his former one: and if 
correct taste, and sober views of life, and 
such ideas on the higher subjects of thought 
as we have been accustomed to account as 
truths, are sometimes outrag^ed, we at least 
meet at every step with originality, imagi- 
nation, and eloquence."— Jn^irtfT. 



<!St^ 



--9«^| 



BY THE PRESS. 



" The various works composing the * Catholic Series,' should be known 
to all lovers of literature, and ma^ be recommended as calculated to in- 
struct and elevate by the proposition of noble aims and the inculcation of 
noble truths, furnishing reflective and cultivated minds with more whole- 
some food than the nauseous trash which the popular tale-writers of the 
dav set before their readers." — Morning Chronicle, 

" Too much encouragement cannot be given to enterprising publications 
like the present. They are directlv in the teeth of popular preiudice and 
popular trash. They are addressed to the higher class of readers — those 
who think as weU as read. They are works at which ordinary publishers 
shudder as * unsaleable,' but which are really capable of finding a very 
laree public." — Foreign Quarterly. 

"The works already published embrace a great variety of subjects, and 
display a great variety of talent. They are not exclusively, nor even chiefly, 
religious ; and they are from the pens of German, French, American, 
as well as English authors. Without reference to the opinion which they 
contain, we may safely say that they are generally such as all men of free 
and philosophical minds would do* well to know and ponder." — Noncon- 
formut. 

" This series deserves attention, both for what it has already given, and 
for what it promises." — Taits Magazine. 

*' A series not intended to represent or maintain a form of opinion, but 
to bring together some of the works which do honour to our common 
nature, by the genius they display, or by their ennobling tendency and 
lofty aspirations?' — Inquirer, 

" It is highly creditable to Mr. Chapman to find his name in connexion 
with so much well-directed enterprise in the cause of German literature 
and philosophy. He is the first publisher who seems to have proposed to 
himself the worthy object of introducing the English reader to the philo- 
sophic mind of Germany, uninfluenced by the tradesman's distrust of the 
marketable nature of the article. It is a very praiseworthy ambition ; and 
we trust the public will justify his confidence. Nothing could be more un- 
worthy than the attempt to discourage, and indeed punish, such unselfish 
enterprise, by attaching a bad reputation for orthodoxy to everything con- 
nected with German philosophy and theology. This is especially unworthy 
in the * student,' or the * scholar,' to borrow Fichte's names, who should dis- 
dain to set themselves the task of exciting, by their friction, a popular pre- 
judice and clamour on matters on which the populace are no competent 
judges, and have, indeed, no judgment of their own, — and who should feel, 
as men themselves devoted to thought, that what makes a good book is 
not that it should gain its reader's acquiescence, but that it should multiplv 
his mental experience; that it should acquaint him with the ideas which 
philosophers and scholars, reared by a training difierent fi*om their own, 
nave laboriously reached and devoutly entertain ; that, in a word, it should 
enlarge his materials and his sympa'thies as a man and a thinker." — Pro- 
spective Review, 

" A series of serious and manly publications." — Economist, 

^^9^ ^(B^ 



\^m^ '■ ^«^j 

NOW EBADT, 
No. I. 

OF 

"SKETCHES OF EUEOPEAN CAPITALS," 

BT 

WILLIAM WABE, M.D., 

AUTSOB OF " EBBOBIA: OB, LBTTBB8 VBOK PALMYBA," *' AUBBLZAB," BTC. 

Post 8yo, ornameiital coyer, price U. 



In the press, and will be published Nov. 1st, 

No. n. 
"LITEBATUEE AND LIFE," 

I.BCTUBB8 Bi:;^ 

EDWIN p. WHIPPLE, 

CONTENTS. 



Lecture I. Authors in their Belations 

to Life. 
„ II. Novels and Novelists — 

Charles Dickens. 
„ III. Wit and Humor. 



Lecture IV. The Ludicrous Side of 
Life. 
„ v. Genius. 

„ VI. Intellectual Health and 
Disease. 




LONDON: 
JOHN CHAPMAN, 142, STRAND. 

MDCCCU. 



^j 5^ 








i 



